{"Mercury": {"Symptoms": ["Metallic taste", "Vomiting", "Difficulty breathing", "Bad cough", "Swollen, bleeding gums", "Burning in the stomach and throat", "Bloody diarrhea and vomiting", "Numbness or pain in certain parts of your skin", "Uncontrollable shaking or tremor", "Inability to walk well", "Blindness and double vision", "Memory problems", "Seizures and death (with large exposures) "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of\r\nan actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local\r\nemergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at\r\n1-800-222-1222."}, "Metachromatic leukodystrophy": {"description": "Metachromatic leukodystrophy (MLD) is a genetic disorder that affects nerves, muscles, other organs, and behavior. It slowly gets worse over time.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormally high muscle tone, abnormal muscle movements", "Behavior problems", "Decreased mental function", "Decreased muscle tone", "Difficulty walking", "Feeding difficulties", "Frequent falls", "Inability to perform normal tasks", "Incontinence", "Irritability", "Loss of muscle control", "Nerve function problems", "Personality changes", "Poor school performance", "Seizures", "Speech difficulties, slurring", "Swallowing difficulty "], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:Abnormal eye movements, Abnormal posture, Decreased or no deep tendon reflexes, Coma, Optic nerve atrophy. Tests that may be done\u00a0include:Blood or skin culture to look for low arylsulfatase A activity, Blood test to look for low arylsulfatase A enzyme levels, CT scan, DNA testing for the ARSA gene, MRI, Nerve biopsy, Nerve\u00a0signaling studies, Urinalysis, Urine chemistry. ", "Causes": "MLD is usually caused by the lack of an important enzyme called arylsulfatase A (ARSA). Because this enzyme is missing, chemicals called sulfatides build up in the body and damage the nervous system, kidneys, gallbladder, and other organs. In particular, the chemicals damage the protective sheaths that surround nerve cells.The disease is passed down through families (inherited). You must get a copy of the defective gene from both your parents to have the disease. Parents can each have the defective gene, but not have MLD. A person with\u00a01 defective gene is called a \"carrier.\"Children who inherit only\u00a01 defective gene from\u00a01 parent will be a carrier, but usually will not develop MLD. When 2 carriers have a child, there is a\u00a01 in 4\u00a0chance that the child will get both genes and have MLD.MLD occurs in about 1 in 40,000 people. There are\u00a03 forms of the disease. The forms\u00a0are based on when the symptoms begin:Late infantile MLD symptoms usually begin by ages 1\u00a0to 2., Juvenile MLD symptoms usually begin between ages 4 and 12., Adult (and late-stage juvenile MLD) symptoms may occur between age 14 and adulthood (over age 16), but may begin as late as the 40s or 50s.. ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended if you have a family history of this disorder.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for MLD. Care focuses on treating the symptoms and preserving the patient's quality of life with physical and occupational therapy.Research is studying\u00a0ways to replace the missing enzyme (arylsulfatase A)."}, "MRSA ": {"description": "When this occurs, the germ is said to be \"resistant\"\nto the antibiotic. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough or shortness of breath", "Fatigue", "Fever and chills", "General ill feeling", "Headache", "Rash", "Wounds that do not heal"], "Exams and Tests": "The only way to know for sure if you have a MRSA or staph infection is to see a health care provider.A cotton swab is used to collect a sample from an open skin rash or skin sore. Or, a sample of blood, urine, sputum (spit), or pus from an abscess may be collected. The sample is sent to a lab to test for staph and MRSA. If MRSA is found, it will be tested to see which antibiotic should be used to treat your infection.", "Causes": "Most staph germs are spread by skin-to-skin contact (touching). A doctor, nurse, other health care provider, or visitors to a hospital may have staph germs on their body that can spread to a patient.Once the\u00a0staph germ enters the body, it can spread to bones, joints, the blood, or any organ, such as the lungs, heart, or brain.Serious\u00a0staph infections are more common in people with a weakened immune system. This includes patients who:Are in hospitals and long-term care facilities for a long time, Are on kidney dialysis (hemodialysis), Receive cancer treatment or medicines that weaken their immune system, Inject illegal drugs, Had surgery in the past year . MRSA infections can also occur in healthy people who have not recently been in the hospital. Most of these MRSA infections are on the skin, or less commonly, in the lung. People who may be at risk are:Athletes and others who share items such as towels or razors, Children in day care, Members of the military, People who have gotten tattoos . ", "Prevention": "Follow these steps to avoid a staph infection and to prevent an infection from spreading:Keep your hands clean by washing them thoroughly with soap and water. Or, use an alcohol-based hand sanitizer., Keep cuts and scrapes clean and covered with bandages until they heal., Avoid contact with other people's wounds or bandages., Do NOT share personal items such as towels, clothing, or cosmetics.. Simple steps for athletes include:Cover wounds with a clean bandage. Do NOT touch other people's bandages., Wash your hands well before and after playing sports., Shower right after exercising. Do NOT share soap, razors, or towels., If you share sports equipment, clean it first with antiseptic solution or wipes. Place clothing or a towel between your skin and the equipment., Do NOT use a common whirlpool or sauna if another person with an open sore used it. Always use clothing or a towel as a barrier., Do NOT share splints, bandages, or braces., Check that shared shower facilities are clean. If they are not clean, shower at home.. If you have surgery planned, tell your health care provider if:You have frequent infections, You have had a MRSA infection before. ", "Treatment": "Draining the infection may be the only treatment needed for a skin MRSA infection that has not spread. A health care provider should do this procedure. Do not try to pop open or drain the infection yourself. Keep any sore or wound covered with a clean bandage.Severe MRSA infections are becoming harder to treat. Your lab test results will tell the doctor which antibiotic will treat your infection. Your doctor will follow guidelines about which antibiotics to use, and will look at your personal health history. MRSA infections are harder to treat if they occur in:The lungs or blood, People who are already ill or who have a weak immune system. You may need to keep taking antibiotics for a long time, even after you leave the hospital."}, "Meconium aspiration syndrome": {"description": "Meconium aspiration syndrome occurs when a newborn baby breathes a mixture of meconium and amniotic fluid into the lungs around the time of delivery. It is a serious condition.", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color (cyanosis) in the infant", "Difficulty breathing (the infant needs to work hard to breathe)", "No breathing or rapid breathing", "Limpness in infant at birth"], "Exams and Tests": "Before birth, the fetal monitor may show a slow heart rate. During delivery or at birth, meconium can be seen in the amniotic fluid and on the infant.The infant may need help with breathing or heartbeat right after birth, and may have a low Apgar score.The health care team will listen to the infant's chest with a stethoscope and may hear abnormal breath sounds, especially coarse, crackly sounds.A blood gas analysis will show low (acidic) blood pH, decreased oxygen, and increased carbon dioxide.A chest x-ray may show patchy or streaky areas in the infant's lungs.", "Causes": "Meconium is the early feces (stool) passed by a newborn soon after birth. It is passed from the body before the baby has started to digest breast milk (or formula).In some cases, the baby passes meconium while still inside the uterus. This will happen when babies are \"under stress\" because the supply of blood and oxygen decreases. This is often due to problems with the placenta.Once the meconium has passed into the surrounding amniotic fluid, the baby may breathe meconium into the lungs. This may happen while the baby is still in the uterus, or still covered by amniotic fluid after birth. The meconium can also block the infant's airways right after birth.This condition is called meconium aspiration. It can cause breathing problems due to swelling (inflammation) in the baby's lungs after birth.Risk factors that may cause stress on the baby before birth include:\"Aging\" of the placenta if the pregnancy goes far past the due date, Decreased oxygen to the infant while in the uterus, Diabetes in the pregnant mother, Difficult delivery or long labor, High blood pressure in the pregnant mother. ", "Prevention": "Staying healthy during pregnancy and following your health care provider's advice can often prevent problems that lead to meconium being present.Your healthcare providers will want to be prepared for meconium being present at birth if:Your water broke at home and the fluid was clear or stained with a greenish or brown substance., Any testing done during your pregnancy during indicates there may be problems present., Fetal monitoring shows any signs of fetal distress can be found early. . ", "Treatment": "A special care team should be present when the baby is born if traces of meconium are found in the amniotic fluid. If the baby is active and crying, no treatment is needed.If the baby is not active and crying right after delivery, a tube is placed in the infant's airway by a nurse or doctor. Suction is used to remove any meconium. This procedure may be repeated more than once.If the baby is not breathing or has a low heart rate, the team will help the baby breathe using a face mask attached to a bag that delivers an oxygen mixture to inflate the baby's lungs.The infant may be placed in the special care nursery or newborn intensive care unit in order to be watched closely. Other treatments may include:Antibiotics to treat infection, Breathing machine (ventilator) to keep the baby's lungs inflated, Oxygen to keep blood levels normal, Radiant warmer to maintain body temperature. "}, "Myasthenia gravis": {"description": "Myasthenia gravis is a neuromuscular disorder. Neuromuscular disorders involve the muscles and the nerves that control them.", "Possible Complications": "The condition may cause life-threatening breathing problems. This is called a myasthetnic crisis.Patients with myasthenia gravis have a higher risk of having other autoimmune disorders, such as thyrotoxicosis, rheumatoid arthritis, and systemic lupus erythematosus (lupus).", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty because of weakness of the chest wall muscles", "Chewing or swallowing difficulty, causing frequent gagging, choking, or drooling", "Difficulty climbing stairs, lifting objects, or rising from a seated position", "Difficulty talking", "Drooping head", "Facial paralysis or weakness of the facial muscles", "Fatigue", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Double vision", "Difficulty maintaining steady gaze", "Eyelid drooping"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider performs a physical exam. This includes a detailed nervous system (neurological) examination. This may show:Muscle weakness, with eye muscles usually affected first, Normal reflexes and feeling (sensation). Tests that may be done may include:Acetylcholine receptor antibodies associated with this disease, CT or MRI scan of the chest to look for a tumor, Nerve conduction studies, EMG, Pulmonary function tests, Edrophonium test to see if this medicine reverses the symptoms for a short time\r\n . ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for myasthenia gravis. Treatment may allow you to have periods without any symptoms (remission).Lifestyle changes often help you continue your daily activities. The following may be recommended:Resting throughout the day, Using an eye patch if double vision is bothersome, Avoiding stress and heat exposure, which can make symptoms worse. Medicines that may be prescribed include:Neostigmine or pyridostigmine to improve the communication between the nerves and the muscles, Prednisone and other medications (such as azathioprine, cyclosporine, or mycophenolate mofetil) if to suppress the immune system response, if you have severe symptoms and other medicines have not worked well.. Crisis situations are attacks of weakness of the breathing muscles. These attacks can occur without warning when either too much or too little medicine is taken. These attacks usually last no longer than a few weeks. You may need to be admitted to the hospital where you may need breathing assistance with a ventilator.A procedure called plasmapheresis may also be used to help end the crisis. This procedure involves removing the clear part of the blood (plasma), which contains the antibodies. This is replaced with donated plasma that is free of antibodies or with other fluids. Plasmapheresis may also help reduce symptoms for 4 to 6 weeks and is often used before surgery.Another procedure, called immunoglobulin infusion, may also be done. With this procedure, a large amount of helpful antibodies are given directly into the bloodstream.Surgery to remove the thymus (thymectomy) may result in permanent remission or less need for medicines, especially when there is a tumor present.If you have eye problems, your doctor may suggest lens prisms to improve vision. Surgery may also be recommended to treat your eye muscles.Physical therapy can help maintain your muscle strength. This is especially important for the muscles that support breathing.Some medicines can worsen symptoms and should be avoided. Before taking any medicine, check with your doctor whether it is okay for you to take.", "Causes": "Myasthenia gravis is a type of autoimmune disorder. An autoimmune disorder occurs when the immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue. In people with myasthenia gravis, the body produces antibodies that block the muscle cells from receiving messages (neurotransmitters) from the nerve cell. Antibodies are proteins made by the body's immune system when it detects harmful substances. Antibodies may be produced when the immune system mistakenly considers healthy tissue a harmful substance such as in the case of myasthenia gravis. The exact cause of myasthenia gravis is unknown. In some cases, it is linked to tumors of the thymus (an organ of the immune system).Myasthenia gravis can affect people at any age. It is most common in young women and older men."}, "Meprobamate overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Double vision", "Rapid side-to-side movement of the eyes (nystagmus)", "Vomiting", "Low blood pressure", "Palpitations", "Rapid heart rate", "Slow heart rate ", "Labored breathing", "Slowed breathing", "Wheezing ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Excitability", "Drowsiness", "Lack of alertness (stupor)", "Slurred speech", "Tremor", "Uncoordinated movement", "Weakness", "Blue lips and fingernails", "Pinpoint red spots"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Meningitis - meningococcal": {"description": "Meningococcal meningitis is a bacterial\u00a0infection that results in swelling and irritation (inflammation) of the membranes covering the brain and spinal cord.", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Myocarditis, Seizures, Subdural effusion (buildup of fluid between the skull and brain). ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Purple, bruise-like areas (purpura)", "Rash, pinpoint red spots (petechiae)", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck (meningismus)", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in infants\r\n ", "Decreased consciousness", "Poor feeding or irritability in children", "Rapid breathing", "Unusual posture with the head and neck arched backwards (opisthotonus)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine the patient. This\u00a0will show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Rash, Stiff neck. If the health care provider thinks meningitis is possible, a\u00a0lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") should be done to remove a sample of\u00a0spinal fluid (cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF) for testing.Tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the head, White blood cell (WBC) count. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics should be started as soon as possible. Ceftriaxone is one of the most commonly used antibiotics for meningococcal meningitis. Penicillin in high doses is almost always effective, too.If the patient is allergic to penicillin, chloramphenicol may be used. Sometimes corticosteroids may be used, especially in children.People in close contact with someone who has meningococcal meningitis should be given antibiotics to prevent infection. Such people include:Household members, Roommates in dormitories, Those who come into close and long-term contact with an infected person. ", "Causes": "Meningococcal meningitis is caused by the bacteria Neisseria meningitidis (also known as meningococcus).Most cases of meningococcal meningitis occur in children and teens. Meningococcus is the most common cause of bacterial meningitis in children and a leading cause of bacterial meningitis in adults.The infection occurs more often in winter or spring. It may cause local epidemics at boarding schools, college dormitories, or military bases.Risk factors include recent exposure to meningococcal meningitis and a recent upper respiratory infection.", "Prevention": "All family and close contacts (especially in health care or school settings) of people with this type of meningitis should begin antibiotic treatment as soon as possible to prevent spread of the infection. Ask your health care provider about this during the first visit.Close contacts in the same household, school, or day care center should be watched for early signs of the disease as soon as the first case is diagnosed. Always use good hygiene habits, such as washing hands before and after changing a diaper, or after using the bathroom.Vaccines for meningococcus\u00a0are effective for controlling epidemics. They are currently recommended for:Adolescents, College students in their first year living in dormitories, Military recruits, Travelers to certain parts of the world. "}, "Methapyrilene hydrochloride overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty urinating", "Blurred vision", "Dilated pupils", "Dry eyes - severe", "Dry mouth", "Ringing in the ears ", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Agitation", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Delirium", "Depression", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Increased sleepiness", "Nervousness", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Dry skin", "Flushed (red) skin"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Millipede toxin": {"Symptoms": ["Staining of the skin (turns brown)", "Intense burning or itching of skin", "Blisters ", "Blindness (rare)", "Inflammation of the membrane lining the eyelids (conjunctivitis)", "Inflammation of the cornea (keratitis) "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Mercuric chloride poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain (severe)", "Breathing difficulty - severe", "Decreased urine output (may stop completely)", "Diarrhea (bloody)", "Drooling", "Metallic taste", "Mouth lesions", "Pain in the throat and mouth - severe", "Shock", "Swelling in the throat - may be severe", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or\u00a0a local poison control center\u00a0at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Mononeuritis multiplex": {"description": "Mononeuritis multiplex is a nervous system disorder that involves damage to at least two separate nerve areas.", "Possible Complications": "Deformity, loss of tissue or muscle mass, Disturbances of organ functions, Medication side effects, Repeated or unnoticed injury to the affected area due to lack of sensation, Relationship problems due to impotence. ", "Symptoms": ["Loss of bladder or bowel control", "Loss of sensation in one or more areas of the body", "Paralysis in one or more areas of the body", "Tingling, burning, pain, or other abnormal sensations in one or more areas of the body", "Weakness in one or more areas of the body"], "Exams and Tests": "A detailed history is needed to determine the possible cause of the disorder. Examination and neuromuscular testing may show a loss of feeling and movement due to problems with specific nerves. Reflexes may be abnormal.To diagnose mononeuritis multiplex, there usually needs to be problems with two or more unrelated nerve areas. Common nerves affected are the:Axillary nerve in either arm and shoulder, Common peroneal nerve in the lower leg, Distal median nerve to the hand, Femoral nerve in the thigh, Radial nerve in the arm, Sciatic nerve in the back of the leg, Ulnar nerve in the arm. Tests may include:Electromyogram (EMG, a recording of electrical activity in the muscles), Nerve biopsy to examine the nerve under a microscope, Nerve conduction tests to measure how fast nerve impulses move along the nerve. Other tests may include:Antinuclear antibody panel (ANA), Blood chemistry tests, C-reactive protein, Imaging scans, Pregnancy test , Rheumatoid factor, Sedimentation rate, Thyroid tests, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to:Treat the illness that is causing the problem, if possible, Provide supportive care to maximize independence, Control symptoms (this may include controlling blood sugar levels for diabetics, nutritional supplementation, or medically treating conditions). To improve independence, treatments may include:Occupational therapy, Orthopedic help (for example, appliances such as wheelchairs, braces, and splints), Physical therapy (for example, exercises and retraining to increase muscle strength), Vocational therapy. Safety is an important consideration for people with sensation or movement difficulties. Lack of muscle control and decreased sensation may increase the risk of falls or injuries. Safety measures for people with movement difficulty include:Having adequate lighting (including leaving lights on at night), Installing railings, Removing obstacles (such as loose rugs that may slip on the floor), Testing water temperature before bathing, Wearing protective shoes (no open toes or high heels). Check shoes often for grit or rough spots that may injure the feet.People with decreased sensation should check their feet (or other affected area) often for bruises, open skin areas, or other injuries that may go unnoticed. These injuries may become severely infected because the pain nerves of the area are not signaling the injury.People with mononeuropathy multiplex are prone to new nerve injuries at pressure points such as the knees and elbows. They should avoid putting pressure on these areas, for example by not leaning on the elbows, crossing the knees, or holding similar positions.Medications that may help include:Over-the-counter pain medicines (ibuprofen or acetaminophen) or prescription pain medications may be needed to control pain (neuralgia)., Anticonvulsants (gabapentin, phenytoin, carbamazepine, or pregabalin) or antidepressants (amitriptyline, nortriptyline, or duloxetine), may be used to reduce stabbing pains.. Whenever possible, avoid or minimize the use of medications to reduce the risk of side effects.Positioning (the use of frames to keep bedclothes off of a tender body part) and other measures may help control pain. Autonomic symptoms can be difficult to treat or may respond poorly to treatment.", "Causes": "Mononeuritis multiplex is a form of damage to one or more peripheral nerves -- the nerves outside the brain and spinal cord. It is a group of symptoms (syndrome), not a disease.However, certain diseases can cause the injury or nerve damage that leads to the symptoms of mononeuritis multiplex. Common conditions include:Blood vessel diseases such as polyarteritis nodosa, Connective tissue diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis or systemic lupus erythematosus (the most common cause in children), Diabetes mellitus. Less common causes include:Amyloidosis, Blood disorders (such as hypereosinophilia and cryoglobulinemia), Infections such as Lyme disease, HIV, or hepatitis, Leprosy, Sarcoidosis, Sjogren syndrome, Wegener's granulomatosis. ", "Prevention": "Preventive measures vary depending on the specific disorder. Eating a proper diet and taking medication for diabetes may help prevent mononeuritis multiplex from developing."}, "Mineral spirits poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Abdominal pain -- severe", "Blood stools", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly", "Rapid heartbeat", "Burning sensations", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Loss of alertness", "Memory problems", "Nervousness", "Numbness in arms and legs", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Myelomeningocele": {"description": "The condition\u00a0is a type of spina bifida.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of spina bifida may include:Traumatic birth and difficult delivery of the baby, Frequent urinary tract infections, Fluid build up on the brain (hydrocephalus), Loss of bowel or bladder control, Low blood oxygen level in the baby, Brain infection (meningitis), Permanent weakness or paralysis of legs . This list may not be all-inclusive.", "Symptoms": ["Loss of bladder or bowel control", "Partial or complete lack of sensation", "Partial or complete paralysis of the legs", "Weakness of the hips, legs, or feet of a newborn", "Abnormal feet or legs, such as clubfoot", "Build up of fluid inside the skull (hydrocephalus)"], "Exams and Tests": "\r\nPrenatal screening can help diagnose this condition. During the second trimester, pregnant women can have a blood test called the quadruple screen. This test screens for myelomeningocele, Down syndrome, and other congenital diseases in the baby. Most women carrying a baby with spina bifida will have a higher-than-normal level of a protein called maternal alpha fetoprotein (AFP).If the quadruple screen test is positive, further testing is needed to confirm the diagnosis. Such tests may include:Pregnancy ultrasound, Amniocentesis. Myelomeningocele can be seen after the child is born. A neurologic examination may show that the child has loss of nerve-related functions below the defect. For example, watching how the infant responds to pinpricks at various locations may reveal where\u00a0the\u00a0baby\u00a0can feel the sensations.Tests done on the baby after birth may include x-rays, ultrasound, CT, or MRI of the spinal area.", "Treatment": "Genetic counseling may be recommended. In some cases where a severe defect is detected early in the pregnancy, abortion may be considered. However, intrauterine surgery to close the defect (before the baby is born) is offered in some centers and appears to reduce the risk of some later complications.After your baby is born, surgery to repair the defect is usually recommended within the first few days of life. Before surgery, the infant must be handled carefully to reduce damage to the exposed spinal cord. This may include special care and positioning, protective devices, and changes in the methods of handling, feeding, and bathing.Children who also have hydrocephalus may need a ventriculo-peritoneal shunt placed. This will help drain the extra fluid from the ventricles (in the brain) to the peritoneal cavity (in the abdomen).Antibiotics may be used to treat or prevent infections such as meningitis or urinary tract infections.Most children will require lifelong treatment for problems that result from damage to the spinal cord and spinal nerves.This includes:Bladder and bowel problems: Gentle downward pressure over the bladder may help drain the bladder. Drainage tubes, called catheters, may be needed as well. Bowel training programs and a high fiber diet may improve bowel function., Muscle and joint problems: Orthopedic or physical therapy may be needed to treat musculoskeletal symptoms. Braces may be needed. Many patients with myelomeningocele primarily use a wheelchair.. Follow-up examinations generally continue throughout the child's life. These are done to check the child's developmental progress and to treat any intellectual, neurological, or physical problems.Visiting nurses, social services, support groups, and local agencies can provide emotional support and assist with the care of a child with a myelomeningocele who has significant problems or limitations.", "Causes": "Normally, during the first month of a pregnancy, the two sides of the spine (or backbone) join together to cover the spinal cord, spinal nerves and meninges (the tissues covering the spinal cord). Spina bifida refers to any birth defect involving incomplete closure of the spine.Myelomeningocele is a neural tube defect in which the bones of the spine do not completely form, resulting in an incomplete spinal canal. This causes the spinal cord and meninges (the tissues covering the spinal cord) to protrude from (stick out of) the child's back.Myelomeningocele may affect as many as 1 out of every 4000 infants.The rest of spina bifida cases are most commonly:Spina bifida occulta, a condition in which the bones of the spine do not close but the spinal cord and meninges remain in place and skin usually covers the defect. , Meningoceles, a condition where the tissue covering the spinal cord protrudes from the spinal defect, but the spinal cord remains in place.. Other congenital disorders or birth defects may also be present in a child with myelomeningocele. Hydrocephalus may affect as many as 90% of children with myelomeningocele. Other disorders of the spinal cord or musculoskeletal system may be seen, including syringomyelia and hip dislocation.The cause of myelomeningocele is unknown. However, low levels of folic acid in a woman's body before and during early pregnancy are thought to play a part in this type of birth defect. The vitamin folic acid (or folate) is important for brain and spinal cord development.If a child is born with myelomeningocele, future children in that family have a higher risk than the general population. However, in many cases, there is no family connection.Some theorize that a virus may play a role, since there is a higher rate of this condition in children born in the early winter months. Research also indicates possible environmental factors such as radiation.", "Prevention": "Folic acid supplements may help reduce the risk of neural tube defects such as myelomeningocele. It is recommended that any woman considering becoming pregnant take 0.4 mg of folic acid a day. Pregnant women need 1 mg per day.It is important to remember that folic acid deficiencies must be corrected before becoming pregnant, because\u00a0the defects develop very early.Prospective mothers may be screened to determine the amount of folic acid in their blood."}, "Meningitis - gram-negative": {"description": "Gram-negative meningitis is a bacterial\u00a0infection of the membranes covering the brain and spinal cord (meninges). The bacteria\u00a0turn pink when exposed to a special stain (Gram-negative bacteria).", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Buildup of fluid between the skull and brain (subdural effusion), Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck (meningismus)", "Symptoms of a bladder, kidney, intestine, or lung infection", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in infants\r\n ", "Decreased consciousness", "Poor feeding or irritability in children", "Rapid breathing", "Unusual posture, with the head and neck arched backwards (opisthotonos)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. This will usually show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. If the health care provider thinks you may have meningitis, a lumbar puncture (spinal tap) should be done to remove a sample of spinal fluid (cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF) for testing.Other tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the head. This list is not all-inclusive.\u00a0\r\n", "Treatment": "Antibiotics should be started as soon as possible. Ceftriaxone, ceftazidime, and cefepime are the most commonly used antibiotics for this type of meningitis. Other antibiotics may be used, depending on the type of bacteria. If you have a spinal shunt, it may be removed.", "Causes": "Acute bacterial meningitis can be caused by Gram-negative bacteria. Meningococcal and H. influenzae meningitis are caused by Gram-negative bacteria and are covered in detail in other articles. This article covers Gram-negative meningitis caused by the following bacteria:Escherichia coli, Klebsiella pneumoniae, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Serratia marsescens. Gram-negative meningitis is more common in infants than adults. But it is also important in adults, especially those with one or more risk factors. Risk factors in adults and children include:Infection, Recent brain surgery, Recent injury to the head, Spinal abnormalities, Spinal fluid shunt placement after brain surgery, Urinary tract abnormalities, Urinary tract infection, Weakened immune system. ", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of related infections may reduce the risk of meningitis."}, "Metal cleaner poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the chemical)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure", "Abdominal pain - severe", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting, possibly with blood", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Feeling of being drunk (euphoria)", "Headache", "Loss of alertness (unconsciousness)", "Seizures", "Staggering", "Weakness", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Multiple vitamin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Cloudy urine", "Frequent urination", "Increased urine output ", "Dry, cracking lips (from chronic overdose)", "Eye irritation", "Increased sensitivity of the eyes to light ", "Irregular heartbeat", "Rapid heartbeat ", "Bone pain", "Joint pain", "Muscle pain", "Muscle weakness ", "Confusion", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Fainting", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Mental changes", "Mood changes", "Irritability ", "Flushing from niacin (vitamin B3)", "Dry cracking skin", "Itching, burning skin, or rash", "Yellow-orange areas of skin", "Sun sensitivity (more likely to sunburn)", "Hair loss (from long-term overdose) ", "Appetite loss", "Constipation (from iron or calcium)", "Diarrhea, possibly bloody", "Nausea and vomiting", "Stomach pain", "Weight loss (from long-term overdose) "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in childproof containers out of the reach of children."}, "Membranous nephropathy": {"description": "Membranous nephropathy is a kidney disorder that leads to changes and inflammation of the structures inside the kidney that help filter wastes and fluids. The inflammation may lead to problems with kidney function.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic renal failure, Deep venous thrombosis, End-stage renal disease, Nephrotic syndrome, Pulmonary embolism, Renal vein thrombosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Edema (swelling) in any area of the body", "Fatigue", "Foamy appearance of urine (due to large amounts of protein)", "Poor appetite", "Urination, excessive at night", "Weight gain"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show swelling (edema).A urinalysis may reveal large amounts of protein in the urine. There may also be some blood in the urine. The glomerular filtration rate (the \"speed\" at which the kidneys cleanse the blood) is usually nearly normal.Other tests may be done to see how well the kidneys are working and how the body is adapting to the kidney problem. These include:Albumin - blood and urine, Blood urea nitrogen (BUN), Creatinine - blood, Creatinine clearance, Lipid panel, Protein - blood and urine. A kidney biopsy confirms the diagnosis.The following tests can help determine the cause of membranous nephropathy:Antinuclear antibodies test, Anti-double-strand DNA, if the antinuclear antibodies test is positive, Blood tests to check for hepatitis B, hepatitis C, and syphilis, Complement levels, Cryoglobulin test. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce symptoms and slow the progression of the disease.Controlling blood pressure is the most important way to delay kidney damage. The goal is to keep blood pressure at or below 130/80 mmHg. Angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitors and angiotensin receptor blockers (ARBs) are the medicines most often used to lower blood pressure.Corticosteroids and other drugs that suppress the immune system may be used.High blood cholesterol and triglyceride levels should be treated to reduce the risk of atherosclerosis. However, a low-fat, low-cholesterol diet is usually not as helpful for people with membranous nephropathy. Medications to reduce cholesterol and triglyceride levels (most often statins) may be recommended.A low-salt diet may help with swelling in the hands and legs. Water pills or diuretics may also help with this problem.Low-protein diets may be helpful. A moderate-protein diet (1 gram of protein per kilogram of body weight per day) may be suggested.Vitamin D may need to be replaced if nephrotic syndrome is chronic and does not respond to therapy.This disease increases the risk for blood clots in the lungs and legs. Patients are occasionally prescribed blood thinners to prevent these complications.Screening\u00a0for age-appropriate malignancies is warranted, if not already done. \r\n", "Causes": "Membranous nephropathy is caused by the thickening of part of the glomerular basement membrane. The glomerular basement membrane is a part of the kidneys that helps filter waste and extra fluid from the blood. The exact reason for this thickening is not known.The thicker glomerular membrane does not work normally. Large amounts of protein are lost in the urine as a result.This condition is one of the most common causes of nephrotic syndrome. It may be a primary kidney disease, or it may be associated with other conditions.The following increase your risk for this condition:Cancers, especially lung and colon cancer, Exposure to toxins, including gold and mercury, Infections, including hepatitis B, malaria, syphilis, and endocarditis, Medicines, including penicillamine, trimethadione, and skin-lightening creams, Systemic lupus erythematosus, rheumatoid arthritis, Graves' disease, and other autoimmune disorders. The disorder occurs in about 2 out of every 10,000 people. It may occur at any age, but is more common after age 40.", "Prevention": "Quickly treating disorders and avoiding substances that can cause membranous nephropathy may reduce your risk."}, "Mineral oil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Dehydration (from severe diarrhea)", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Milia": {"description": "Milia are tiny white bumps or small cysts on the skin. They are almost always seen in newborn babies.", "Symptoms": ["Whitish, pearly bump in the skin of newborns", "Bumps that appear across the cheeks, nose, and chin", "Whitish, pearly bump on gums or roof of mouth (they may\u00a0look like teeth coming through the gums) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor can often diagnose milia just by\u00a0looking at\u00a0the skin or mouth. No testing is needed.", "Causes": "Milia occur when dead skin becomes trapped in small pockets at the surface of the skin or mouth. They are common in newborn infants.Similar cysts are seen in the mouths of newborn infants. They are called Epstein's pearls. These cysts also go away on their own.Adults may develop milia on the face. The bumps and cysts also occur on parts of the body that are swollen (inflamed) or injured. Rough sheets or clothing may irritate the skin and mild reddening around the bump. The middle of the bump will stay white.Irritated milia are sometimes called \"baby acne.\" This is incorrect since milia are not a true from of acne.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Treatment": "In children, no treatment is needed. Skin changes on the face or cysts in the mouth\u00a0often go away\u00a0after the first few weeks of life without treatment. There are no lasting effects.Adults may have milia removed to improve their appearance."}, "Methanol poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Airway and lungsBreathing difficulty, No breathing. ", "Breathing difficulty", "No breathing", "EyesBlindness, Blurred vision, Dilation of the pupils. ", "Blindness", "Blurred vision", "Dilation of the pupils", "Heart and bloodConvulsions, Low blood pressure. ", "Convulsions", "Low blood pressure", "Nervous systemAgitated behavior, Coma, Dizziness, Headache, Seizures. ", "Agitated behavior", "Coma", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Seizures", "Skin and nailsBluish-colored lips and fingernails. ", "Bluish-colored lips and fingernails", "Stomach and intestinesAbdominal pain (severe), Diarrhea, Liver function problems, Nausea, Pancreatitis, Vomiting. ", "Abdominal pain (severe)", "Diarrhea", "Liver function problems", "Nausea", "Pancreatitis", "Vomiting", "OtherFatigue, Leg cramps, Weakness. ", "Fatigue", "Leg cramps", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center."}, "Malignant otitis externa": {"description": "Malignant otitis externa is a disorder that involves infection and damage of the bones of the ear canal and at the base of the skull.", "Possible Complications": "Damage to the cranial nerves, skull, or brain, Return of infection, even after treatment, Spread of infection to the brain or other parts of the body. ", "Symptoms": ["Ongoing drainage from the ear that is yellow or green and smells bad", "Ear pain deep inside the ear. Pain may get worse when you move your head.", "Hearing loss", "Itching of the ear or ear canal", "Fever", "Trouble swallowing", "Weakness in the face", "Voice loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look into your ear for signs of an outer ear infection. The head around and behind the ear may be tender to touch. A nervous system (neurological) exam may show that the cranial nerves are affected.If there is any drainage, the doctor may send\u00a0a sample of it\u00a0to the lab. The lab will culture the sample to try to find the cause of the infection. To look for signs of a bone infection next to the ear canal, the following tests may be done:CT scan of the head, MRI scan of the head, Radionuclide scan . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection. Treatment often lasts for several months, because it is difficult to treat the bacteria and reach an infection in bone tissue.You will need to take antibiotic medicines for a long period of time. The medicines may be given through a vein (intravenously), or by mouth. Antibiotics should be continued until scans or other tests show the inflammation has gone down.Surgery to remove dead or damaged tissue (surgical debridement) in the skull may be needed in some cases. ", "Causes": "Malignant otitis externa is caused by the spread of an outer ear infection (otitis externa) also called swimmer's ear. It is not common.Risks for this condition include:Chemotherapy, Diabetes, \r\n  Weakened immune system\r\n  . External otitis is often caused by bacteria that are hard to treat, such as pseudomonas. The infection spreads from the floor of the ear canal to the nearby tissues and into the bones at the base of the skull. The infection and inflammation may damage or destroy the bones. The infection may affect the cranial nerves, brain, or other parts of the body if continues to spread.", "Prevention": "To prevent an external ear infection:\r\n  Dry the ear thoroughly after it gets wet.\r\n  , \r\n  Avoid swimming in polluted water.\r\n  , \r\n  Protect the ear canal with cotton or lamb's wool while applying hair spray or hair dye (if you are prone to getting external ear infections).\r\n  , \r\n  After swimming, place 1 or 2 drops of a mixture of 50% alcohol and 50% vinegar in each ear to help dry the ear and prevent infection.\r\n  . Treat acute otitis externa completely. Do not stop treatment sooner than your health care provider recommends. Following your doctor's plan and finishing treatment will lower your risk of malignant otitis externa."}, "Metabolic neuropathies": {"description": "Metabolic neuropathies are nerve disorders that occur with diseases that disrupt the chemical processes in the body", "Possible Complications": "Deformity, Injury to feet, Numbness, Pain, Trouble walking, Weakness. ", "Symptoms": ["\r\n Difficulty feeling in any area of the body\r\n ", "\r\n Difficulty using the arms or hands\r\n ", "\r\n Difficulty using the legs or feet\r\n ", "\r\n Difficulty walking\r\n ", "\r\n Pain, burning feeling, pins and needles feeling, or shooting pains in any area of the body (nerve pain)\r\n ", "\r\n Weakness in the face, arms, legs, or other area of the body\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam may show:Decreased feeling (may affect touch, pain, vibration, or position sensation), Reduced reflexes (most common in the ankle), Muscles becoming smaller (atrophy), Muscle twitches (fasciculations), Muscle weakness, Loss of movement (paralysis). Tests used to detect most metabolic neuropathies:Blood tests, Electrical test of the muscles (EMG), Electrical test of nerve conduction. ", "Treatment": "For most metabolic neuropathies, the best treatment is to correct the metabolic problem.Vitamin deficiencies are treated with diet or injections. Abnormal blood sugar or thyroid function may need medication to correct the problem. Alcoholic neuropathy is treated with alcohol abstinence.In some cases, pain is treated with medications that reduce abnormal pain signals from the nerves (duloxetine, gabapentin, pregabalin). Lotions, creams, or medicated patches can provide relief in some cases.Clinical trials of new medications include antioxidants, neuroprotectants, insulin-like drugs, and aldose reductase inhibitors.Weakness is often treated with physical therapy. You may need to learn how to use a cane or walker if your balance is affected. You may need special braces on the ankles to walk better.", "Causes": "Nerve damage can be caused by many different things. Metabolic neuropathy may be caused by:A problem with the body's ability to use energy, often due to a lack of enough nutrients (nutritional deficiency), Dangerous substances (toxins) that build up in the body . Diabetes is one of the most common causes of metabolic neuropathies. People who are at the highest risk of nerve damage (diabetic neuropathy) from diabetes include:Those with damage to the kidneys or eyes, Those with poorly controlled blood sugar. Other common causes of metabolic neuropathies include:Alcoholism (alcoholic neuropathy)\r\n , Low blood sugar (hypoglycemia), Kidney failure, Porphyria, Severe infection throughout the body (sepsis), Thyroid disease, Vitamin deficiencies (including vitamins B12, E, and B1). Some metabolic disorders are passed down through families (inherited), while others develop due to various diseases.", "Prevention": "Maintaining a healthy lifestyle can reduce the risk of neuropathy.Avoid excess alcohol use., Eat a balanced diet., Visit the doctor regularly to find metabolic disorders before neuropathy develops.. If you already have a metabolic problem, regular doctor visits can help control the problem and reduce the chance of further nerve damage.Patients who already have metabolic neuropathy can reduce the risk of some complications. A foot doctor (podiatrist) can teach you how to inspect your feet for signs of injury and infection. Proper fitting shoes can lessen the chance of skin breakdown in sensitive areas of the feet."}, "Marijuana intoxication": {"Symptoms": ["Decreased short-term memory", "Dry mouth", "Impaired perception and motor skills", "Red eyes", "Sudden high blood pressure with headache", "Chest pain and heart rhythm disturbances", "Extreme hyperactivity and physical violence", "Heart attack", "Seizures", "Stroke", "Sudden collapse (cardiac arrest)"], "description": "Marijuana is the most commonly used illegal drug in the United States. The drug is usually smoked, but is sometimes eaten.", "Treatment": "Treatment and care involves:Preventing injury, Reassuring those who have panic reactions due to the drug. Sedatives called\u00a0benzodiazepines, such as diazepam (Valium) or lorazepam (Ativan) may be given. Children who have more serious symptoms or those with serious side effects may need to stay in\u00a0the hospital for treatment. Treatment may include heart and brain monitoring. ."}, "Maple syrup urine disease": {"description": "Maple syrup urine disease (MSUD) is a metabolism disorder passed down through families in which the body cannot break down certain parts of proteins. Urine in persons with this condition can smell like maple syrup.", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Death, Neurological damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Avoiding food", "Coma", "Feeding difficulties", "Lethargy", "Seizures", "Urine that smells like maple syrup", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Plasma amino acid test, Urine amino acid test. There will be signs of ketosis and excess acid in blood (acidosis).", "Treatment": "When the condition is diagnosed, and during episodes, treatment involves eating a protein-free diet. Fluids, sugars, and possibly fats are given through a vein (IV). Peritoneal dialysis or hemodialysis can be used to reduce the level of abnormal substances.Long term treatment requires a special diet. The diet includes a man-made infant formula with low levels of the amino acids leucine, isoleucine, and valine. Persons with this condition must remain on this diet permanently.It is very important to always follow this diet to prevent nervous system (neurological) damage. This requires frequent blood tests and close supervision by a registered dietitian and physician, as well as cooperation by the parents.", "Causes": "Maple syrup urine disease (MSUD) is caused by a gene defect. Persons with this condition cannot break down the amino acids leucine, isoleucine, and valine. This leads to a buildup of these chemicals in the blood.In the most severe form, MSUD can damage the brain during times of physical stress (such as infection, fever, or not eating for a long time).Some types of MSUD are mild or come and go. Even in the mildest form, repeated periods of physical stress can cause intellectual disability and high levels of leucine.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is suggested for people who want to have children and who have a family history of maple syrup urine disease. Many states now screen all newborns with blood tests for MSUD.If a screening test shows that your baby may have MSUD, a follow-up blood test for amino acid levels should be done right away to confirm the disease."}, "Methamphetamine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Agitation", "Chest pain", "Heart attack", "Heart stops (in extreme cases)", "Coma (in extreme cases)", "Difficulty breathing", "Kidney damage and possibly kidney failure", "Paranoia", "Seizures", "Severe stomach pain", "Stroke", "Severe inability to sleep (insomnia)", "Major mood swings", "Delusional behavior", "Extreme paranoia", "Repeated infections", "Missing and rotted teeth (called \"meth mouth\")", "Heart attack", "Severe weight loss", "Skin sores (boils)", "Stroke"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Membranoproliferative GN": {"description": "Membranoproliferative glomerulonephritis is a kidney disorder that involves inflammation and changes to kidney cells. It may lead to kidney problems.", "Possible Complications": "Acute nephritic syndrome, Acute renal failure, Chronic kidney disease, End-stage kidney disease, Nephrotic syndrome. ", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine", "Changes in mental status such as decreased alertness or decreased concentration", "Cloudy urine", "Dark urine (smoke, cola, or tea colored)", "Decrease in urine volume", "Foamy urine\r\n ", "Swelling of any part of the body"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you.\u00a0You may have swelling (usually in the legs), along with other signs of fluid overload, such as abnormal sounds when listening to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope.Blood pressure is often high.Membranoproliferative GN may be seen as:Abnormal urinalysis without symptoms, Acute nephritic syndrome, Nephrotic syndrome. The following tests help confirm the diagnosis:BUN and creatinine blood test\r\n , Blood complement C3 level, Blood complement levels, Urinalysis, Urine protein. A kidney biopsy confirms the diagnosis of membranoproliferative GN I or II.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the symptoms. The goals of treatment are to reduce symptoms, prevent complications, and slow the progression of the disorder.You may need a change in diet. This may include limiting salt, fluids, or protein to help control high blood pressure, swelling, and the buildup of waste products in the blood.Medicines that may be prescribed include:Blood pressure medications, Dipyridamole, with or without aspirin, Diuretics, Medications to suppress the immune system, such as cyclophosphamide, Steroids. Treatment is more effective in children than in adults. Dialysis or kidney transplant may eventually be needed to manage kidney failure.", "Causes": "Glomerulonephritis is inflammation of the glomeruli. These structures of the kidney help filter wastes and fluids from the blood to form urine.Membranoproliferative GN is a form of glomerulonephritis caused by an abnormal immune response. Deposits of antibodies build up in a part of the kidneys called the glomerular basement membrane. This membrane helps filter wastes and extra fluid from the blood.Damage to this membrane affects the kidney's ability to create urine normally. It may allow blood and protein to leak into the urine. If enough protein leaks into the urine, fluid\u00a0may leak out of the blood vessels into body tissues, leading to swelling (edema). Nitrogen waste products may also build up in the blood (azotemia).There are two forms of membranoproliferative GN:Membranoproliferative GN I, Membranoproliferative GN II. Most people with the disease have type I. Membranoproliferative GN II is much less common. It also tends to get worse faster than membranoproliferative GN I.Many cases of membranoproliferative GN are due to causes such as:Autoimmune diseases (systemic lupus erythematosus, scleroderma, Sjogren syndrome, sarcoidosis), Cancer (leukemia, lymphoma), Infections (hepatitis B, hepatitis C, endocarditis, malaria). The conditions mostly affect people ages 8 to 16.", "Prevention": "Prevention is often not possible."}, "Mouth ulcers": {"description": "Mouth ulcers are sores or open lesions in the mouth.", "Possible Complications": "Cellulitis of the mouth, from secondary bacterial infection of ulcers, Dental infections (tooth abscesses), Oral cancer, Spread of contagious disorders to other people. ", "Symptoms": ["Open sores in the mouth", "Pain or discomfort in the mouth"], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, a health care provider or dentist will look the ulcer and where it is in the mouth to make the diagnosis. You may need blood tests or a biopsy of the ulcer may be needed to confirm the cause.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms.The underlying cause of the ulcer should be treated if it is known. , Gently cleaning your mouth and teeth may help relieve your symptoms., Medicines that you rub directly on the ulcer such as antihistamines, antacids, and corticosteroids may help soothe discomfort., Avoid hot or spicy foods until the ulcer is healed.. ", "Causes": "Mouth ulcers are caused by many disorders. These include:Canker sores, Gingivostomatitis, Herpes simplex (fever blister), Leukoplakia, Oral cancer, Oral lichen planus, Oral thrush. A skin sore caused by histoplasmosis may also appear as a mouth ulcer.", "Prevention": "To help prevent mouth ulcers and complications from them:Brush your teeth at least twice a day and floss once a day., Get regular dental cleanings and checkups. . "}, "Mitral valve regurgitation": {"description": "Regurgitation means leaking from a valve that does not close all the way. ", "Possible Complications": "Problems that may develop include:Abnormal heart rhythms, including atrial fibrillation and possibly more serious, or even life-threatening abnormal rhythms, Clots that may travel to other areas of the body, such as the lungs or brain, Infection of the heart valve, Heart failure\r\n\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 . ", "Symptoms": ["A heart attack damages the muscles around the mitral valve.", "The cords that attach the muscle to the valve break.", "An infection of the valve destroys part of the valve.", "Cough", "Fatigue, exhaustion, and light-headedness", "Rapid breathing", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations) or a rapid heartbeat", "Shortness of breath\u00a0that increases with\u00a0activity and when lying down", "Urination, excessive at night"], "Exams and Tests": "When listening to your heart and lungs, the health care provider may detect: A thrill (vibration) over the heart when feeling the chest area, An extra heart sound (S4 gallop), A distinctive heart murmur, Crackles in the lungs (if fluid backs up into the lungs) . The physical exam may also reveal:Ankle and leg swelling, Enlarged liver, Bulging neck veins, Other signs of right-sided heart failure . The following tests may be done to look at the heart valve structure and function:CT scan of the chest, Echocardiogram (an ultrasound examination of the heart) -\u00a0transthoracic or transesophageal, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) . Cardiac catheterization may be done if heart function becomes worse.", "Treatment": "Treatment will depend on\u00a0what symptoms you have,\u00a0what condition\u00a0caused\u00a0the mitral valve regurgitation, and how well the heart is working.People with high blood pressure or a weakened heart muscle may be given medicines to reduce the strain on the heart and ease symptoms.The following drugs may be prescribed when mitral regurgitation symptoms get worse:Beta-blockers, ACE inhibitors, or calcium channel blockers, Blood thinners (anticoagulants) to help prevent blood clots in people with atrial fibrillation, Drugs that help control uneven or abnormal heartbeats, Water pills (diuretics) to remove excess fluid in the lungs . A low-sodium diet may be helpful. You may need to limit your activity if symptoms develop.Once the diagnosis is made, you should visit your health care provider regularly to track your symptoms and heart function. You may need surgery to repair or replace the valve if:Heart function is poor, The heart becomes enlarged (dilated), Symptoms get worse. ", "Causes": "Mitral regurgitation is the most common type of heart valve disorder. Blood that flows between different chambers of your heart must flow through a valve. The valve between the two chambers on the left side of your heart is called the mitral valve.When the mitral valve doesn't close all the way, blood flows backward into the upper heart chamber (atrium) from the lower chamber as it contracts. This cuts down on the amount of blood that flows to the rest of the body. As a result, the heart may try to pump harder. This may lead to congestive heart failure.Mitral regurgitation may begin suddenly. This often occurs after a heart attack. When the regurgitation does not go away, it becomes long-term (chronic).Many other diseases or problems can weaken or damage the valve or the heart tissue around the valve. You are at risk for\u00a0mitral valve regurgitation\u00a0if you have: Coronary heart disease and high blood pressure, Infection of the heart valves, Mitral valve prolapse (MVP), Rare conditions, such as untreated syphilis or marfan syndrome, Rheumatic heart disease. This is a complication of untreated strep throat that is becoming less common., Swelling of the left lower heart chamber . Another important risk factor for tricuspid regurgitation is past use of a diet pill called \"Fen-Phen\" (fenfluramine and phentermine) or dexfenfluramine. The drug was removed from the market by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) in 1997 because of safety concerns.", "Prevention": "People with abnormal or damaged heart valves are at risk for an infection called endocarditis. Anything that causes bacteria to get into your bloodstream can lead to this infection. Steps to avoid this problem include: Avoid unclean injections., Treat strep infections quickly to prevent rheumatic fever., Always tell your health care provider and dentist if you have a history of heart valve disease or congenital heart disease before treatment. Some people may need antibiotics before dental procedures or surgery. . "}, "Muscular dystrophy": {"description": "Muscular dystrophy is a group of inherited disorders that cause muscle weakness and loss of muscle tissue, which get worse over time.", "Symptoms": ["Delayed development of muscle motor skills", "Difficulty using one or more muscle groups", "Drooling", "Eyelid drooping (ptosis) ", "Frequent falls", "Loss of strength in a muscle or group of muscles as an adult", "Loss in muscle size", "Problems walking (delayed walking)"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination and your medical history will help the doctor determine the type of muscular dystrophy. Specific muscle groups are affected by different types of muscular dystrophy.The doctor's exam may show:\r\n  Abnormally curved spine (scoliosis)\r\n  , \r\n  Joint contractures (clubfoot, clawhand, or others)\r\n  , \r\n  Low muscle tone (hypotonia)\r\n  . Some types of muscular dystrophy involve the heart muscle, causing cardiomyopathy or\u00a0abnormal heart rhythm (arrhythmias).Often, there is a loss of muscle mass (wasting). This may be hard to see because some types of muscular dystrophy cause a buildup of fat and connective tissue that makes the muscle appear larger. This is called pseudohypertrophy.A muscle biopsy may be used to confirm the diagnosis. In some cases, a DNA blood test may be all that is needed.Other tests may include:\r\n  Heart testing - electrocardiography (ECG)\r\n  , \r\n  Nerve testing - nerve conduction and electromyography (EMG)\r\n  , \r\n  Urine and blood testing - including CPK level\r\n  , \r\n  Genetic testing for some forms of muscular dystrophy\r\n  . ", "Causes": "Muscular dystrophies, or MD, are a group of inherited conditions. This means they are passed down through families. They may occur in childhood or adulthood. There are many different types of muscular dystrophy. They include:Becker muscular dystrophy, Duchenne muscular dystrophy, Emery-Dreifuss muscular dystrophy, Facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy, Limb-girdle muscular dystrophy, Oculopharyngeal muscular dystrophy . ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is advised when there is a family history of muscular dystrophy. Women may have no symptoms, but still carry the gene for the disorder. Duchenne muscular dystrophy can be detected with about 95% accuracy by genetic studies done during pregnancy.", "Treatment": "There are no known cures for the various muscular dystrophies. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms.Physical therapy may help maintain muscle strength and function. Leg braces and a wheelchair can improve mobility and self-care. In some cases, surgery on the spine or legs may help improve function.Corticosteroids taken by mouth are sometimes prescribed to children with certain muscular dystrophies to keep them walking for as long as possible.The person should be as active as possible. No activity at all (such as bedrest) can make the disease worse."}, "Mongolian blue spots": {"Symptoms": ["Blue or blue-gray spots on the back, buttocks, base of spine, shoulders, or other body areas", "Flat with irregular shape and unclear edges", "Normal in skin texture", "2\u00a0to 8 centimeters wide"], "Exams and Tests": "No tests are needed. The health care provider can diagnose this condition by looking at the skin.", "description": "Mongolian spots are flat, blue, or blue-gray skin markings near the buttocks that appear at birth or shortly thereafter.", "Causes": "Mongolian blue spots are common among\u00a0persons who are of Asian, East Indian, and African descent.", "Treatment": "No treatment is necessary or recommended. "}, "M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease": {"description": "M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease is an inner ear disorder that affects balance and hearing.", "Symptoms": ["Hearing loss that changes", "Pressure in the ear", "Ringing or roaring in the affected ear, called tinnitus", "Vertigo, or dizziness ", "Nausea, vomiting, and sweating often occur.", "Symptoms get worse with sudden movement.", "Often, you will need to lie down.", "You may feel dizzy and off-balance for anywhere from 20 minutes to 24 hours. ", "Hearing tends to improve between attacks but gets worse over time.", "Low frequency hearing is lost first.", "You also may have roaring or ringing in the ear (tinnitus), along with a sense of pressure in your ear ", "Diarrhea", "Headaches", "Pain or discomfort in the abdomen", "Nausea and vomiting", "Uncontrollable eye movements"], "Exams and Tests": "A brain and nervous system exam may show problems with hearing, balance, or eye movement.A hearing test will show the hearing loss that occurs with M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's. Hearing may be near normal after an attack.A caloric stimulation test checks your eye reflexes by warming and cooling the inner ear with water. Test results that are not in the normal range can be a sign of M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease.These tests may also be done to check for other causes of vertigo:Electrocochleography (ECOG), Electronystagmography (ENG) or videonystagmography (VNG), Head MRI scan. ", "Causes": "Your inner ear contains fluid-filled tubes called labyrinths. These tubes, along with a nerve in your skull, help you know the position of your body and help maintain your balance.The exact cause of\u00a0M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease is unknown. It may occur when the pressure of the fluid in part of the inner ear gets too high.In some cases,\u00a0M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease\u00a0may be related to:Head injury, Middle or inner ear infection. Other risk factors include:Alcohol use, Allergies, Family history, Recent cold or viral illness, Smoking, Stress, Use of certain medications. Meniere's disease is a fairly common disorder.", "Prevention": "You can't prevent M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease. Treating early symptoms right away may help prevent the condition from getting worse. Treating an ear infection and other related disorders may be helpful.", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease. However, lifestyle changes and some treatments can help relieve symptoms.Your doctor may suggest ways to reduce the amount of fluid in your body. This can often help control symptoms.Water pills (diuretics) may help relieve fluid pressure in the inner ear, A low-salt diet may also help . To help ease symptoms and stay safe:Avoid sudden movements, which may worsen symptoms. You may need help walking during attacks., Avoid bright lights, TV, and reading during attacks. They can make symptoms worse., Do not drive, operate heavy machinery, or climb until 1 week after your symptoms disappear. A sudden dizzy spell during these activities can be dangerous., Remain still and rest when you have symptoms., Gradually increase your activity after attacks. . Symptoms of\u00a0M\u00e9ni\u00e8re's disease\u00a0can cause stress. Make healthy lifestyle choices to help you cope:Eat a well-balanced, healthy diet. Don't overeat., Exercise regularly, if possible., Get enough sleep., Limit caffeine and alcohol. . Help ease stress by using relaxation techniques, such as:Guided imagery, Meditation, Progressive muscle relaxation, Tai chi, Yoga . Your health care provider may prescribe:Antinausea medicines to relieve nausea and vomiting, Diazepam (Valium) or motion sickness medicines, such as meclizine (Antivert, Bonine, Dramamine) to relieve dizziness and vertigo . You may need ear surgery if your symptoms are severe and do not respond to other treatments.Surgery to cut the vestibular nerve helps control vertigo. It does not damage hearing., Injecting steroids or an antibiotic called gentamicin directly into the middle ear can help control vertigo., Removing part of the inner ear (labyrinthectomy) helps treat vertigo. This causes complete hearing loss. . Hearing aids may be needed for severe hearing loss."}, "Minimal change disease": {"description": "Minimal change disease is a kidney disorder that can lead to nephrotic syndrome, although the nephrons of the kidney look normal under a regular microscope.", "Possible Complications": "Nephrotic syndrome, Side effects of medications . ", "Symptoms": ["Foamy appearance of the urine", "Poor appetite", "Swelling (especially around the eyes, feet, and ankles, and in the abdomen)", "Weight gain (from fluid retention)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may not be able to see any signs of the disease, other than swelling. Blood and urine tests reveal signs of nephrotic syndrome, including:High cholesterol, High levels of protein in the urine, Low levels of albumin in the blood. A kidney biopsy and examination of the tissue with an electron microscope can show signs of minimal change disease. An immunofluorescence exam of the biopsied kidney tissue will be negative.", "Treatment": "Corticosteroids can cure minimal change disease in most children. Some patients may need to stay on steroids to keep the disease in remission.Adults do not respond to steroids as well as children, but many still find steroids effective. Adults may have more frequent relapses and become dependent on steroids.Patients who have three or more relapses may do better with cytotoxic therapy instead of steroids. In most cases, this involves a medication called cyclophosphamide. Other medicines that have been used include cyclosporine and chlorambucil.Swelling may be treated with:ACE inhibitor medicines, Blood pressure control, Diuretics (water pills). You may also be told to reduce the amount of salt in your diet.", "Causes": "Each kidney is made of more than a million units called nephrons, which filter blood and produce urine.In minimal change disease, there is damage to the glomeruli -- the tiny blood vessels inside the nephron where blood is filtered to make urine and waste is removed. The disease gets its name because this damage is not visible under a regular microscope. It can only be seen under an electron microscope.Minimal change disease is the most common cause of nephrotic syndrome in children. It causes about 80% of cases in young children. It is also seen in adults, but makes up only 10 to 15% of nephrotic syndrome cases.The cause is unknown, but the disease may occur after or be related to:Allergic reactions, NSAID use, Tumors, Vaccinations, Viral infections. ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention."}, "Mildew remover poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Abdominal pain -- severe", "Bloody stools", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting, possibly with blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly", "Severe change in blood acid levels -- leads to organ damage", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Stupor", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Morton neuroma": {"description": "Morton neuroma is an injury to the nerve between the toes, which causes thickening and pain. It commonly affects the nerve that travels between the third and fourth toes.", "Possible Complications": "Morton neuroma can make walking difficult. Persons with this foot condition may also have trouble with activities that put pressure on the foot, such as pressing the gas pedal while driving. It may hurt to wear certain types of shoes, such as high-heels.", "Symptoms": ["Tingling in the space between the third and fourth toes", "Toe cramping", "Sharp, shooting, or burning pain in the ball of the foot and sometimes toes", "Pain that increases when wearing shoes or pressing on the area", "Pain that gets worse over time "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose this problem by examining your foot. A foot x-ray may be done to rule out bone problems. MRI or ultrasound can successfully diagnose the condition.Nerve testing (electromyography) cannot diagnose Morton neuroma. But it may be used to rule out conditions that cause similar symptoms.Blood tests may be done to check for inflammation-related conditions, including certain forms of arthritis.", "Treatment": "Nonsurgical treatment is tried first. Your doctor may recommend any of the following:Padding and taping the toe area, Shoe inserts, Changes to footwear, for example wearing shoes with wider toe boxes or flat heels, Anti-inflammatory medicines taken by mouth or injected into the toe area, Nerve blocking medicines injected into the toe area, Other painkillers, Physical therapy . Anti-inflammatories and painkillers are not recommended for long-term treatment.In some cases, surgery is needed to remove the thickened tissue and inflammed nerve. This helps relieve pain and improve foot function. Numbness after surgery is permanent.", "Causes": "The exact cause is unknown. Doctors believe the following may play a role in the development of this condition:Wearing tight shoes and high heels, Abnormal positioning of toes, Flat feet, Forefoot problems, including bunions and hammer toes, High foot arches. Morton neuroma is more common in women than in men.", "Prevention": "Avoid ill-fitting shoes. Wear shoes with a wide toe box or flat heels."}, "Mathematics disorder": {"description": "Mathematics disorder is a condition in which a child's math ability is far below normal for their age, intelligence, and education.", "Possible Complications": "The child may have problems in school, including behavior problems and loss of self-esteem. Some children with mathematics disorder become anxious or afraid when given math problems, making the problem even worse.", "Symptoms": ["Trouble with reading, writing, and copying numbers", "Problems counting and adding numbers, often making simple mistakes", "Difficulty telling the difference between adding and subtracting", "Problems understanding math symbols and word problems", "Inability to\u00a0line up numbers properly to add, subtract, or multiply", "Inability to arrange numbers from smallest to largest, or the opposite", "Inability\u00a0to understand graphs "], "Exams and Tests": "Standardized tests can assess the child's math ability. Grades and class performance can also help.", "Treatment": "The best treatment is remedial education. Other programs that have been successful include Project Math and computer skills.", "Causes": "Children who have mathematics disorder have trouble\u00a0with simple mathematical equations, such as counting and adding.Mathematical disorder may appear with:Developmental coordination disorder, Developmental reading disorder, Mixed receptive-expressive language disorder. ", "Prevention": "Recognizing the problem early is important.\u00a0Treatment may begin as early as kindergarten or elementary school."}, "Mumps": {"description": "Mumps is a contagious disease that leads to painful swelling of the salivary glands. The salivary glands produce saliva, a liquid that moistens food and helps you chew and swallow.", "Possible Complications": "Infection of other organs may occur, including orchitis.", "Symptoms": ["Face pain", "Fever", "Headache", "Sore throat", "Swelling of the parotid glands (the largest salivary glands, located between the ear and the jaw)", "Swelling of the temples or jaw (temporomandibular area)", "Testicle lump", "Testicle pain", "Scrotal swelling"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam shows swollen glands. No testing is required in most cases.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for mumps. Things you can do to relieve symptoms include:Apply ice or heat packs to the neck area., Take acetaminophen (Tylenol) to relieve pain. (Do not give aspirin to children with a viral illness because of the risk\u00a0for Reye syndrome.), Drink extra fluid., Eat soft foods., Gargle with warm salt water. . ", "Causes": "The mumps are caused by a virus. The virus is spread from person to person by drops of moisture from your respiratory tract, such as when you sneeze. It is also spread through direct contact with items that have infected saliva on them.Mumps most often occurs in children ages 2 - 12 who have not been vaccinated against the disease. However, the infection can occur at any age. The time between being exposed to the virus and getting sick (incubation period) is about 12 - 24 days.Mumps may also infect the:Central nervous system, Pancreas, Testes. ", "Prevention": "MMR immunization (vaccine) protects against measles, mumps, and rubella. It should be given to children 12 - 15 months old. The vaccine is given again between ages 4 - 6, or between ages 11 - 12, if it wasn't given before.Recent outbreaks of the mumps have reinforced the importance of having all children vaccinated."}, "Malignant hyperthermia": {"description": "This condition is not the same as hyperthermia that is due to medical emergencies such as heat stroke or infection.", "Possible Complications": "Amputation, Breakdown of muscle tissue (rhabdomyolysis), Compartment syndrome (swelling of the hands and feet and problems with blood flow and nerve function), Death, Disseminating intravascular coagulation (abnormal blood clotting and bleeding), Heart rhythm problems, Kidney failure, Metabolic acidosis, Respiratory dysfunction (fluid buildup in the lungs), Weak muscles (myopathy) or muscular dystrophy (deformity). ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding", "Dark brown urine", "Muscle ache without an obvious cause, such as exercise or injury", "Muscle rigidity and stiffness", "Quick rise in body temperature to 105 degrees F or higher"], "Exams and Tests": "Malignant hyperthermia is often discovered after a patient is given anesthesia during surgery.There may be a family history of malignant hyperthermia or unexplained death during anesthesia.The person may have a fast and often irregular heart rate.Tests that may be done include:Blood clotting studies (PT, or prothombin time; PTT, or partial thrombloplastin time)\u00a0\r\n , Chem-20, including CPK (creatinine phosphokinase, a muscle protein destroyed during the acute illness)\r\n , Genetic testing to look for defects in the RYR1 gene, Muscle biopsy, Urine myoglobin (muscle protein) determination. ", "Treatment": "During an episode of malignant hyperthermia, wrapping the patient in a cooling blanket can help reduce fever and the risk of serious complications. Drugs such as dantrolene, lidocaine, or a beta-blocker drug can help with heart rhythm problems.To preserve kidney function during an episode, you must get fluids through a vein and by mouth, as well as certain medications.", "Causes": "Malignant hyperthermia is inherited. Only one parent has to carry the disease for a child to inherit the condition.It may occur with muscle diseases such as multiminicore myopathy and central core disease (autosomal dominant).", "Prevention": "If you or anyone in your family has malignant hyperthermia it is very important to tell your doctor, especially before having surgery with general anesthesia. Using certain medications can prevent the complications of malignant hyperthermia during surgery.Avoid stimulant drugs such as cocaine, amphetamine (speed), and ecstasy. These drugs may cause problems similar to malignant hyperthermia in people who are prone to this condition.Genetic counseling is recommended for anyone with a family history of myopathy, muscular dystrophy, or malignant hyperthermia."}, "Menkes syndrome": {"description": "Menkes syndrome is an inborn error of metabolism in which cells in the body can absorb copper, but are unable to release it.", "Possible Complications": "Seizures, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone spurs", "Brittle, kinky hair", "Feeding difficulties", "Irritability", "Lack of muscle tone, floppiness (hypotonia)", "Low body temperature", "Mental deterioration", "Pudgy, rosy cheeks", "Seizures", "Skeletal changes"], "Exams and Tests": "There is often a history of Menkes syndrome in a male relative.Signs include:Abnormal appearance of the hair under the microscope, Abnormally low body temperature, Bleeding in the brain, Slow growth in the womb. In males, all of the hairs will be abnormal. In females who carry this trait, only half of the hairs may be abnormal.Tests may include:Serum ceruloplasmin, Serum copper level, Skin cell (fibroblast) culture, X-ray of the skeleton or x-ray of the skull. Genetic testing may show a change (mutation) in the ATP7A gene.", "Treatment": "Treatment usually only helps when started very early in the course of the disease. Injections of copper into a vein or under the skin have been used with mixed results.", "Causes": "\r\n\r\nMenkes syndrome is caused by a defect in the ATP7A gene. The defect makes it hard for the body to distribute copper in food from the intestines into the bloodstream for use in other areas. As a result, the brain and other parts of the body do not get enough copper.Copper can build up in the small intestine and kidneys, but low copper levels in other areas can affect the structure of bone, skin, hair, and blood vessels, and interfere with nerve function. Menkes syndrome is inherited, which means it runs in families.\u00a0The gene is on the X-chromosome, so if a mother carries the defective gene, each of her sons has a 50% chance of developing the disease and 50% of her daughters will be a carrier.", "Prevention": "See a genetic counselor if you want to have children and you have a family history of Menkes syndrome. Maternal relatives of a boy with this syndrome should be seen by a geneticist to find out if they are carriers."}, "Mononeuropathy": {"description": "Mononeuropathy is damage to a single nerve, which results in loss of movement, sensation, or other function of that nerve.", "Possible Complications": "Deformity, loss of tissue mass, Medication side effects, Repeated or unnoticed injury to the affected area due to lack of sensation. ", "Symptoms": ["Loss of sensation", "Paralysis", "Tingling, burning, pain, abnormal sensations", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "A detailed medical history is needed to determine the possible cause of the disorder. An examination and nerve and muscle testing may show a loss of feeling, movement, or other problems with a specific nerve. Reflexes may be abnormal.Tests may include:Electromyogram (EMG) -- a recording of electrical activity in muscles, Nerve conduction tests (NCV) -- recording the speed of electrical activity in the nerves, Nerve ultrasound, MRI . Other tests may include:Antinuclear antibody panel (ANA), Blood chemistry tests, C-reactive protein, Imaging scans, such as MRI or CT scan, Rheumatoid factor, Sedimentation rate, Thyroid tests, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to allow you to use the affected body part as much as possible.Some medical conditions, such as diabetes, make nerves more prone to injury. Controlling the medical problems may prevent further nerve injury. High blood pressure and diabetes can injure an artery, which can often affect a single nerve. The underlying condition should be treated.Corticosteroids injected into the area may reduce swelling and pressure on the nerve if it is being pinched or trapped against another part of the body, such as a bone. Surgery may be recommended if symptoms are caused by entrapment of the nerve. Surgery to relieve the pressure on the nerve may help in some cases.Medications:Over-the-counter or prescription pain medicine may be needed to control pain (neuralgia)., Prescription medications such as gabapentin, pregabalin, phenytoin, carbamazepine, or antidepressants such as amitriptyline, nortriptyline, or duloxetine may be used to reduce stabbing pains. Whenever possible, avoid or minimize the use of these drugs to reduce the risk of medication side effects.. Other Treatments:Physical therapy exercises to maintain muscle strength, Orthopedic braces, splints, or other appliances, Vocational counseling, occupational therapy, occupational changes, job retraining. ", "Causes": "Mononeuropathy is a type of damage to a nerve outside the brain and spinal cord (peripheral neuropathy).Mononeuropathy is most often caused by injury, although body-wide (systemic) disorders may cause isolated nerve damage.Long-term pressure on a nerve due to swelling or injury can result in mononeuropathy. The covering of the nerve (myelin sheath) or part of the nerve cell (the axon) may be damaged. This damage slows or prevents signals from traveling through the damaged nerves.Mononeuropathy may involve any part of the body. Some of the common forms of mononeuropathy include:Axillary nerve dysfunction, Common peroneal nerve dysfunction, Carpal tunnel syndrome (median nerve dysfunction) , Cranial mononeuropathy III; compression type, Cranial mononeuropathy III; diabetic type, Cranial mononeuropathy VI, Cranial mononeuropathy VII (facial paralysis), Femoral nerve dysfunction, Radial nerve dysfunction, Sciatic nerve dysfunction, Ulnar nerve dysfunction (cubital tunnel syndrome) . ", "Prevention": "Avoiding pressure or traumatic injury may prevent many forms of mononeuropathy. Treating conditions such as high blood pressure or diabetes also decreases your risk of developing the condition."}, "Meningitis": {"description": "Meningitis is a bacterial infection of the membranes covering the brain and spinal cord (meninges).", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Buildup of fluid between the skull and brain (subdural effusion), Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck (meningismus)", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in babies\r\n ", "Decreased\u00a0alertness", "Poor feeding or irritability in children", "Rapid breathing", "Unusual posture, with the head and neck arched backwards (opisthotonos)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. This\u00a0may show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. If the health care provider thinks you have meningitis, a lumbar puncture (spinal tap) should be done to remove a sample of spinal fluid (cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF) for testing.Other tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the head \r\n\u00a0\u00a0 \r\n . ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to treat bacterial meningitis. The specific type depends on which\u00a0bacteria is causing the infection. Antibiotics do not treat viral meningitis. Antiviral medicine may be given to those with herpes meningitis.Other treatments\u00a0will include:Fluids through a vein (IV), Medicines\u00a0to treat symptoms such as brain swelling, shock, and seizures. ", "Causes": "The most common causes of meningitis are viral infections that usually get better without treatment. However, bacterial meningitis infections are extremely serious, and may result in death or brain damage, even if treated.Meningitis may also be caused by:Chemical irritation, Drug allergies, Fungi, Parasites, Tumors. Most viral meningitis is due to enteroviruses, which are viruses that also can cause intestinal illness.Many other types of viruses can cause meningitis.\u00a0Viral meningitis can be caused by herpes viruses, the same virus that can cause cold sores and genital herpes . However, people with cold sores or genital herpes are not at a greater risk of developing herpes meningitis., Viruses that cause mumps and HIV can cause aseptic meningitis. , Recently, West Nile virus, spread by mosquito bites, has become a cause of viral meningitis in most of the United States.. ", "Prevention": "\r\nCertain vaccines can help prevent some types of meningitis. Haemophilus vaccine (HiB vaccine) in children helps prevent\u00a0one type of bacterial\u00a0meningitis., The pneumococcal conjugate vaccine is now a routine childhood immunization. It\u00a0is very effective at preventing pneumococcal meningitis.. Household members and others in close contact with people who have meningococcal meningitis should receive antibiotics to prevent becoming infected.The meningococcal vaccination is recommended for:Adolescents ages 11 - 12 and adolescents entering high school (about age 15) who have not already received the vaccination. A booster shot is given between age 16-18., All college freshmen who have not been vaccinated and are living in dorms. , Children age 2 and older who do not have their spleen or who have other problems with their immune system., Those traveling to countries where diseases caused by meningococcus are very common (ask your doctor).. Some communities hold vaccination campaigns after an outbreak of meningococcal meningitis."}, "Malaria": {"description": "Malaria is a parasitic disease that involves high fevers, shaking chills, flu-like symptoms, and anemia.", "Possible Complications": "Brain infection (cerebritis), Destruction of blood cells (hemolytic anemia), Kidney failure, Liver failure, Meningitis, Respiratory failure from fluid in the lungs (pulmonary edema), Rupture of the spleen leading to massive internal bleeding (hemorrhage). ", "Symptoms": ["Anemia", "Bloody stools", "Chills", "Coma", "Convulsion", "Fever", "Headache", "Jaundice", "Muscle pain", "Nausea", "Sweating", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical examination, the doctor may find an enlarged liver or enlarged spleen. Malaria blood smears taken at 6 to 12 hour intervals confirm the diagnosis.A complete blood count (CBC) will identify anemia if it is present.", "Treatment": "Malaria, especially falciparum malaria, is a medical emergency that requires a hospital stay. Chloroquine is often used as an anti-malarial medication. But chloroquine-resistant infections are common in some parts of the world.Possible treatments for chloroquine-resistant infections include:Artemisinin derivative combinations, including artemether and lumefantrine , Atovaquone-proguanil , Quinine-based regimen, in combination with doxycycline or clindamycin) , Mefloquine, in combination with artesunate or doxycycline. Choice of medication depends in part on where you were when you were infected.Medical care, including fluids through a vein (IV) and other medications and breathing (respiratory) support may be needed.", "Causes": "Malaria is caused by a parasite that is passed from one human to another by the bite of infected Anopheles mosquitoes. After infection, the parasites (called sporozoites) travel through the bloodstream to the liver, where they mature and release another form, the merozoites. The parasites enter the bloodstream and infect red blood cells.The parasites multiply inside the red blood cells, which then break open within 48 to 72 hours, infecting more red blood cells. The first symptoms usually occur 10 days to 4 weeks after infection, though they can appear as early as 8 days or as long as a year after infection. The symptoms occur in cycles of 48 to 72 hours.Most symptoms are caused by:The release of merozoites into the bloodstream, Anemia resulting from the destruction of the red blood cells, Large amounts of free hemoglobin being released into circulation after red blood cells break open. Malaria can also be transmitted from a mother to her unborn baby (congenitally) and by blood transfusions. Malaria can be carried by mosquitoes in temperate climates, but the parasite disappears over the winter.The disease is a major health problem in much of the tropics and subtropics. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention\u00a0estimates that there are 300 to 500 million cases of malaria each year, and more than 1 million people die\u00a0of it. Malaria is a major disease hazard for travelers to warm climates.In some areas of the world, mosquitoes that carry malaria have developed resistance to insecticides. In addition, the parasites have developed resistance to some antibiotics. These conditions have led to difficulty in controlling both the rate of infection and spread of this disease.", "Prevention": "Most people who live in areas where malaria is common have\u00a0developed \u00a0some immunity to the disease. Visitors will not have immunity and should take preventive medications.It is important to see your health care provider well before your trip, because treatment may need to begin as long as 2 weeks before travel to the area, and continue for a month after you leave the area. Most travelers from the U.S. who contract malaria fail to take the right precautions.The types of anti-malarial medications prescribed will depend on the area you visit. Travelers to South America, Africa, the Indian subcontinent, Asia, and the South Pacific should take one of the following drugs: mefloquine, doxycycline, chloroquine, hydroxychloroquine or atovaquone-proguanil. Even pregnant women should\u00a0consider taking\u00a0preventive medications because the risk to the fetus from the medication is less than the risk of catching this infection.Chloroquine has been the drug of choice for protecting against malaria. But because of resistance, it is now only suggested for use in areas where Plasmodium vivax, P. oval, and P. malariae are present. Falciparum malaria is becoming increasingly resistant to anti-malarial medications\r\n\u00a0Recommended medications\u00a0include mefloquine, atovaquone/proguanil (Malarone), and doxycycline.Prevent mosquito bites by wearing protective clothing over the arms and legs, using mosquito netting while sleeping, and using insect repellent.For information on malaria\u00a0and preventive medications, visit the CDC website:\u00a0www.cdc.gov/malaria/travelers/index.html."}, "Mononucleosis": {"description": "Mononucleosis, or mono, is a viral infection that causes fever, sore throat, and swollen lymph glands, most often in the neck.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of mononucleosis may include:Anemia, which occurs when red blood cells in the blood are destroyed earlier than normal, Hepatitis with jaundice (more common in patients older than 35), Swollen or inflamed testicles, Nervous system problems (rare), such as Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome, meningitis, seizures, damage to the nerve that controls movement of the muscles in the face (Bell's palsy), and uncoordinated movements (ataxia), Spleen rupture (rare; avoid pressure on the spleen), Skin rash (uncommon) . Death is possible in people who have a weakened immune system. ", "Symptoms": ["Drowsiness", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling", "Loss of appetite", "Muscle aches or stiffness", "Rash", "Sore throat", "Swollen lymph nodes, most often in the neck and armpit ", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Hives", "Jaundice (yellow color to the skin and whites of the eyes)", "Neck stiffness", "Nosebleed", "Rapid heart rate", "Sensitivity to light", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. The exam may find: Swollen lymph nodes in the front and back of your neck, Swollen tonsils with a whitish-yellow covering, Swollen liver or spleen, Skin rash . Blood tests will be done, including: White blood cell (WBC) count - will be higher than normal, Monospot test - will be positive for infectious mononucleosis, Antibody titer - tells the difference between a current and past infection . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve symptoms. Steroid medicine (prednisone) may be given if symptoms are severe. Antiviral drugs, such as acyclovir, have little or no benefit.To relieve typical symptoms:Drink plenty of fluids., Gargle with warm salt water to ease a sore throat., Get plenty of rest., Take acetaminophen or ibuprofen for pain and fever. . You should also avoid contact sports if your spleen is swollen (to prevent it from rupturing).", "Causes": "Mono is often spread by saliva and close contact. It is known as \"the kissing disease.\"\u00a0Mono occurs most often in\u00a0people ages 15 to 17, but the infection may develop at any age.Mono is usually linked to the Epstein-Barr virus (EBV). Rarely, it is caused by other viruses, such as cytomegalovirus (CMV).", "Prevention": "People with mono may be contagious while they have symptoms and for up to a few months afterwards. How long someone with the disease is contagious varies. The virus can live for several hours outside the body. Avoid kissing or sharing utensils if you or someone close to you has mono."}, "Mallory-Weiss tear": {"description": "A Mallory-Weiss tear occurs in the mucus membrane of the lower part of the esophagus or upper part of the stomach, near where they join. The tear may bleed.", "Possible Complications": "Hemorrhage (loss of blood)", "Symptoms": ["Bloody stools", "Vomiting blood (bright red) "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:CBC, possibly showing low hematocrit, Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD), more likely to be done when there is active bleeding . ", "Treatment": "The tear usually heals in a few days without treatment. The tear may also be fixed by clips that are put in during an EGD. Surgery is rarely needed. Drugs that suppress stomach acid (proton pump inhibitors or H2 blockers) may be given, but it is not clear if they are helpful.If blood loss has been great, blood transfusions may be needed. In most cases, bleeding stops without treatment within a few hours.", "Causes": "Mallory-Weiss tears are most often caused by forceful or long-term vomiting or coughing. They may also be caused by epileptic convulsions.Any condition that leads to violent and lengthy bouts of coughing or vomiting can cause these tears.", "Prevention": "Treatments to relieve vomiting and coughing may reduce risk. Avoid excessive alcohol use."}, "Medullary cystic kidney disease": {"description": "Medullary cystic kidney disease (MCKD) is an inherited condition in which cysts in the center of each kidney cause the kidneys to gradually lose their ability to work.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia, Bone weakening and fractures, Cardiac tamponade, Changes in glucose metabolism, Congestive heart failure, End-stage kidney disease, Gastrointestinal bleeding, ulcers, Hemorrhage (excessive bleeding), High blood pressure, Hyponatremia (low blood sodium level), Hyperkalemia (too much potassium in the blood), especially with end-stage kidney disease, Hypokalemia (too little potassium in the blood), Infertility, Menstrual problems, Miscarriage, Pericarditis, Peripheral neuropathy, Platelet dysfunction with easy bruising, Skin color changes. ", "Symptoms": ["Excessive urination (polyuria)", "Salt cravings", "Urination at night (nocturia)", "Weakness", "Coma", "Confusion", "Decreased alertness", "Easy bruising or bleeding", "Fatigue", "Frequent hiccups", "Headache", "Increased skin color (skin may appear yellow or brown)", "Itching", "Malaise (general ill feeling)", "Muscle twitching or cramps", "Nausea", "Pale skin", "Reduced sensation in the hands, feet, or other areas", "Seizures", "Vomiting blood or blood in the stool", "Weight loss", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood pressure may be low. The skin may be:Abnormally colored, Dry, Easy to bruise, Pale. Tests that may be done include:24-hour urine volume and electrolytes, Blood urea nitrogen (BUN), Complete blood count (CBC), Creatinine - blood, Creatinine clearance - blood and urine, Uric acid - blood, Urine specific gravity (will be low). The following tests can help diagnose this condition:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Kidney biopsy, Kidney ultrasound. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for this disease. At first, treatment focuses on controlling symptoms, reducing complications, and slowing the progression of the disease. Because so much water and salt are lost, you will need to drink plenty of fluids and take salt supplements to avoid dehydration.As the disease gets worse, kidney failure develops. Treatment may involve medications and diet changes, limiting foods containing phosphorus and potassium. You may need dialysis and a kidney transplant.For detailed information on treatment, see:Chronic kidney failure, End-stage kidney disease. ", "Causes": "Medullary cystic kidney disease (MCKD) is very similar to the childhood disease familial juvenile nephronophthisis (NPH). Both lead to scarring of the kidney and fluid-filled cavities (cysts) in the deeper parts of the kidney.In these conditions, the kidneys do not concentrate the urine enough. This leads to too much urine production and the loss of sodium and other important chemicals from the blood.MCKD occurs in older patients. NPH is found in young children. Both conditions are inherited.NPH may occur with eye or nervous system problems. MCKD is limited to the kidneys.", "Prevention": "Medullary cystic kidney disease is an inherited disorder. It may not be preventable."}, "Mercuric oxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain (severe)", "Bloody diarrhea", "Decreased urine output (may stop completely)", "Drooling", "Extreme difficulty breathing", "Metallic taste in the mouth", "Mouth sores", "Throat swelling (swelling may cause throat to close) ", "Shock", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Mediastinitis": {"description": "Mediastinitis is swelling and irritation (inflammation) of the chest area between the lungs (mediastinum). This area contains the heart, large blood vessels, windpipe (trachea), food tube\u00a0(esophagus), thymus gland, lymph nodes, and connective tissues.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include the following:Spread of the infection to the bloodstream, blood vessels, bones, heart, or lungs, Scarring. Scarring can be severe, especially when it is caused by chronic mediastinitis. Scarring can interfere with heart or lung function.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Chills", "Fever", "General discomfort", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Some signs of mediastinitis in patients who have had recent surgery include:Chest wall tenderness, Wound drainage, Unstable chest wall. Tests include:Chest CT scan or MRI scan, Chest x-ray, Ultrasound. Your health care provider may insert a needle into the area of inflammation and remove a sample to send for gram stain and culture to determine the type of infection.", "Treatment": "You may receive antibiotics if you have an infection.You may need surgery to remove the area of inflammation if the blood vessels, windpipe, or esophagus is blocked.", "Causes": "Mediastinitis usually results from an infection. It may occur suddenly (acute), or it\u00a0may develop slowly and get worse over time (chronic). It most often occurs in patients who recently had an upper endoscopy or chest surgery.Patients may have a tear in their esophagus that causes mediastinitis. Causes of the tear include:A procedure such as endoscopy, Forceful or constant vomiting, Trauma. Other causes of mediastinitis include:Histoplasmosis, Radiation, Sarcoidosis, Tuberculosis, Breathing in anthrax, Cancer. Risk factors include:Disease of the esophagus, Diabetes mellitus, Problems in the upper gastrointestinal tract, Recent chest surgery or endoscopy, Weakened immune system. ", "Prevention": "The only way to prevent this condition related to chest surgery is to keep surgical wounds clean and dry after surgery.Treating tuberculosis, sarcoidosis, or other conditions associated with mediastinitis may prevent this complication."}, "Menopause": {"description": "Menopause is the time in a woman's life when her periods (menstruation) stop. It is a natural, normal body change that most often occurs between ages 45 - 55. After menopause, a woman can no longer become pregnant.", "Possible Complications": "Some women have vaginal bleeding after menopause. This is often nothing to worry about. However, you should tell your health care provider if this occurs. It may be an early sign of other health problems, including cancer.Decreased estrogen levels have been linked with some long-term effects, including:Bone loss and osteoporosis in some women, Changes in cholesterol levels and greater risk of heart disease. ", "Symptoms": ["Menstrual periods that occur less often and eventually stop", "Heart pounding or racing", "Hot flashes, usually worst during the first 1 - 2 years", "Night sweats", "Skin flushing", "Sleeping problems (insomnia) ", "Decreased interest in sex or changes in sexual response", "Forgetfulness (in some women)", "Headaches", "Mood swings --\u00a0including irritability, depression, and anxiety", "Urine leakage", "Vaginal dryness and painful sexual intercourse", "Vaginal infections", "Joint aches and pains", "Irregular heartbeat (palpitations) "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood and urine tests can be used to look for changes in hormone levels. Test results can help your doctor determine if you are close to menopause or if you have already gone through menopause.Tests that may be done include:Estradiol, FSH, LH. Your health care provider will perform a pelvic exam. Decreased estrogen can cause changes in the lining of the vagina.Bone loss increases during the first few years after your last period. Your doctor may order a bone density test to look for bone loss related to osteoporosis. This\u00a0bone density test is recommended in all women ages 60 - 65. This test may be recommended sooner if you are at higher risk for osteoporosis because of on your family history or medicines that you take. ", "Treatment": "Treatment may include lifestyle changes or hormone therapy. Treatment depends on many factors such as:How bad your symptoms are, Your overall health, Your preferences . HORMONE THERAPYHormone therapy may help if you have severe hot flashes, night sweats, mood issues, or vaginal dryness. Hormone therapy is treatment with estrogen and, sometimes, progesterone.Talk to your doctor about the benefits and risks of hormone therapy. Your doctor should be aware of your entire medical and family history before prescribing hormone therapy (HT).Several major studies have questioned the health benefits and risks of hormone therapy, including the risk of developing breast cancer, heart attacks, strokes, and blood clots.Current guidelines support the use of HT for the treatment of hot flashes. Specific recommendations:HT may be started in women who have recently entered menopause., HT should not be used in women who started menopause many years ago, except for vaginal estrogen treatments., The medicine should not be used for longer than 5 years., Women taking HT should have a low risk for stroke, heart disease, blood clots, or breast cancer.. To reduce the risks of estrogen therapy, your doctor may recommend:A lower dose of estrogen or a different estrogen preparation (for instance, a vaginal cream or skin patch rather than a pill), Frequent and regular pelvic exams and Pap smears to detect problems as early as possible, Frequent and regular physical exams, including breast exams and mammograms . Women who still have a uterus (that is, have not had surgery to remove it for any reason) should take estrogen combined with progesterone to prevent cancer of the lining of the uterus (endometrial cancer).ALTERNATIVES TO HORMONE THERAPYThere are other medicines that can help with mood swings, hot flashes, and other symptoms. These include:Antidepressants, including paroxetine (Paxil), venlafaxine (Effexor), bupropion (Wellbutrin), and fluoxetine (Prozac)\r\n , A blood pressure medicine called clonidine\r\n , Gabapentin, a seizure drug that also helps reduce hot flashes\r\n . DIET AND LIFESTYLE CHANGESLifestyle steps you can take to reduce menopause symptoms include:Diet changes:Avoid caffeine, alcohol, and spicy foods., Eat soy foods. Soy contains estrogen., Get plenty of calcium and vitamin D in food or supplements. . Exercise and relaxation techniques:Get plenty of exercise., Do Kegel exercises every day. They strengthen the muscles of your vagina and pelvis., Practice slow, deep breathing whenever a hot flash starts to come on. Try taking six breaths a minute., Try yoga, tai chi, or meditation. . Other tips:Dress lightly and in layers., Keep having sex., Use water-based lubricants or a vaginal moisturizer during sex., See an acupuncture specialist.. ", "Causes": "During menopause, a woman's ovaries stop making eggs. The body produces less of the hormones estrogen and progesterone. Lower levels of these hormones cause menopause symptoms. Periods occur less often and eventually stop. Sometimes this happens suddenly. But most of the time, periods slowly stop over time.Menopause is complete when you have not had a period for 1 year. This is called postmenopause. Surgical menopause takes place when surgical treatments cause a drop in estrogen. This can happen if your ovaries are removed. Menopause can also sometimes be caused by drugs used for chemotherapy or hormone therapy for breast cancer. ", "Prevention": "Menopause is a natural part of a woman's development. It does not need to be prevented. You can reduce your risk of long-term problems such as osteoporosis and heart disease by taking the following steps:Control your blood pressure, cholesterol, and other risk factors for heart disease., Do NOT smoke. Cigarette use can cause early menopause., Eat a low-fat diet., Get regular exercise. Resistance exercises help strengthen your bones and improve your balance., Talk to your doctor about medicines that can help stop further bone weakening if you show early signs of bone loss or have a strong family history of osteoporosis., Take calcium and vitamin D.. "}, "Mitral valve prolapse": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain (not caused by coronary artery disease or a heart attack)", "Dizziness", "Fatigue", "Panic attacks", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations)", "Shortness of breath with activity or when lying flat (orthopnea) "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and use a stethoscope to listen to your heart and lungs. The doctor may feel a thrill (vibration) over the heart, and hear a heart murmur (\"midsystolic click\"). The murmur gets longer and louder when you stand up.Blood pressure is most often normal.Echocardiogram is the most common test used to diagnose mitral valve prolapse. The following tests may also be used to diagnose mitral valve prolapse or a leaky mitral valve:Cardiac catheterization, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, ECG (may show arrhythmias such as atrial fibrillation), MRI of the heart. ", "description": "Mitral valve prolapse is a heart problem involving the mitral valve, which separates the upper and lower chambers of the left side of the heart. In this condition, the valve does not close normally.", "Causes": "The mitral valve helps blood on the left side of the heart flow in one direction. It closes to keep blood from moving backwards when the heart beats (contracts).Mitral valve prolapse is the term used when the valve does not close properly. It can be caused by many different things. In most cases, it is harmless. The problem generally does not affect health and most people with the condition are not aware of it. In a small number of cases, the prolapse can cause blood to leak backwards. This is called mitral regurgitation.Mitral valve prolapse often affects thin women who may have minor chest wall deformities, scoliosis, or other disorders. Some forms of mitral valve prolapse seem to be passed down through families (inherited).Mitral valve prolapse is also seen with some connective tissue disorders such as Marfan syndrome and other rare genetic disorders.", "Treatment": "Most of the time, there are few or no symptoms and treatment is not needed.In the past, most people with heart valve problems were given antibiotics before dental work or procedures such as colonoscopy to prevent\u00a0an infection in the heart. However, antibiotics are now used much less often. Check with your health care provider to see if you need antibiotics.There are many heart medicines that may be used to control this condition. You may need surgery to repair or replace your mitral valve if it becomes leaky (regurgitation). However, this is not common. You may need mitral valve repair or replacement if:Your symptoms get worse, The left ventricle of your heart is enlarged, Your heart function gets worse. "}, "Meningitis - staphylococcal": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Buildup of fluid between the skull and brain (subdural effusion), Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures, Staph infection in another area of the body. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in infants\r\n ", "Decreased alertness", "Poor feeding or irritability in children", "Rapid breathing", "Unusual posture, with the head and neck arched backwards (opisthotonos)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine the patient. This\u00a0will usually show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. If the doctor thinks meningitis is possible, a\u00a0lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") is done to remove a\u00a0sample of\u00a0spinal fluid (cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF)\u00a0for testing. If you have a spinal fluid shunt, the sample may be taken from this instead. Tests may include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the head, Gram stain, other special stains, and culture of CSF. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics should be started as soon as possible. Vancomycin is the first choice for suspected staphylococcal meningitis. Nafcillin is sometimes used instead.\u00a0Often, treatment will include a search for, and removal of, possible sources of bacteria in the body. These include shunts or artificial heart valves.", "Causes": "Staphylococcal meningitis is caused by Staphylococcus bacteria. When it is caused by Staphylococcus aureus or Staphylococcus epidermidis bacteria, it usually develops as a complication of surgery or as an infection that spreads through the blood from another site (hematogenous spread).Risk factors include:Infections of heart valves, Past infection of the brain, Past meningitis due to spinal fluid shunts, Recent brain surgery, Spinal fluid shunt, Trauma. ", "Prevention": "In high-risk people, taking preventive antibiotics before diagnostic or surgical procedures may help reduce the risk. Discuss this with your doctor."}, "Mucormycosis": {"description": "Mucormycosis is a fungal infection of the sinuses, brain, or lungs. It occurs in some people with a weakened immune system.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Blindness (if the optic nerve is involved), Clotting or blockage of brain or lung blood vessels, Death, Nerve damage . ", "Symptoms": ["Eyes that swell and stick out (protrude)", "Dark scabbing in nasal cavities", "Fever", "Headache", "Mental status changes", "Redness of skin above sinuses", "Sinus pain or congestion ", "Cough", "Coughing blood (occasionally)", "Fever", "Shortness of breath ", "Abdominal pain", "Blood in the stools", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting blood ", "Fever", "Pain in the upper abdomen or back "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. See an ear-nose-throat (ENT) doctor if you are having sinus problems. Testing depends on your symptoms, but may include these imaging tests:CT scans, MRI scans . A biopsy must be done to definitively diagnose mucormycosis.", "Treatment": "Surgery should be done immediately to remove all dead and infected tissue. Surgery can lead to disfiguration because it may involve removal of the palate, parts of the nose, or parts of the eye. Without such aggressive surgery, however, chances of survival are greatly decreased.You will also receive antifungal medicine, usually amphotericin B, through a vein. After the infection is under control, you may be switched to a different medicine.", "Causes": "Mucormycosis is caused by a common fungus that is often found in the soil and in dying plants. Most people come in contact with the fungus at some time. However, people with a weakened immune system are more likely to get this infection. Conditions most commonly associated with mucormycosis include:AIDS, Burns, Diabetes (usually poorly controlled), Leukemia and lymphoma, Long-term steroid use, Metabolic acidosis, Poor nutrition (malnutrition), Use of some medicines . Mucormycosis may involve:A sinus and brain infection called rhinocerebral infection: may start as a sinus infection, and then lead to the swelling of the nerves that stem from the brain. It may also cause blood clots that block vessels to the brain., A lung infection called pulmonary mucormycosis: pneumonia gets worse quickly and may spread to the chest cavity, heart, and brain., Other parts of the body: mucormycosis of the gastrointestinal tract, skin, and kidneys. . ", "Prevention": "Because the fungi that cause mucormycosis are widespread, the best way to prevent this infection is to improve control of the illnesses associated with mucormycosis."}, "Mittelschmerz": {"description": "Mittelschmerz is one-sided, lower abdominal pain that affects women. It occurs at or around the time of an egg is released from the ovaries (ovulation).", "Possible Complications": "Most of the time there are no complications.", "Symptoms": ["Occurs only on one side", "Goes on for minutes to a few hours. It can last up to 24 to 48 hours.", "Feels like a sharp, cramping pain unlike other pain", "Severe (rare)", "May switch sides from month to month", "Begins midway through the menstrual cycle "], "Exams and Tests": "A pelvic exam shows no problems. Other tests (such as an abdominal ultrasound or transvaginal pelvic ultrasound) may be done to look for other causes of ovarian or pelvic pain. These tests may be done if the pain is ongoing.", "Treatment": "Most of the time treatment is not needed. Pain relievers may be needed if the pain is intense or lasts a long time.", "Causes": "About 1 in 5 women have pain around the time of ovulation. This is called mittelschmerz. The pain may occur just before, during, or after ovulation.This pain can be explained in several ways. Just before to ovulation, the growth of the follicle where the egg develops may stretch the surface of the ovary. This can cause pain. At the time of ovulation, fluid or blood is released from the ruptured egg follicle. This may irritate lining of the abdomen.", "Prevention": "Birth control pills can be taken to prevent ovulation. This can help reduce pain that is linked to ovulation."}, "Meningitis - pneumococcal": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Many\u00a0patients have long-term complications such as:Brain damage, Buildup of fluid between the skull and brain (subdural effusion), Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in infants\r\n ", "Decreased consciousness", "Poor feeding or irritability in children", "Rapid breathing", "Unusual posture, with the head and neck arched backwards (opisthotonos)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine the patient. This may show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. If the health care provider thinks meningitis is possible, a\u00a0lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") will be done to remove a sample of\u00a0spinal fluid (known as cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF)\u00a0for testing.Tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the head, Gram stain, other special stains, and culture of CSF. ", "Treatment": "Treatment with antibiotics should be started as soon as possible. Ceftriaxone is one of the most commonly used antibiotics.If the antibiotic is not working and the health care provider suspects antibiotic resistance, vancomycin or rifampin are used. Sometimes systemic corticosteroids may be used, especially in children.", "Causes": "Pneumococcal meningitis is caused by Streptococcus pneumoniae bacteria (also called pneumococcus). This type of bacteria is the most common cause of bacterial meningitis in adults. It is the second most common cause of meningitis in children older than age 2.Risk factors include:Alcohol use, Diabetes, History of meningitis, Infection of a heart valve, Injury or trauma to the head, Meningitis in which there is leakage of spinal fluid, Recent ear infection, Recent pneumonia, Recent upper respiratory infection, Spleen removal or a spleen that does not function. ", "Prevention": "Early treatment of pneumonia and ear infections caused by pneumococcus may decrease the risk of meningitis. There are also two effective vaccines available to prevent pneumococcus infection.The following people should be vaccinated, according to current recommendations:Children, Adults age 65 and older, People at high risk for pneumococcus infection. "}, "Meckel's diverticulum": {"description": "A Meckel's diverticulum is a pouch on the wall of the lower part of the intestine that is present at birth (congenital). The diverticulum may contain tissue similar to that of the stomach or pancreas.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Excess bleeding (hemorrhage) from the diverticulum, Folding of the intestines (intussusception), a type of blockage, Peritonitis, Tear (perforation) of the bowel at the diverticulum . ", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the abdomen that can be mild or severe", "Blood in the stool", "Nausea and vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "You may have the following tests:Hematocrit, Hemoglobin, Stool smear for invisible blood (stool occult blood test), CT scan, Technetium scan (also called a Meckel's scan). ", "Treatment": "You may need surgery to remove the diverticulum if bleeding develops. The segment of small intestine that contains the diverticulum is taken out. The ends of the intestine are sewn back together.You may need to take iron supplements to treat anemia. You may need a blood transfusion if you have a lot of bleeding, ", "Causes": "A Meckel's diverticulum is tissue left over from when the baby's digestive tract was forming before birth. A small number of people have a Meckel's diverticulum. However, only a few develop symptoms."}, "Meniscus tears": {"Symptoms": ["A \"pop\" may be felt at the time of injury", "Knee joint pain when walking", "Knee pain in the space between the bones; gets worse when gentle pressure is applied to the joint", "Locking of the knee joint", "Recurrent knee-catching", "Difficulty squatting down", "Swelling in the knee joint"], "Causes": "Meniscal tears are most commonly caused by twisting or over-flexing the knee joint.", "description": "Meniscus tears refer to a tear in the shock-absorbing cartilage (meniscus) of the knee.", "Prevention": "Use proper technique when exercising or playing sports. Many cases of meniscus tears may not be preventable."}, "Multiple lentigines syndrome": {"description": "Multiple lentigines syndrome is an inherited disorder\u00a0in which there is an increased number of lentigines (freckle-like spots) on the body.", "Possible Complications": "Complications vary and include:Deafness, Delayed puberty, Heart problems, Infertility. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal genitalia", "Absent or delayed puberty", "Cafe-au-lait spots (light brown birthmarks)", "Hearing problems (partial deafness)", "Heart defects (electrocardiographic conduction)", "Hypogonadism", "Multiple spots on neck and trunk", "Pectus carinatum (abnormalities of the sternum or breastbone)", "Pectus excavatum", "Prominent ears", "Pulmonary artery narrowing", "Slow growth", "Undescended testicles (cryptorchidism)", "Wide-set eyes (hypertelorism) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and listen to your heart with a stethoscope. There may be signs of a heart valve problems or obstructive cardiomyopathy.Tests that may be done can include:ECG, Hearing test, CT scan of the brain, Skull x-ray, EEG. ", "Treatment": "Symptoms are treated as appropriate. A hearing aid may be needed. Hormone treatment may be necessary at the expected time of puberty to cause the normal changes to occur.Laser or bleaching creams may help lighten some of the brown spots on the skin.", "Causes": "Multiple lentigines syndrome is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait. This means you only\u00a0need to get the abnormal gene from one parent in order for you to inherit the disease.Persons with this condition have large numbers of lentigines. Lentigines are skin markings that are darker than true freckles. They are present from birth. They are located mostly on the trunk and neck.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for people with a family history of multiple lentigines syndrome who want to have children."}, "Medullary carcinoma of thyroid": {"description": "Medullary carcinoma of the thyroid is cancer of the thyroid gland that starts in cells that release a hormone called calcitonin. These cells are called \"C\" cells. The thyroid gland is located inside the front of your lower neck.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:\r\nCancer spreads to other areas of the body\r\n  , \r\nParathyroid glands are accidentally removed during surgery\r\n  . ", "Symptoms": ["Breathing problems due to narrowing of airways", "Cough", "Cough with blood", "Diarrhea", "Goiter (enlarged thyroid)", "Lump on thyroid gland"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam. Lymph nodes in the neck may be swollen. Examination of the thyroid may reveal single or multiple nodules (lumps). Thyroid function tests (drawn from the blood) are usually normal.Other tests that may be used to diagnose MTC may include:Calcitonin blood test, CEA blood test, Genetic testing, Thyroid biopsy, Ultrasound of the thyroid. Patients with MTC should be checked for certain other tumors, especially pheochromocytoma.", "Treatment": "Treatment involves surgery to remove the thyroid gland and surrounding lymph nodes. Because this is an uncommon tumor, surgery should be performed by a surgeon who is familiar with this type of cancer and experienced with the operation required.Chemotherapy and radiation do not work very well for this type of cancer. Radiation is used in some patients after surgery. New treatments are being investigated in clinical trials. Your doctor can tell you more about these, if needed.", "Causes": "The cause of medullary carcinoma of the thyroid (MTC) is unknown. Unlike other types of thyroid cancer, MTC is less likely to be caused by radiation therapy to the neck given to treat other cancers during childhood.There are two forms of MTC:\r\n  Sporadic MTC, which does not run in families. Most MTCs are sporadic. This form mainly affects older adults.\r\n  , \r\n  Inherited MTC, which runs in families.\r\n  . You have an increased risk of this type of cancer if you have:\r\n  A family history of MTC\r\n  , \r\n  A family history of multiple endocrine neoplasia (MEN)\r\n  , \r\n  A prior history of pheochromocytoma, mucosal neuromas, or hyperparathyroidism. Other types of thyroid cancer include:Anaplastic carcinoma of the thyroid, Follicular tumor of the thyroid, Papillary carcinoma of the thyroid, \r\n  Thyroid lymphoma. ", "Prevention": "Prevention may not be possible. However, being aware of your risk factors, especially your family history, may allow for early diagnosis and treatment. For persons who have a very strong family history of MTC, the option to remove the thyroid gland may be recommended. You should carefully discuss this option with a doctor who is very familiar with the disease."}, "Multifocal atrial tachycardia": {"description": "Multifocal atrial tachycardia is a rapid heart rate. It occurs when too many signals (electrical impulses) are sent from the upper heart (atria) to the lower heart (ventricles).", "Possible Complications": "Cardiomyopathy, Congestive heart failure, Reduced pumping action of the heart. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest tightness", "Light-headedness", "Fainting", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations)", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss and failure to thrive in infants", "Breathing difficulty when lying down", "Dizziness"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam shows a fast irregular heartbeat, of about 100 to 130 beats per minute. Blood pressure is normal or low. There may be signs of poor circulation.Tests to diagnose MAT include:ECG, Electrophysiologic study (EPS) . Heart monitors are used to record the rapid heartbeat. These include:24-hour Holter monitor, Portable, long-term loop recorders that\u00a0allow you to start recording if symptoms occur . If you are in the hospital, your heart rhythm will be monitored 24 hours a day. ", "Treatment": "If you have a condition that can lead to MAT, that condition should be treated first.Treatment for MAT includes:Improving blood oxygen levels, Giving magnesium\u00a0or potassium\u00a0through a vein, Stopping medications, such as theophylline, which can increase the heart rate, Taking medicines to\u00a0slow the heart rate (if the heart rate is too fast), such as calcium channel blockers (verapamil, diltiazem) or beta-blockers. ", "Causes": "The human heart gives off electrical impulses, or signals, which tell it to beat. Normally, these signals begin in an area of the upper right chamber called the sinoatrial node (sinus node or SA node). This node is considered the heart's \"natural pacemaker.\" It helps control the heartbeat. When the heart detects a signal, it contracts (or beats). The normal heart rate in adults is about 60 to 100 beats per minute. The normal heart rate is faster in children.In multifocal atrial tachycardia (MAT), many locations in the atria fire signals at the same time. Too many signals lead to a rapid heart rate. It most often ranges between 100 to 130 beats per minute or more in adults. The rapid heart rate causes the heart to work too hard and not move blood efficiently. If the heartbeat is very fast, there is less time for the heart chamber to fill with blood between beats. Therefore, not enough blood is pumped to the brain and the rest of the body with each contraction.MAT is most common in people age 50 and over. It is often seen in people with conditions that lower the amount of oxygen in the blood. These conditions include:Bacterial pneumonia, Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), Congestive heart failure, Lung cancer, Lung failure, Pulmonary embolism. You may be at higher risk for MAT if you have:Coronary heart disease, Diabetes, Had surgery within the last 6 weeks, Overdosed on the drug theophylline, Sepsis . When the heart rate is less than 100 beats per minute, the arrhythmia is called \"wandering atrial pacemaker.\"", "Prevention": "To reduce the risk of developing MAT, treat the disorders that cause it right away."}, "Melanoma of the eye": {"description": "Melanoma of the eye is cancer that occurs in various parts of the eye.", "Possible Complications": "Distortion or loss of vision, Retinal detachment, Spread of the tumor to other areas of the body. ", "Symptoms": ["Bulging eyes", "Change in iris color", "Poor vision in one eye", "Red, painful eye", "Small defect on the iris or conjunctiva"], "Exams and Tests": "An eye examination with an ophthalmoscope may reveal a single round or oval lump (tumor) in the eye.Tests that may be ordered\u00a0include:Cranial CT scan to look for spread (metastasis) to the brain, Eye ultrasound, MRI of the head to look for\u00a0spread (metastasis) to the brain, Skin biopsy if there is an affected area on the skin. ", "Treatment": "Small melanomas may be treated with:Laser, Radiation therapy (brachytherapy)\r\n  . Surgery to\u00a0remove the eye (enucleation) may be needed.\r\nOther treatments that may be used are chemotherapyy or biological therapy (interferon).", "Causes": "Melanoma is a very aggressive type of cancer that can spread rapidly.Melanoma of the eye can affect several parts of the eye, including the:Choroid, Ciliary body, Conjunctiva, Eyelid, Iris, Orbit. The choroid layer is the most likely\u00a0site of melanoma in the eye.The cancer may only be in the eye. Or it may spread (metastasize) to another location in the body, most commonly the liver. Melanoma can also begin on the skin or other organs in the body and spread to the eye.Melanoma is the most common type of eye tumor in adults. Even so, melanoma that starts in\u00a0the eye is rare.Too much\u00a0exposure to sunlight is an important risk factor. Persons who have fair-skin and blue eyes are most affected.", "Prevention": "The most important way to prevent eye melanoma is to\u00a0protect the eyes from\u00a0sunlight, especially between 10 a.m. and 2 p.m., when the sun's rays are most intense. Wear sunglasses that have ultraviolet protection.A yearly eye exam is recommended."}, "Major depression with psychotic features": {"description": "Major depression with psychotic features is a mental disorder in which a person has depression along with loss of touch with reality (psychosis).", "Possible Complications": "The risk of suicide is much higher in people with depression with psychotic symptoms than in those without psychosis. You may need to stay in the hospital if you have thoughts of suicide. The safety of other people\u00a0must also be considered.", "Symptoms": ["Delusions: False beliefs about what is taking place or who one is", "Hallucinations: Seeing or hearing things that aren't there "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms. Your answers and certain questionnaires can help your health care provider diagnose this condition and determine how severe it may be.Blood and urine tests and possibly a brain scan may be done to rule out other medical conditions with similar symptoms.", "Treatment": "Psychotic depression requires immediate medical care and treatment. Treatment usually involves antidepressant and antipsychotic medicine. You may only need antipsychotic medicine for a short period of time.Electroconvulsive therapy can help treat depression with psychotic symptoms. However, medicine is usually tried first.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. A family or personal history of depression or psychotic illness makes you more likely to develop this condition. "}, "Mesenteric venous thrombosis": {"description": "Mesenteric venous thrombosis is a blood clot in one or more of the major veins that drain blood from the intestine.", "Possible Complications": "Intestinal ischemia is a serious complication of mesenteric venous thrombosis. Some or all of the intestine dies because of poor blood supply.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Abdominal pain, which may get worse after eating and over time\r\n  ", "\r\n  Bloating\r\n  ", "\r\n  Diarrhea\r\n  ", "\r\n  Fever\r\n  ", "\r\n  Gastrointestinal bleeding\r\n  ", "\r\n  Vomiting\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "A CT scan is the main test used to diagnose mesenteric venous thrombosis.Other tests may include:Angiogram (studying the blood flow to the intestine), MRI of the abdomen\r\n , Ultrasound of the abdomen and mesenteric veins. ", "Treatment": "Blood thinners (most commonly heparin or related drugs) are used to treat mesenteric venous thrombosis when there is no associated bleeding. In some cases, medicine can be delivered directly into the clot to dissolve it. This procedure is called thrombolysis.Less often, the clot is removed with a type of surgery called thrombectomy.If you have signs and symptoms of a severe infection called peritonitis, you will usually need surgery to remove the intestine. After surgery, you may need an ileostomy (opening from the small intestine into a bag on the skin) or colostomy (an opening from the colon into the skin).", "Causes": "Mesenteric venous thrombosis is a clot that blocks blood flow in a mesenteric vein. There are two such veins through which blood leaves the intestine. The condition stops the blood circulation of the intestine and can result in damage to the intestine.There are several diseases that can lead to mesenteric venous thrombosis. Many of the diseases cause swelling (inflammation) of the tissues surrounding the veins, and include:Appendicitis, Cancer, Diverticulitis, Liver disease with cirrhosis, Pancreatitis . Patients who have disorders that make the blood more likely to stick together (clot) have a higher risk of mesenteric venous thrombosis. Birth control pills and estrogen medicines increase risk of this condition. "}, "Myelofibrosis": {"description": "Myelofibrosis is a disorder of the bone marrow in which the marrow is replaced by fibrous scar tissue.", "Possible Complications": "Development of acute myelogenous leukemia, Infections, Bleeding, Blood clots, Liver failure . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal fullness, pain, or feeling full before finishing a meal (because of\u00a0an enlarged spleen)", "Bone pain", "Bruising", "Easy bleeding", "Fatigue", "Increased likelihood of getting an infection", "Pale skin", "Shortness of breath with exercise "], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination shows swelling of the spleen. Later in the disease, it may also show an enlarged liver.Tests that may be done include:Complete blood count (CBC) with blood smear, LDH enzyme level, Genetic testing . An examination of the blood shows teardrop-shaped red blood cells and immature white blood cells. Bone marrow biopsy is usually needed to make the diagnosis and to rule out other causes of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "In the past, the treatment of myelofibrosis has depended on the symptoms and degree of the low blood counts. In young people, bone marrow or stem cell transplantation appears to improve the outlook, and may cure the disease. A long-term (5 year) remission is possible for some patients with bone marrow transplantation. Such treatment should be considered for younger patients and some others. Other treatment may involve:Blood transfusions and medicines to correct anemia, Radiation and chemotherapy, Medicines to target a genetic mutation linked to this disease, if present, Splenectomy (removal of the spleen) if swelling causes symptoms, or to help with anemia . ", "Causes": "Bone marrow is the soft, fatty tissue inside your bones. Stem cells are immature cells in the bone marrow that develop into all of your blood cells. Your blood is made of:Red blood cells (which carry oxygen to your tissues), White blood cells (which fight infection), Platelets (which help your blood clot) . When the bone marrow is scarred, it cannot make enough blood cells. Anemia, bleeding problems, and a higher risk of infections may occur.As a result, the liver and spleen try to make some of these blood cells. This causes these organs to swell.The cause of myelofibrosis is unknown. There are no known risk factors. When it occurs, it usually develops slowly in people over age 50.Diseases such as myelodysplastic syndrome,\u00a0leukemia, and lymphoma may also cause bone marrow scarring. This is called secondary myelofibrosis.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention."}, "Methylmalonic acidemia": {"description": "It is considered an inborn error of metabolism.", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Death, Kidney failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Brain disease that gets worse (progressive encephalopathy)", "Dehydration", "Developmental delays", "Failure to thrive", "Lethargy", "Repeated yeast infections", "Seizures", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Testing for methylmalonic acidemia is often done as part of a newborn screening exam. The U.S. Department of Health and Human Services recommends screening for this condition at birth because early detection and treatment has been shown to be beneficial.Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition include:Ammonia test, Blood gases, Complete blood count, CT scan or MRI of the brain, Electrolyte levels, Genetic testing, Methylmalonic acid blood test, Plasma amino acid test. ", "Treatment": "Treatment consists of cobalamin and carnitine supplements and a low-protein diet. The child's diet must be carefully controlled.If supplements do not help, the doctor may also recommend a diet that avoids substances called isoleucine, threonine, methionine, and valine.Liver or kidney transplantation (or both) have been shown to help some patients. These transplants provide the body with new cells that help breakdown methylmalonic acid normally.", "Causes": "The disease is usually diagnosed in the first year of life. It is an autosomal recessive disorder, which means the defective gene must be passed onto the child from both parents.About 1 in 48,000 babies are born with this condition. However, the actual rate may be higher, because a newborn may die before the condition is ever diagnosed. Methylmalonic acidemia affects boys and girls equally.", "Prevention": "A low-protein maintenance diet can help to reduce the number of acidemia attacks. Persons with this condition should avoid those who are sick.Genetic counseling may be helpful for couples with a family history of this disorder who wish to have a baby.Some places have expanded newborn screening done at birth, which includes screening for methylmalonic acidemia. You can ask your doctor if this was done on your child."}, "Multiple system atrophy": {"description": "Multiple system atrophy (MSA) is a rare condition that causes symptoms similar to Parkinson's disease. However, patients with MSA have more widespread damage to the part of the nervous system that controls important functions such as heart rate, blood pressure, and sweating.", "Possible Complications": "Progressive loss of ability to walk or care for self\r\n, Difficulty performing daily activities\r\n, Injuries from falls/fainting\r\n, Side effects of medications. ", "Symptoms": ["Face changes \r\n\r\n\"Mask\" appearance to face, May be unable to close mouth, Reduced ability to show facial expressions, Staring. ", "\"Mask\" appearance to face", "May be unable to close mouth", "Reduced ability to show facial expressions", "Staring", " \r\n Difficulty chewing or swallowing (occasionally)", "Disrupted sleep patterns (especially during rapid eye movement (REM) sleep late at night)", "Dizziness or fainting when standing up or after standing still", "Frequent falls", "Impotence", "Loss of control over bowels or bladder", "Loss of fine motor skills \r\n\r\n \r\n Difficulty eating \r\n , Difficulty with any activity that requires small movements, Writing that is small and hard to read. ", " \r\n Difficulty eating \r\n ", "Difficulty with any activity that requires small movements", "Writing that is small and hard to read", "Loss of sweating in any part of the body", "Mild decline in mental function", "Movement difficultiesLoss of balance, Shuffling, Walking pattern (gait) changes. ", "Loss of balance", "Shuffling", "Walking pattern (gait) changes", "Muscle aches and pains (myalgia)", "Muscle rigidityDifficulty bending arms or legs, Stiffness. ", "Difficulty bending arms or legs", "Stiffness", "Nausea and problems with digestion", "Posture difficulties: may be unstable, stooped, or slumped over", "Slow movements \r\n\r\nDifficulty beginning to walk or starting any voluntary movement, Freezing of movement when the movement is stopped, unable to start moving again, Small steps followed by the need to run to keep balance. ", "Difficulty beginning to walk or starting any voluntary movement", "Freezing of movement when the movement is stopped, unable to start moving again", "Small steps followed by the need to run to keep balance", "Tremors \r\n\r\nMay become severe enough to interfere with activities, May be worse when tired, excited, or stressed, May occur at rest or at any time, May occur with any action, such as holding a cup or other eating utensils, Finger-thumb rubbing (pill rolling tremor). ", "May become severe enough to interfere with activities", "May be worse when tired, excited, or stressed", "May occur at rest or at any time", "May occur with any action, such as holding a cup or other eating utensils", "Finger-thumb rubbing (pill rolling tremor)", "Vision changes, decreased or blurred vision", "Voice and speech changes \r\n\r\nDifficulty speaking, Monotone, Slow speaking, Voice is low volume. ", "Difficulty speaking", "Monotone", "Slow speaking", "Voice is low volume", "Confusion", "Dementia", "Depression", "Sleep-related breathing difficulties, especially sleep apnea or a blockage in the air passage that leads to a harsh vibrating sound"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you, and check your eyes, nerves, and muscles. Your blood pressure will be taken while you are lying down and standing up. There are no specific tests to confirm this disease. A neurologist can make the diagnosis based on:History of symptoms, Physical examination results, Ruling out other causes of symptoms. Testing to help confirm the diagnosis may include:MRI of head, Plasma norepinephrine levels, Urine examination for norepinephrine breakdown products (urine catecholamines). ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for MSA. There is no known way to prevent the disease from getting worse. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms.Anticholinergic medications may be used to reduce early or mild tremors. Levodopa may improve movement and balance.Carbidopa is usually added to Levodopa to reduce its side effects and make it work better. However, for people with MSA the response to medications may be disappointing. Many people respond poorly to treatment with anticholinergics or Levodopa.Medications that may be used to treat low blood pressure include:Beta-blockers, Fludrocortisone (Florinef), MAO inhibitors, Vasoconstrictors (midodrine), Vasopressin. A pacemaker that is programmed to stimulate the heart to beat at a rapid rate (faster than 100 beats per minute) may increase blood pressure for some people.Constipation can be treated with a high-fiber diet and laxatives. Medicines are available to treat impotence. ", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. MSA develops gradually and is most often diagnosed in men older than 60."}, "Melanoma": {"description": "Other common types of skin cancer are:", "Possible Complications": "Melanoma can spread to other parts of the body very quickly.Melanoma treatment can cause side effects, including pain, nausea, and fatigue.", "Symptoms": ["Asymmetry: One half of the abnormal area is different from the other half.", "Borders: The edges of the growth are irregular.", "Color: Color changes from one area to another, with shades of tan, brown, or black, and sometimes white, red, or blue. A mixture of colors may appear within one sore.", "Diameter: The spot is usually (but not always) larger than 6 mm in diameter -- about the size of a pencil eraser.", "Evolution: The mole keeps changing appearance."], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will check your skin and look at the size, shape, color, and texture of any suspicious areas.If your doctor thinks you might have skin cancer, a piece of skin from the growth will be removed. This is called a skin biopsy. The sample is sent to a lab for examination under a microscope.A sentinel lymph node (SLN) biopsy may be done in some people with melanoma to see if the cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes.Once melanoma has been diagnosed, CT scans or other types of x-rays may be done to see if the cancer has spread.", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to treat melanoma. The skin cancer and some surrounding area will be removed. How much skin is removed depends on how deep the melanoma has grown.If the cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes, these lymph nodes may also be removed. After surgery, you may receive a medicine called interferon.Treatment is more difficult when the melanoma has spread to other organs. In this case, it usually cannot be cured. Treatment involves shrinking the skin cancer and making you as comfortable as possible. You may receive:Chemotherapy: Medicines are used to kill cancer cells. It is usually given if the melanoma has returned or spread., Immunotherapy: Medications such as interferon or interleukin help your immune system fight the cancer. They may be\u00a0used along with chemotherapy and surgery., Radiation treatments: These may be used to relieve pain or discomfort caused by cancer that has spread., Surgery: Surgery may be done to remove cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. This is done to relieve pain or discomfort associated with the growing cancer. . If you have melanoma that is hard to treat, you might consider enrolling in a clinical trial. Ask your doctor for more information. Researchers continue to study new treatments.", "Causes": "Melanoma is caused by changes in skin cells called melanocytes. These cells make a skin color pigment called melanin. Melanin is responsible for skin and hair color.Melanoma can appear on normal skin. Or, it can begin as a mole or other area that then changes in appearance. Some moles that are present at birth may develop into melanomas.There are four major types of melanoma:Superficial spreading melanoma is the most common type. It is usually flat and irregular in shape and color, with different shades of black and brown. It is most common in Caucasians., Nodular melanoma usually starts as a raised area that is dark blackish-blue or bluish-red. Some do not have any color (amelanotic melanoma)., Lentigo maligna melanoma usually occurs in the elderly. It is most common in sun-damaged skin on the face, neck, and arms. The abnormal skin areas are usually large, flat, and tan with areas of brown., Acral lentiginous melanoma is the least common form. It usually occurs on the palms, soles, or under the nails. It is more common in African Americans. . In rare cases, melanomas appear in the mouth, iris of the eye, or retina at the back of the eye. These may be found during dental or eye exams. In very rare cases, a melanoma develops in the vagina, esophagus, anus, urinary tract\u00a0or small intestine.Melanoma is not as common as other types of skin cancer, such as basal cell cancer. But more and more persons are developing melanoma.The risk of developing melanoma increases with age, though it can also be seen in young people.You are more likely to develop melanoma if you:Have fair skin, blue or green eyes, or red or blond hair, Live in sunny climates or at high altitudes, Spent a lot of time in high levels of strong sunlight because of a job or other activities, Have had one or more blistering sunburns during childhood, Use tanning devices . Other risk factors include:Close relatives with melanoma, Certain types of moles (atypical or dysplastic) or\u00a0many birthmarks, Weakened immune system due to disease or medication . ", "Prevention": "Some people should see a dermatologist for regular skin exams. These include people with:A family history of melanoma, Severely sun-damaged skin, Lots of moles on their skin . A skin doctor can examine you and tell you whether you need regular skin checks. Sometimes, unusual moles are removed to prevent them from turning into melanoma.You should also examine your own skin once a month, using a mirror to check hard-to-see places. Call your doctor if you notice any changes.The best way to prevent skin cancer is to reduce your exposure to sunlight. Ultraviolet light is most intense between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. Try to avoid sun exposure during these hours. Protect your skin by wearing a hat, long-sleeved shirt, long skirt, or pant when you do have to be outside. The following tips can also help:Apply high-quality sunscreen with a\u00a0sun protection factor (SPF) rating of at least 15, even when you are only going outdoors for a short time., Apply a large amount of sunscreen on all exposed areas, including ears and feet., Look for sunscreens that block both UVA and UVB light., Use a waterproof formula., Apply sunscreen at least 30 minutes before going outside. Reapply it often, especially after swimming., Use sunscreen in winter, too. Protect yourself even on cloudy days. . Other important facts to help you avoid too much sun exposure:Avoid surfaces that reflect light more, such as water, sand, concrete, and white-painted areas., Be extra careful at higher altitudes, where skin burns faster., Avoid sun lamps, tanning beds, and tanning salons. . "}, "Macroglobulinemia of Waldenstrom": {"description": "Macroglobulinemia of Waldenstrom is a cancer of the B lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell). It is associated with the overproduction of proteins called IgM antibodies.", "Possible Complications": "Changes in mental function, possibly leading to coma, Congestive heart failure, Gastrointestinal bleeding, Vision problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding of the gums", "Blurred or decreased vision", "Bluish skin", "Dizziness", "Easy bruising of the skin", "Fatigue", "Flank pain", "Headache", "Mental status changes", "Nosebleeds", "Numbness, tingling, or burning pain in the hands, feet, fingers, toes, ears, or nose", "Rash", "Swollen glands", "Unintentional weight loss", "Vision loss in one eye "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may reveal a swollen spleen, liver, and lymph nodes. An eye exam may show enlarged veins in the retina or retinal bleeding (hemorrhages).A CBC shows a low number of red blood cells and platelets. A blood chemistry shows evidence of kidney disease. A serum viscosity test can tell if the blood has become thick. Symptoms usually occur when the blood is four times thicker than normal.A test called serum protein electrophoresis shows an increased\u00a0level of the IgM antibody. Levels are\u00a0often higher than 3 grams per deciliter (g/dL).Bone lesions are very rare. If they are present, a bone marrow examination will show cells that resemble both lymphocytes and plasma cells.Additional tests that may be done:24-hour urine protein, Total protein, Serum globulin electrophoresis, Immunofixation in urine, T (thymus derived) lymphocyte count. ", "Treatment": "Plasmapheresis removes unwanted substances from the blood. In macroglobulinemia, it removes or reduces the high level of IgM, and is used to quickly control the symptoms caused by blood thickening.Drug therapy may include corticosteroids or combinations of chemotherapy drugs.Patients who have a low number of red or white blood cells or platelets may need transfusions or antibiotics.", "Causes": "Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia is a result of a condition called lymphoplasmacytic lymphoma. What causes too much production of the IgM antibody is unknown. Overproduction of IgM causes the blood to become too thick. This is called hyperviscosity. It\u00a0can make it harder for blood to flow through small blood vessels.Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia is very rare. Most people with this condition are over age 65,\u00a0but it may occur in younger people."}, "Migraine": {"Symptoms": ["A temporary blind spot", "Blurred vision", "Eye pain", "Seeing stars or zigzag lines", "Tunnel vision ", "Start as a dull ache and get worse within minutes to hours", "Are throbbing, pounding, or pulsating", "Are worse on one side of the head with pain behind the eye or in the back of the head and neck", "Last 6 to 48 hours ", "Chills", "Increased urination", "Fatigue", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness, tingling, or weakness", "Problems concentrating, trouble finding words", "Sensitivity to light or sound", "Sweating ", "Feeling mentally dull, like your thinking is not clear or sharp", "Needing more sleep", "Neck pain"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor can diagnose migraine headache by asking about your symptoms and family history of migraines. A complete physical exam will be done to determine if your headaches are due to muscle tension, sinus problems, or a brain disorder.There is no specific test to prove that your headache is actually a migraine. Your doctor may order a brain CT\u00a0or MRI scan if you have never had one before. The test may also be ordered if you have unusual symptoms with your migraine, including weakness, memory problems, or loss of alertness.An EEG may be needed to rule out seizures. A lumbar puncture (spinal tap) might be done.", "description": "Some people who get migraines have warning symptoms, called an aura, before the actual headache begins. An aura is a group of symptoms, including vision changes. An aura is a warning sign that a bad headache is coming.", "Causes": "A migraine headache is caused by abnormal brain activity. This activity can be triggered by many things. But the exact chain of events remains unclear. Most medical experts believe the attack begins in the brain and involves nerve pathways and chemicals. The changes affect blood flow in the brain and surrounding tissues.Migraine headaches tend to first appear between the ages of 10 and 45. Sometimes, they begin later in life. Migraines may run in families. Migraines occur more often in women than men. Some women, but not all, may have fewer migraines when they are pregnant.Migraine attacks may be triggered by:Caffeine withdrawal, Changes in hormone levels during a woman's menstrual cycle or with the use of birth control pills, Changes in sleep patterns, Drinking alcohol, Exercise or other physical stress, Loud noises or bright lights, Missed meals, Odors or perfumes, Smoking or exposure to smoke, Stress and anxiety . Migraines can also be triggered by certain foods. Most common are:Baked goods, Chocolate, Dairy foods, Foods with monosodium glutamate (MSG), Foods with tyramine, which includes red wine, aged cheese, smoked fish, chicken livers, figs, and certain beans, Fruits (avocado, banana, citrus fruit), Meats containing nitrates (bacon, hot dogs, salami, cured meats), Onions, Peanuts and other nuts and seeds, Processed, fermented, pickled, or marinated foods . True migraine headaches are not a result of a brain tumor or other serious medical problem. Only a health care provider who specializes in headaches can determine if your symptoms are due to a migraine or other condition.", "Treatment": "There is no specific cure for migraine headaches. The goal is to treat your migraine symptoms right away, and to prevent symptoms by avoiding or changing your triggers. A key step is learning how to manage your migraines at home. A headache diary can help you identify your headache triggers. Then you and your doctor can plan how to avoid these triggers.If you have frequent migraines, your doctor may prescribe medicine to reduce the number of attacks. You need to take the medicine every day for it to be effective. Medicines may include:Antidepressants, Blood pressure medicines, Seizure medicines . Botulinum toxin type A (Botox) injections may also help reduce migraine attacks if they occur more than 15 days a month.TREATING AN ATTACKOther medicines are taken at the first sign of a migraine attack. Over-the-counter pain medicines, such as acetaminophen, ibuprofen, or aspirin are often helpful when your migraine is mild. Be aware that: Taking medicines more than 3 days a week may lead to rebound headaches. These are headaches that keep coming back due to overuse of pain medicine., Taking too much acetaminophen can damage your liver. , Too much ibuprofen or aspirin can irritate your stomach. . If these treatments do not help, ask your doctor about prescription medicines. These include nasal sprays, suppositories, or injections. Some migraine medicines narrow the blood vessels. If you are at risk of heart attack or have heart disease, talk with your doctor before using these medicines. Some migraine medicines should not be used by pregnant women. Talk with your doctor about which medicine is right for you if you are pregnant or planning to become pregnant.Other medicines treat symptoms of migraine, such as nausea and vomiting. They may be used alone or along with the other drugs that treat the migraine itself. Feverfew is an herb for migraines. It can be effective for some people. Before using feverfew, make sure your doctor approves. Herbal remedies sold in drugstores and health food stores are not regulated. Work with a trained herbalist when selecting herbs."}, "Multiple endocrine neoplasia (MEN) II": {"description": "See also: MEN I", "Possible Complications": "The spread of cancerous cells is a possible complication.", "Symptoms": ["Medullary carcinoma of the thyroid", "Pheochromocytoma", "Parathyroid adenoma", "Parathyroid hyperplasia"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose this condition, the health care provider looks for a mutation in the RET gene. This can be done with a blood test. Additional tests are done to determine which hormones are being overproduced.A physical examination may reveal:Enlarged lymph nodes in the neck, Fever, High blood pressure, Rapid heart rate, Thyroid nodules. Imaging tests used to identify tumors may include:Abdominal CT scan, Imaging of the kidneys or ureters, MIBG scintiscan, MRI of abdomen, Thyroid scan, Ultrasound of the thyroid. Blood tests are used to see how well certain glands in the body are working. They may include:Calcitonin level, Blood alkaline phosphatase, Blood calcium, Blood parathyroid hormone level, Blood phosphorus, Urine catecholamines, Urine metanephrine. Other tests or procedures that may be done include:Adrenal biopsy, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Thyroid biopsy, Parathyroid biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Surgery is needed to remove a pheochromocytoma, which can be life-threatening due to the hormones it makes.For medullary carcinoma of the thyroid, the thyroid gland and surrounding lymph nodes must be totally removed. Thyroid hormone replacement therapy is given after surgery.If a child is known to carry the RET gene mutation, surgery to remove the thyroid before it becomes cancerous is considered. This should be discussed with a physician who is very familiar with this condition. It would be done at an early age (before age 5) in people with known MEN IIa, and before age 6 months in people with MEN IIb. ", "Causes": "The cause of MEN II is a defect in a gene called RET. This defect causes many tumors to appear in the same person, but not necessarily at the same time.Involvement of the adrenal gland is usually with a tumor called a pheochromocytoma. Involvement of the thyroid gland is usually with a tumor called medullary carcinoma of the thyroid.Tumors in the thyroid, adrenal, or parathyroid glands may occur years apart.The disorder may occur at any age, and affects men and women equally. The main risk factor is a family history of MEN II.There are two subtypes of MEN II -- MEN IIa and IIb. MEN IIb is less common.", "Prevention": "Screening close relatives of people with MEN II may lead to early detection of the syndrome and related cancers, allowing potentially preventive intervention."}, "Malabsorption": {"description": "Malabsorption involves problems with the body's ability to take in nutrients from food.", "Possible Complications": "Long-term malabsorption can result in:Anemia, Gallstones, Kidney stones, Osteoporosis and bone disease, Malnutrition and vitamin deficiencies. ", "Symptoms": ["Bloating, cramping, and gas", "Bulky stools", "Chronic diarrhea (may not occur with vitamin malabsorption)", "Failure to thrive", "Fatty stools (steatorrhea)", "Muscle wasting", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will do an exam. Tests that may be done include:Blood and urine tests, CT scan of the abdomen, Hydrogen breath test, Schilling test for vitamin B12 deficiency, Secretin stimulation test, Small bowel biopsy, Stool culture or culture of small intestine aspirate, Stool fat testing (See: Quantitative stool fat test), X-rays of the small bowel or other imaging tests . ", "Treatment": "You may need to take extra vitamins and nutrients. ", "Causes": "Many diseases can cause malabsorption. Most often, malabsorption involves problems absorbing certain sugars, fats, proteins, or vitamins. It can also involve an overall\u00a0problem with\u00a0absorbing food.Some of the causes of malabsorption include:AIDS and HIV, Biliary atresia, Celiac disease, Certain medications (cholestyramine, tetracycline, some antacids, some medications used to treat obesity, colchicine, acarbose, phenytoin), Certain types of cancer (lymphoma, pancreatic cancer, gastrinomas), Certain types of surgery (gastrectomy with gastrojejunostomy, surgical treatments for obesity, partial or complete removal of the ileum), Cholestasis, Chronic liver disease, Cow's milk protein intolerance, Crohn's disease, Damage from radiation treatments, Parasite infection, including Giardia lamblia, Soy milk protein intolerance, Whipple's disease. Vitamin B12 malabsorption may be due to:Pernicious anemia, Bowel resection, Tapeworm infection (such as Diphyllobothrium latum). ", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the condition causing malabsorption."}, "Metastatic pleural tumor": {"description": "Metastatic pleural tumor is a type of cancer that has spread from another organ to the thin membrane (pleura) surrounding the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Side effects of chemotherapy or radiation therapy, Continued spread of the cancer . ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain, especially when taking a deep breath", "Cough", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask about your medical history and symptoms. Tests that may be done include:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Open pleural biopsy, Pleural fluid analysis, Pleural needle biopsy, Removal of fluid from around the lungs (thoracentesis) . ", "Treatment": "Pleural tumors usually cannot be removed with surgery. The original (primary) cancer should be treated. Chemotherapy and radiation therapy may be appropriate, depending on the type of primary cancer.Your health care provider may recommend thoracentesis if you have a lot of fluid collecting around your lungs and you have shortness of breath or low blood oxygen levels. This procedure removes the fluid and allows the lung to expand more, making it easier to breathe.To prevent the fluid from collecting again, medication may be placed directly into your chest space through a tube, called a catheter. Or, your surgeon may spray a medication or talc on the lung surface during the procedure. This helps seal the space around your lungs to prevent the fluid from returning. ", "Causes": "The blood and lymph systems can carry cancer cells to other organs in the body, where they can produce new growths or tumors. The spread of cancer cells to other parts of the body often occurs in patients who are dying of cancer.Almost any type of cancer can spread to the lungs and involve the pleura. ", "Prevention": "Early detection and treatment of primary cancers may prevent metastatic pleural tumors in some persons."}, "Myocardial contusion": {"description": "Myocardial contusion is a bruise of the heart muscle.", "Symptoms": ["Pain in the front of the ribs or breastbone\r\n", "Feeling that your heart is racing\r\n", "Light-headedness", "Nausea or vomiting", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. This may show:Bruise or scrapes on the chest wall, Crunching sensation when touching the skin if there are rib fractures and puncture of the lung, Fast heartbeat, Irregular heartbeat, Low blood pressure, Rapid or shallow breathing, Tenderness to the touch, Abnormal chest wall movement from rib fractures . Tests may include:Blood tests (cardiac enzymes, such as Troponin-I or T or CKMB), Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Electrocardiogram (ECG or EKG), Echocardiogram. These tests may show:Problems with the heart wall and the ability for the heart to contract, Fluid or blood in the thin sac surrounding the heart (pericardium), Rib fractures, lung or blood vessel injury, Problem with the heart's electrical signaling (such as a bundle branch block or other heart block), Fast heart beat starting at the sinus node of the heart (sinus tachycardia), Abnormal heart beat starting in the ventricles or lower chambers of the heart (ventricular dysrhythmia) . ", "Causes": "The most common causes are:Car crashes, Getting hit by a car, Cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR), Falling from a height, most often greater than 20 feet . ", "Prevention": "The following safety tips may help prevent a heart bruise:Wear a seat belt when driving., Choose a car with air bags., Take steps to ensure safety when working at heights. . ", "Treatment": "In most cases, you will be closely monitored for at least 24 hours. An electrocardiogram (ECG) will be done continually to check your heart function. Emergency room treatment may include:Catheter placement through a vein (IV), Medications to relieve pain, heart rate disturbances, or low blood pressure, Pacemaker (temporary, may be permanent later), Oxygen . Other therapies may be used to treat a heart injury, include:Chest tube placement, Draining blood from around the heart, Surgery to repair blood vessels in the chest . "}, "Metastatic brain tumor": {"description": "A metastatic brain tumor is cancer that started in another part of the body and spread to the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Brain herniation (fatal), Loss of ability to function or care for self, Loss of ability to interact, Permanent, severe loss of nervous system function that gets worse over time. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased coordination, clumsiness, falls", "Fever (sometimes)", "General ill feeling or lethargy", "Headache -- new or more severe than usual", "Memory loss, poor judgment, difficulty solving problems", "Numbness, tingling, pain, and other changes in sensation", "Personality changes", "Rapid emotional changes or strange behaviors", "Seizures that are new", "Speech difficulties", "Vision changes -- double vision, decreased vision", "Vomiting -- with or without nausea", "Weakness of a body area "], "Exams and Tests": "A neurologic examination can show brain and nervous system changes based on where the tumor is in the brain. Signs of increased pressure in the skull are also common. Some tumors may not show signs until they are very large. Then, they can cause a very quick decline in nervous system function.The original (primary) tumor may be found by examining tumor tissues from the brain.Tests may include:Cerebral angiography, Chest x-ray; mammogram; CT scans of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis to find the original tumor site, CT scan or MRI of the brain to confirm the diagnosis and identify the tumor location (MRI is usually more sensitive for finding tumors in the brain), EEG, Examination of tissue removed from the tumor during surgery or CT scan-guided biopsy to confirm the type of tumor, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size and type of the tumor, from where in the body it spread, and the patient's general health. The goals of treatment may be to relieve symptoms, improve functioning, or provide comfort.Radiation to the whole brain is often used to treat tumors that have spread to the brain, especially if there is more than one tumor.Surgery may be used when there is a single tumor and the cancer has not spread to other parts of the body. Some tumors may be completely removed. Tumors that are deep or that extend into brain tissue may be reduced in size (debulked).Surgery may reduce pressure and relieve symptoms in cases when the tumor cannot be removed.Chemotherapy for metastatic brain tumors is usually not as helpful as surgery or radiation. Some types of tumors, though, do respond to chemotherapy.Stereotactic radiosurgery may also be used. This form of radiation therapy focuses high-power x-rays on a small area of the brain.Medicines for brain tumor symptoms include:Antacids or antihistamines to control stress ulcers, Anticonvulsants such as phenytoin or levetiracetam to reduce or prevent seizures, Corticosteroids such as dexamethasone to reduce brain swelling, Osmotic diuretics such as urea or mannitol to reduce brain swelling, Pain medicines . When the cancer has spread, treatment may focus on relieving pain and other symptoms. This is called palliative or supportive care.Comfort measures, safety measures, physical therapy, occupational therapy, and other treatments may improve the patient's quality of life. Some people may want to seek legal advice to help them create an advance directive and power of attorney for health care.", "Causes": "Many tumor or cancer types can spread to the brain. The most common\u00a0are: Bladder cancer, Breast cancer, Certain sarcomas, Germ cell tumors, Kidney cancer, Leukemia, Lung cancer, Lymphoma, Melanoma. Some types of cancer\u00a0rarely spread to the brain, such as colon cancer\u00a0and prostate cancer. In other rare cases, a tumor can spread to the brain from an unknown location. This is called cancer of unknown primary (CUP)\u00a0origin.Growing brain tumors\u00a0can place pressure on nearby parts of the brain. Brain swelling due to these tumors also causes increased pressure within the skull.Brain tumors that spread are classified based on the location of the tumor in the brain, the type of tissue involved, the original location of the tumor, and other factors. In rare cases, doctors do not know the original location. This is called cancer of unknown primary (CUP) origin.Metastatic brain tumors occur in about one-fourth (25%) of all cancers that spread through the body. They are much more common than primary brain tumors (tumors that start in the brain)."}, "Myotonia congenita": {"description": "Myotonia congenita is an inherited condition that affects muscle relaxation. It is congenital, meaning that it is present from birth.", "Possible Complications": "Aspiration pneumonia caused by swallowing difficulties, Frequent choking, gagging, or trouble swallowing in an infant, Long-term (chronic) joint problems, Weakness of the abdominal muscles . ", "Symptoms": [" \r\n Difficulty swallowing \r\n ", "Gagging", "Stiff movements that improve when they are repeated", "Shortness of breath or tightening of the chest at the beginning of exercise"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may ask if there is a family history of myotonia congenita.Tests include:Electromyography (EMG, a test of the electrical activity of the muscles), Genetic testing, Muscle biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Mexiletine is a medication that treats symptoms of myotonia congenita. Other treatments include:Phenytoin, Procainamide, Quinine, Tocainide. ", "Causes": "Myotonia congenita is caused by a genetic change (mutation). It is passed down from either one or both parents to their children (inherited).Myotonia congenita is caused by a problem in the part of the muscle cells that are needed for muscles to relax. Abnormal repeated electrical signals occur in the muscles, causing a stiffness called myotonia.", "Prevention": "Couples who want to have children and who have a family history of myotonia congenita should consider genetic counseling."}, "Merthiolate poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Decreased urine output", "Drooling", "Extreme difficulty breathing", "Metallic taste", "Memory problems", "Mouth sores", "Seizures", "Shock", "Skin numbness", "Swelling within the throat, which may be severe", "Thirst", "Walking problems", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center."}, "Mitral stenosis": {"description": "Mitral stenosis is a disorder in which the mitral valve does not fully open. This restricts the flow of blood. ", "Possible Complications": "Atrial fibrillation and atrial flutter, Blood clots to the brain (stroke), intestines, kidneys, or other areas, Congestive heart failure, Pulmonary edema, Pulmonary hypertension. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest discomfort that increases with activity and extends to the arm, neck, jaw or other areas (This is rare) ", "Cough, possibly with bloody phlegm ", "Difficulty breathing during or after exercise, or when lying flat; ", "Waking up due to breathing problems (This is the most common symptom)", "Fatigue", "Frequent respiratory infections, such as bronchitis", "Feeling of pounding heart beat (palpitations)", "Swelling of feet or ankles", "Cough", "Poor feeding, or sweating when feeding", "Poor growth", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will listen to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope. A murmur, snap, or other abnormal heart sound may be heard. The typical murmur is a rumbling sound that is heard over the heart during the resting phase of the heartbeat. The sound often gets louder just before the heart begins to contract.The exam may also reveal an irregular heartbeat or lung congestion. Blood pressure is most often normal.Narrowing or blockage of the valve or swelling of the upper heart chambers may be seen on:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the heart, Echocardiogram, ECG (electrocardiogram), MRI of the heart, Transesophageal echocardiogram (TEE). ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the symptoms and condition of the heart and lungs. People with mild symptoms or none at all may not need treatment. For severe symptoms, you may need to go to the hospital for diagnosis and treatment.Medicines which can be used to treat symptoms of heart failure, high blood pressure and abnormal heart rhythms include:Diuretics (water pills), Nitrates, beta-blockers, Calcium channel blockers, ACE inhibitors, Angiotensin receptor blockers (ARBs), Digoxin. Anticoagulants (blood thinners) are used to prevent blood clots from forming and traveling to other parts of the body.Antibiotics may be used in some cases of mitral stenosis. People who have had rheumatic fever may need long-term preventive treatment with the antibiotic penicillin.In the past, most patients with heart valve problems were given antibiotics before dental work or invasive procedures, such as colonoscopy. The antibiotics were given to prevent an infection of the damaged heart valve. However, antibiotics are now used much less often. Ask your doctor whether you need to use antibiotics.Some people may need heart surgery or procedures to treat mitral stenosis. These include:Percutaneous mitral balloon valvotomy (also called valvuloplasty). During this procedure, a tube (catheter) is inserted into a vein, usually in the leg. It is threaded up into the heart. A balloon on the tip of the catheter is inflated, widening the mitral valve and improving blood flow. This procedure may be tried instead of surgery in people with a less damaged mitral valve. Even when successful, the procedure may need to be repeated months or years later., Surgery to repair or replace the mitral valve. Replacement valves can be made from different materials. Some may last for decades, and others can wear out and need to be replaced.. Children often need surgery to either repair or replace the mitral valve.", "Causes": "Blood that flows between different chambers of your heart must flow through a valve. The valve between the two chambers on the left side of your heart is called the mitral valve. It opens up enough so that blood can flow from the upper chamber of your heart (left atria) to the lower chamber (left ventricle). It then closes, keeping blood from flowing backwards. Mitral stenosis means that the valve cannot open enough. As a result, less blood flows to the body. The upper heart chamber swells as pressure builds up. Blood and fluid may then collect in the lung tissue (pulmonary edema), making it hard to breathe. In adults, mitral stenosis occurs most often in people who have had rheumatic fever. This is a disease that can develop after an illness with strep throat that was not properly treated. The valve problems develop 5 - 10 years or more after\u00a0having\u00a0rheumatic fever. Symptoms may not show up for even longer. Rheumatic fever is becoming rare in the United States because strep infections are\u00a0most often\u00a0treated. This has made mitral stenosis less common.Rarely, other factors can cause mitral stenosis in adults. These include: Calcium deposits forming around the mitral valve, Radiation treatment to the chest, Some medications . Children may be born with mitral stenosis (congenital) or other birth defects involving the heart that cause mitral stenosis. Often, there are other heart defects present along with the mitral stenosis.Mitral stenosis may run in families.", "Prevention": "Follow your health care provider's recommendations for treating conditions that can cause valve disease. Treat strep infections promptly to prevent rheumatic fever. Tell your health care provider if you have a family history of congenital heart diseases.Mitral stenosis itself often cannot be prevented, but complications can be prevented. Tell your health care provider about your heart valve disease before you receive any medical treatment. Discuss whether you need preventive antibiotics."}, "Measles": {"description": "Measles is a very contagious (easily spread) illness caused by a virus.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of measles infection may include:Bronchitis, Encephalitis, Ear infection (otitis media), Pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Usually appears 3\u00a0to 5 days after the\u00a0first signs of being sick ", "May last 4\u00a0to 7 days", "Usually starts on the head and spreads to other areas, moving down the body", "May appear as flat, discolored areas (macules) and solid, red, raised areas (papules) that later join together", "Itches ", "Bloodshot eyes", "Cough", "Fever", "Light sensitivity (photophobia)", "Muscle pain", "Redness and irritation of the eyes (conjunctivitis)", "Runny nose", "Sore throat", "Tiny white spots inside the mouth (Koplik's spots) "], "Exams and Tests": "Measles serology, Viral culture (rarely done). ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for the measles.The following may relieve symptoms:Acetaminophen (Tylenol), Bed rest, Humidified air. Some children may need vitamin A supplements, which reduce the risk of death and complications in children who do not get\u00a0enough vitamin A. ", "Causes": "Measles is spread by contact with droplets from the nose, mouth, or throat of an infected person. Sneezing and coughing can put contaminated droplets into the air.If one person has the measles, 90% of the people who come in contact with that person will get the measles, unless they are protected. People who had measles or who have been vaccinated against measles are protected from the disease. Vaccination works so well that in 2000, measles had been eliminated in the United States. However, unvaccinated people who travel to other countries where measles is common have brought the disease back to the United States. This has led to recent outbreaks of measles in groups of people who are unvaccinated.Some parents do not let their children get vaccinated. This is because of unfounded fears that the MMR vaccine, which protects against measles, mumps, and rubella, can cause autism. Parents and caregivers should know that:Large studies of thousands of children have found no connection between this or any vaccine and autism.Reviews by all major health organizations in the United States, Great Britain, and elsewhere all found NO LINK between the MMR vaccine and autism.The study that had first reported a risk of autism from this vaccine has been proven to be fraudulent.The most recent measles outbreak started in Disneyland Resort in California. Between January 1 and April 3, 2015, 162 people from 19 states and the Distict of Columbia have been reported to have measles:Arizona, California, Colorado, Delaware, District of Columbia, Florida, Georgia, Illinois, Michigan, Minnesota, Nebraska, New Jersey, New York, Nevada, Oklahoma, Pennsylvania, South Dakota, Texas, Utah, Washington . ", "Prevention": "Getting vaccinated is a very effective way to prevent measles. People who are not immunized, or who have not received the full immunization are at high risk\u00a0of catching the disease.Taking serum immune globulin within 6 days after being exposed to the virus can reduce the risk of developing measles or make the disease less severe."}, "Marfan syndrome": {"description": "Disorders of connective tissue affect the skeletal system, cardiovascular system, eyes, and skin.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Aortic regurgitation, Aortic rupture, Bacterial endocarditis, Dissecting aortic aneurysm, Enlargement of the base of the aorta, Heart failure, Mitral valve prolapse, Scoliosis, Vision problems . ", "Symptoms": ["A chest that sinks in or sticks out, called funnel chest (pectus excavatum) or pigeon breast (pectus carinatum)", "Flat feet", "Highly arched palate and crowded teeth", "Hypotonia", "Joints that are too flexible (but the elbows may be less flexible)", "Learning disability", "Movement of the lens of the eye from its normal position (dislocation)", "Nearsightedness", "Small lower jaw (micrognathia)", "Spine that curves to one side (scoliosis)", "Thin, narrow face "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. The joints may move around more than normal. There may also be signs of:Aneurysm, Collapsed lung, Heart valve problems . An eye exam may show:Defects of the lens or cornea, Retinal detachment, Vision problems . The following tests may be performed:Echocardiogram, Fibrillin-1 mutation testing (in some people) . An echocardiogram or another test should be done every year to look at the base of the aorta and possibly the heart valves.", "Treatment": "Vision problems should be treated when possible.Monitor for scoliosis, especially during the teenage years.Medicine to slow the heart rate may help prevent stress on the aorta. To avoid injuring the aorta, people with the condition should avoid participating in contact sports. Some people may need surgery to replace the aortic root and valve.People with Marfan syndrome who have heart valve conditions may need to take antibiotics before dental procedures to prevent endocarditis (infection of the valves). Pregnant women with Marfan syndrome must be monitored very closely because of the increased stress on the heart and aorta.", "Causes": "Marfan syndrome is caused by defects in a gene called fibrillin-1. Fibrillin-1 plays an important role as the building block for connective tissue in the body.The gene defect also causes the long bones of the body to grow too much. People with this syndrome have tall height and long arms and legs. How this overgrowth happens is not well understood.Other areas of the body that are affected include:Lung tissue (there may be a pneumothorax, in which air can escape from the lung into the chest cavity and collapse the lung), The aorta, the main blood vessel that takes blood from the heart to the body may stretch or become weak (called aortic dilation or aortic aneurysm), The eyes, causing cataracts and other problems (such as a dislocation of the lenses), The skin, Tissue covering the spinal cord . In most cases, Marfan syndrome is passed down through families (inherited). However, up to 30% of patients have no family history, which is called \"sporadic.\" In sporadic cases, the syndrome is believed to be caused by a new gene change.", "Prevention": "Spontaneous new gene mutations leading to Marfan (less than 1/3 of cases) cannot be prevented. If you have Marfan syndrome, see your doctor at least once every year."}, "Myocarditis - pediatric": {"description": "Pediatric myocarditis is inflammation of the heart muscle in an infant or young child.", "Possible Complications": "Enlargement of the heart that leads to reduced heart function (dilated cardiomyopathy), Heart failure, Heart rhythm problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiousness", "Failure to thrive or poor weight gain", "Feeding difficulties", "Fever and other symptoms of infection", "Listlessness", "Low urine output (a sign of decreasing kidney function)", "Pale, cool hands and feet (a sign of poor circulation)", "Rapid breathing", "Rapid heart rate ", "Belly area pain and nausea", "Chest pain", "Cough", "Fatigue", "Swelling (edema) in the legs, feet, and face "], "Exams and Tests": "Pediatric myocarditis can be hard to diagnose because the signs and symptoms often mimic those of other heart and lung diseases, or a bad case of the flu.The doctor may hear a rapid heartbeat or abnormal heart sounds while listening to the child's chest with a stethoscope. A physical exam may detect fluid in the lungs and swelling in the legs in older children.There may be signs of infection, including fever and rashes.A chest x-ray can show enlargement (swelling) of the heart. If the health care provider suspects myocarditis based on the exam and chest x-ray, an electrocardiogram may also be done to help make the diagnosis.Other tests that may be needed include:Blood cultures to check for infection, Blood tests to look for antibodies against viruses or the heart muscle itself, Blood tests to check liver and kidney function, Complete blood count, Heart biopsy (the most accurate way to confirm the diagnosis, but not always needed), Special tests to check for the presence of viruses in the blood (viral PCR) . ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for myocarditis. The heart muscle inflammation will often go away on its own. The goal of treatment is to support heart function until the inflammation goes away. Many children with this condition are admitted to a hospital. Activity often needs to be limited while the heart is inflamed because it can strain the heart.Treatment may include:Antibiotics to fight bacterial infection, Anti-inflammatory medicines called steroids to control inflammation, Intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIG), a medicine made of substances (called antibodies) that the body produces to fight infection, to control the inflammatory process, Mechanical support using a machine\u00a0to help the heart function (in extreme cases), Medicines to treat symptoms of heart failure, Medicines to treat abnormal heart rhythms . ", "Causes": "Myocarditis is rare in young children. It is slightly more common in older children and adults. It is often worse in newborns and young infants than in children over age 2. Most cases in children are caused by a virus that reaches the heart. These can include the influenza (flu) virus, Coxsackie virus, parovirus, and adenovirus. It may also be caused by bacterial infections such as Lyme disease.Other causes of pediatric myocarditis include:Allergic reactions to certain medicines, Exposure to chemicals in the environment, Infections due to fungus or parasites, Radiation, Some diseases (autoimmune disorders) that cause inflammation throughout the body, Some drugs. The heart muscle may be directly damaged by the virus or the bacteria that infect it. The body's immune response can also damage the heart muscle (called the myocardium) in the process of fighting the infection. This can lead to symptoms of heart failure.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. However, prompt testing and treatment may\u00a0reduce the disease risk. "}, "Mesothelioma - benign-fibrous": {"description": "See also: Malignant mesothelioma", "Possible Complications": "Fluid escaping into the membranes around the lungs (pleural effusion) is a complication.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Chronic cough", "Shortness of breath\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical examination, the health care provider may notice a clubbed appearance of the fingers. The tumor is usually found by accident when a chest x-ray is done for other reasons.Other tests that may show benign mesothelioma include:CT scan of the chest, Open lung biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is usually to remove the tumor.", "Causes": "This type of tumor more often affects men than women. "}, "McCune-Albright syndrome": {"description": "McCune-Albright syndrome is a genetic disease that affects the bones and color (pigmentation) of the skin.", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, Cosmetic problems from bone abnormalities, Deafness, Osteitis fibrosa cystica, Premature puberty, Repeated broken bones, Tumors of the bone (rare). ", "Symptoms": ["Bone fractures", "Deformities of the bones in the face", "Gigantism", "Irregular, large patchy cafe-au-lait spots, especially on the back "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show signs of:Abnormal bone growth in the skull, Abnormal heart rhythms (arrhythmias), Acromegaly, Adrenal abnormalities, Gigantism, Hyperparathyroidism, Hyperthyroidism, Hypophosphatemia, Large cafe-au-lait spots on the skin, Liver disease, jaundice, fatty liver, Ovarian cysts, Pituitary or thyroid tumors, Scar-like tissue in the bone (fibrous dysplasia) . Tests may show too much:Adrenal hormones, Blood prolactin, Growth hormone. Other tests that may be done include:MRI of the head, X-rays of the bones. Genetic testing is available for the GNAS1 gene.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for McCune-Albright syndrome. Drugs that block estrogen production, such as testolactone, have been tried with some success.Adrenal abnormalities (such as Cushing syndrome) may be treated with surgery to remove the adrenal glands. Gigantism and pituitary adenoma will need to be treated with medicines that block hormone production, or with surgery.Bone abnormalities (fibrous dysplasia) are sometimes removed with surgery.Limit the number of x-rays taken of affected areas of the body.", "Causes": "McCune-Albright syndrome is caused by mutations in the GNAS1 gene. A small number, but not all, of the patient's cells contain this faulty gene (mosaicism).This disease is not inherited. "}, "Methyl salicylate overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Kidney failure", "Eye irritation", "Loss of vision", "Ringing in the ears", "Throat swelling ", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure", "Difficulty breathing", "No breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Agitation", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Deafness", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Headache ", "Fever", "Seizures ", "Nausea", "Vomiting, possibly bloody "], "description": "See also: Sports cream overdose"}, "Meningitis - tuberculous": {"description": "Tuberculous meningitis is an infection of the tissues covering the brain and spinal cord (meninges).", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Build-up of fluid between the skull and brain (subdural effusion), Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck (meningismus)", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in babies\r\n ", "Decreased consciousness", "Poor feeding or irritability in children", "Unusual posture, with the head and neck arched backwards (opisthotonos)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. This will usually show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. A lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") is an important test in diagnosing meningitis. This test is done to collect a sample of spinal fluid for examination. More than one\u00a0sample may be needed to make the diagnosis.Other tests that may be done include:Biopsy of the brain or meninges, Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CSF examination for cell count, glucose, and protein, CT scan of the head, Gram stain, other special stains, and culture of CSF, Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of CSF, Skin test for tuberculosis (PPD), Other tests to look for tuberculosis. ", "Treatment": "You will be given several\u00a0medicines to fight the tuberculosis bacteria.\u00a0Sometimes, treatment is started even if your doctor thinks you have the disease, but testing hasn't confirmed it yet. Treatment usually lasts for at least 12 months. Systemic steroids may also be used.", "Causes": "Tuberculous meningitis is caused by Mycobacterium tuberculosis, the bacteria that cause tuberculosis. The bacteria spread to the brain and spine from another site in the body.Risk factors include a history of:AIDS, Excessive alcohol use, Pulmonary tuberculosis, Weakened immune system. Tuberculous meningitis is a very rare disorder in the U.S.", "Prevention": "The\u00a0BCG vaccine may help prevent severe forms of tuberculosis, such as meningitis, in very young children who live in areas where the disease is common.Treating people who have signs of a non-active (dormant) tuberculosis infection can prevent the spread of tuberculosis. A PPD test and other tuberculosis tests can\u00a0be done to tell if you have this type of infection.\u00a0\u00a0"}, "Mesenteric artery ischemia": {"description": "Mesenteric artery ischemia occurs when there is a narrowing or blockage of one or more of the three major arteries that supply the small and large intestines. These are called the mesenteric arteries. ", "Possible Complications": "Tissue death from lack of blood flow (infarction) in the intestines is the most serious complication of mesenteric artery ischemia. Surgery may be needed to remove the dead portion.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain after eating", "Diarrhea", "Diarrhea", "Sudden severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "In acute mesenteric ischemia, blood tests may show a higher than normal white blood cell count and changes in the blood acid level. There may be bleeding in the GI tract.A Doppler ultrasound or CT scan may show problems with the blood vessels and the intestine.A mesenteric angiogram is a test that involves injecting a special dye into your bloodstream to highlight the arteries of the intestine. Then x-rays are taken of the area. This can show the location of the blockage in the artery.", "Treatment": "Acute mesenteric artery ischemia is an emergency. Treatment can include:Medicines to dissolve blood clots and widen the mesenteric arteries (vasodilators) if the problem is caused by a blood clot., Surgery to treat mesenteric ischemia., Surgery for chronic mesenteric artery ischemia involves removing the blockage and reconnecting the arteries to the aorta. A bypass around the blockage is another procedure. It is usually done with a plastic tube graft., Insertion of a stent. A stent may be used to as an alternative to surgery to enlarge the blockage in the mesenteric artery or to deliver medicine directly to the affected area. This is a new technique and it should only be done by experienced health care providers. The outcome is usually better with surgery.. ", "Causes": "Narrowing of the arteries that supply blood to the intestine causes mesenteric ischemia. The arteries that supply blood to the intestines run directly from the aorta, the main artery from the heart.Mesenteric artery ischemia is often seen in people who have hardening of the arteries in other parts of the body. The condition is more common in smokers and in people with high blood pressure or high blood cholesterol.Mesenteric ischemia may also be caused by a blood clot (embolus) that suddenly blocks one of the mesenteric arteries. The clots usually come from the heart or aorta. These clots are more commonly seen in people with abnormal heart rhythms (arrhythmias), such as atrial fibrillation.", "Prevention": "The following lifestyle changes can reduce your risk for narrowing of the arteries:Getting regular exercise, Following a healthy diet, Treating heart rhythm problems, Keeping your blood cholesterol and blood sugar under control, Quitting smoking. "}, "Mesothelioma - malignant": {"description": "Malignant mesothelioma is an uncommon cancerous tumor of the lining of the lung and chest cavity (pleura) or lining of the abdomen (peritoneum). It is due to long-term asbestos exposure.", "Possible Complications": "Side effects of chemotherapy or radiation, Continued spread of cancer to other organs. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal bloating", "Abdominal pain", "Chest pain, especially when taking a deep breath", "Cough", "Fatigue", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask about your medical history and symptoms. Tests that may be done include:Chest x-ray, Chest CT, Cytology of pleural fluid, Open lung biopsy, Pleural biopsy. Mesothelioma is often hard to diagnose under the microscope. It can be hard to distinguish between this disease and similar conditions and tumors.", "Treatment": "Malignant mesothelioma is a difficult cancer to treat.There is usually no cure, unless the disease is found extremely early and the tumor can be completely removed with surgery. Most of the time when the disease is diagnosed it is too advanced for surgery. Chemotherapy or radiation may be used to reduce symptoms. Combining certain chemotherapy drugs may help decrease symptoms, but it will not cure the cancer.Untreated, most patients survive about 9 months.Consider participating in a clinical trial (test of new treatments), which may give you more treatment options.Pain relief, oxygen, and other supportive treatments may also help relieve symptoms.", "Causes": "Long-term exposure to asbestos -- a fire-resistant material -- is the biggest risk factor. Asbestos was once commonly found in insulation, ceiling and roofing vinyls, cement, and automotive brake materials. Although many asbestos workers smoked, experts do not believe smoking itself is a cause of this condition.Malignant mesothelioma affects men more often than women. The average age at diagnosis is 60. Most people seem to develop the condition about 30 years after being in contact with the asbestos.", "Prevention": "Avoid exposure to asbestos."}, "Malignant teratoma": {"description": "Malignant teratoma is a type of cancer made of cysts that contain one or more of the three layers of cells found in a developing baby (embryo). These layers are called ectoderms, mesoderms, and endoderms.\u00a0Malignant teratoma\u00a0is one type of germ cell tumor.", "Possible Complications": "The cancer can spread throughout the body and there may be complications of surgery or related to chemotherapy.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain or pressure", "Cough", "Fatigue", "Limited ability to tolerate exercise", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam, which may reveal a blockage of the veins entering the center of the chest due to increased pressure in the chest area.\u00a0The following tests help diagnose the tumor:Chest x-ray, CT scans of the chest, abdomen, and pelvis, Blood tests to check beta-HCG, alpha fetoprotein (AFP), and lactate dehydrogenase (LDH)\u00a0levels, Mediastinoscopy with biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Chemotherapy is used to treat the tumor. A combination of medicines (usually cisplatin, etoposide, and bleomycin) is commonly used.After chemotherapy is complete, CT scans are taken again to see if any\u00a0of the tumor remains. Surgery may be recommended if there is a possibility that the cancer will grow back in that area or if any cancer has been left behind.", "Causes": "Malignant teratoma occurs most often in young men in their 20s - 30s. It is often located in the front chest area (mediastinum). Most malignant teratomas can spread throughout the body, and have spread by the time of diagnosis.A number of other cancers are often associated with these tumors, including:Acute myelogenous leukemia (AML), Embryonal rhabdomyosarcoma, Malignant histiocytosis, Myelodysplasia (MDS), Small cell undifferentiated carcinoma . "}, "Mouthwash overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Burns and damage to the clear covering of the front of the eye (cornea)", "Coma", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Low body temperature", "Low blood pressure", "Low blood sugar", "Nausea", "Rapid heart rate", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Skin redness and pain", "Slowed breathing", "Slurred speech", "Throat pain", "Uncoordinated movement", "Unconsciousness", "Unresponsive reflexes", "Urination problems (too much or too little urine)", "Vomiting (may contain blood)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Myristica oil poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Double vision", "Dry mouth", "Eye irritation", "Abdominal pain", "Dehydration", "Nausea", "Convulsions", "Rapid heartbeat", "Agitation", "Anxiety", "Brief euphoria (feeling of being drunk)", "Convulsions", "Delirium", "Drowsiness", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Light-headedness", "Seizures", "Tremors", "Flushing"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Munchausen syndrome by proxy": {"description": "Munchausen syndrome by proxy is a mental illness and a form of child abuse. The caretaker of a child, usually a mother, either makes up fake symptoms or causes real symptoms to make it look like the child is sick.", "Symptoms": ["Add blood to the child's urine or stool", "Withhold food so the child looks like they can't gain weight", "Heat up thermometers so it looks like the child has a fever ", "Make up lab results", "Give the child drugs to make the child throw up or have diarrhea", "Infect an intravenous line (IV) to make the child sick", "Most people with this problem are mothers with small children. Some are adult children taking care of an elderly parent.", "The mother often works in health care and knows a lot about medical care. She can describe the child's symptoms in great medical detail. She likes to be very involved with the health care team and is liked by the staff for the care she gives her child.", "These mothers are really involved with their children. They seem devoted to the child. This makes it hard for health professionals to see a diagnosis of Munchausen syndrome by proxy.", "The child sees a lot of doctors and has been in the hospital a lot, too.", "The child often has had many tests, surgeries, or other procedures.", "The child has strange symptoms that don't quite fit any disease. The symptoms do not match the test results.", "The child's symptoms are reported by the mother, but are never seen by health care professionals. The symptoms are gone in the hospital, but start again when the child goes home. ", "Blood samples do not match the child's blood type.", "Drugs or chemicals are found in the child's urine, blood, or stool."], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose Munchausen syndrome by proxy, doctors and nurses have to see the clues. They have to review the child\u2019s medical record to see what has happened with the child over time. Unfortunately, Munchausen syndrome by proxy often goes undiagnosed.", "Causes": "No one is sure what causes Munchausen syndrome by proxy. Sometimes the person was abused as a child or has Munchausen syndrome (fake illness for themselves).", "Prevention": "Recognition of Munchausen syndrome by proxy in the child-parent relationship can prevent continued abuse and unnecessary, expensive, and possibly dangerous medical testing.", "Treatment": "The child needs to be protected. They may need to be removed from the direct care of the parent.Children may require medical care to treat complications from injuries, infections, medications, surgeries, or tests. They also need psychiatric care to deal with depression, anxiety, and post-traumatic stress disorder that can happen with child abuse.Treatment usually involves individual and family therapy. Because this is a form of child abuse, the syndrome must be reported to the authorities.\r\n"}, "Marine animal stings or bites": {"Symptoms": ["Cramps", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing", "Groin pain, armpit pain", "Fever", "Nausea or vomiting", "Paralysis", "Sweating", "Unconsciousness or sudden death from heart rhythm irregularities", "Weakness, faintness, dizziness"], "Causes": "Causes include bites or stings from various types of marine life, including: jellyfish, Portuguese Man-of-War, stingray, stonefish, scorpion fish, catfish, sea urchins, sea anemone, hydroid, coral, cone shell, sharks, barracudas, and moray or electric eels.", "description": "Almost 2000 species of animals found in the ocean are either venomous or poisonous to humans, and many can produce severe illness or death. An estimated 40,000 to 50,000 bites or stings from marine creatures occur each year. In recent years, the number of injuries caused by these animals has increased dramatically because of the greater number of people who take part in scuba diving, snorkeling, surfing and water sports. These animals are not usually aggressive, and many are stuck to the ocean floor. Most venomous or poisonous marine animals in the United States are found along the California, Gulf of Mexico, and southern Atlantic coasts.", "Prevention": "Swim near a lifeguard.\r\n, Observe posted signs that may warn of danger from jellyfish or other hazardous marine life.\r\n, Do not touch unfamiliar marine life. Even dead animals or severed tentacles may contain poisonous venom.. "}, "Metal polish poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Eyes, ears, nose, and throat", "Severe pain or burning in the throat, mouth area, nose, eyes, or ears", "Vision loss ", "Abdominal pain -- severe", "Bloody stools", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting, possibly with blood ", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Nervousness", "Staggering", "Stupor", "Weakness ", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Meibomianitis": {"description": "Meibomianitis is inflammation of the meibomian glands, a group of oil-releasing (sebaceous) glands in the eyelids. These glands have tiny openings to release oils onto the surface of the cornea.", "Symptoms": ["Swelling and redness of eyelid edges", "Symptoms of dry eye", "Slight blurring of vision due to excess oil in tears -- usually cleared by blinking", "Frequent styes"], "Exams and Tests": "Meibomianitis can be diagnosed by eye examination. Special tests are not required.", "Causes": "Any condition that increases the oily secretions of the meibomian glands will allow excess oils to\u00a0build up\u00a0on the edges of the eyelids. This allows for\u00a0the excess growth of bacteria that are normally present on the skin.These problems can be caused by allergies,\u00a0hormone changes\u00a0during adolescence, or skin conditions such as rosacea and acne.Meibomianitis is often associated with blepharitis, which can cause\u00a0a buildup of a\u00a0dandruff-like substance at the base of the eyelashes.", "Prevention": "Keeping your eyelids clean\u00a0and treating associated skin conditions will help prevent meibomianitis.", "Treatment": "Standard treatment involves:Carefully cleansing the edges of the lids, Applying moist heat to the affected eye . These treatments will usually reduce symptoms.Your health care provider may prescribe an antibiotic ointment to apply\u00a0to the lid's edge.Other treatments may include:Having an eye doctor perform meibomian gland expression to help clear the glands of secretions, Inserting a small tube (cannula) into each gland opening to wash out thickened oil, Taking\u00a0tetracycline antibiotics for several weeks, Using LipoFlow, a device that automatically warms the eyelid and helps clear the glands, Taking fish oil to improve the flow of oil from the glands . Any general skin condition such as acne or rosacea may also require treatment."}, "Malocclusion of teeth": {"description": "Malocclusion means the teeth are not aligned properly.", "Possible Complications": "Tooth decay\r\n, Discomfort during treatment\r\n, Irritation of mouth and gums (gingivitis) caused by appliances\r\n, Chewing or speaking difficulty during treatment. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal alignment of teeth\r\n", "Abnormal appearance of the face\r\n", "Difficulty or discomfort when biting or chewing\r\n", "Speech difficulties (rare), including lisp\r\n", "Mouth breathing (breathing through the mouth without closing the lips)"], "Exams and Tests": "Most problems with teeth alignment are discovered by a dentist during a routine exam. The dentist may pull your cheek outward and ask you to bite down to check how well your back teeth come together. If there is any problem, the dentist may refer you to an orthodontist for diagnosis and treatment.You may need to have dental x-rays, head or skull x-rays, or facial x-rays. Diagnostic models of the teeth are often needed to diagnose the problem.", "Treatment": "Very few people have perfect teeth alignment. However, most problems are minor and do not require treatment.Malocclusion is the most common reason for referral to an orthodontist.The goal of treatment is to correct the positioning of the teeth. Correcting moderate or severe malocclusion can:Make teeth are easier to clean and\u00a0decrease risk of tooth decay and periodontal diseases (gingivitis or periodontitis). , Eliminate strain on the teeth, jaws, and muscles. This lessens the risk of breaking a tooth and may reduce symptoms of temporomandibular joint disorders.. Treatments may include:Braces or other appliances: Metal bands are placed around some teeth, or metal, ceramic, or plastic bonds are attached to the surface of the teeth. Wires or springs apply force to the teeth. Clear braces (aligners) without wires may be used in some patients., Removal of one or more teeth: This may be needed if overcrowding is part of the problem., Repair of rough or irregular teeth: Teeth may be adjusted down, reshaped, and bonded or capped. Misshapen restorations and dental appliances should be repaired., Surgery: Surgical reshaping to lengthen or shorten the jaw (orthognathic surgery) is needed in rare cases. Wires, plates, or screws may be used to stabilize the jaw bone. . It is important to brush and floss your teeth every day and have regular visits to a general dentist. Plaque builds up on braces and may permanently mark teeth or cause tooth decay if not properly cared for.You will need a retainer to stabilize your teeth after having braces.", "Causes": "Occlusion refers to the alignment of teeth and the way that the upper and lower teeth fit together (bite). The upper teeth should fit slightly over the lower teeth. The points of the molars should fit the grooves of the opposite molar.The upper teeth keep the cheeks and lips from being bitten and the lower teeth protect the tongue.Malocclusion is most often hereditary. This mean the condition is passed down through families. It may be caused by a difference between the size of the upper and lower jaws or between jaw and tooth size, which results in overcrowding or abnormal bite patterns. The shape of the jaws or birth defects such as cleft lip and palate may also be reasons for malocclusion. Other causes include:Childhood habits such as thumb sucking, tongue thrusting, pacifier use beyond age 3, and prolonged use of a bottle, Extra teeth, lost teeth, impacted teeth, or abnormally shaped teeth, Ill-fitting dental fillings, crowns, appliances, retainers, or braces, Misalignment of jaw fractures after a severe injury, Tumors of the mouth and jaw. There are different categories of malocclusion: Class 1 malocclusion is the most common. The bite is normal, but the upper teeth slightly overlap the lower teeth., Class 2 malocclusion, called retrognathism or overbite, occurs when the upper jaw and teeth severely overlap the bottom jaw and teeth., Class 3 malocclusion, called prognathism or underbite, occurs when the lower jaw protrudes or juts forward, causing the lower jaw and teeth to overlap the upper jaw and teeth. . ", "Prevention": "Many types of malocclusion are not preventable. It may be necessary to control habits such as thumb sucking. Detecting and treating the problem early allows for quicker results and\u00a0more success. "}, "Merbromin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Decreased urine output (may stop completely)", "Excessive saliva", "Metallic taste", "Mouth sores", "Swelling in the throat (can be severe and completely close the throat)", "Thirst", "Diarrhea (bloody)", "Stomach pain (severe)", "Vomiting", "Shock", "Breathing difficulty (severe)", "Dizziness", "Memory problems", "Problems with balance and coordination", "Speech difficulties"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Milk-alkali syndrome": {"description": "Milk-alkali syndrome is a condition in which there is a high level of calcium in the body (hypercalcemia). This causes a shift in the body's acid/base balance toward alkaline (metabolic alkalosis). As a result, there can be a loss\u00a0of kidney function.", "Possible Complications": "The most common complications include:Calcium deposits in tissues (calcinosis), Kidney failure, Kidney stones. ", "Symptoms": ["Back, middle of the body, and back pain in the kidney area (related to kidney stones)", "Confusion, strange behavior", "Constipation", "Depression", "Excessive urination", "Fatigue", "Irregular heart beat (arrhythmia)", "Nausea or vomiting", "Other problems that can result from kidney failure "], "Exams and Tests": "Calcium deposits within the tissue of the kidney (nephrocalcinosis) may be seen on:X-rays, CT scan, Ultrasound. Other tests used to make a diagnosis:Electrolyte levels, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Kidney function, Blood gas, Blood calcium level . ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves reducing or eliminating calcium supplements and antacids that contain calcium. Vitamin D supplements also need to be reduced or stopped. ", "Causes": "Milk-alkali syndrome is almost always caused by taking too many calcium supplements, usually in the form of calcium carbonate. Calcium carbonate is a common calcium supplement. It is often taken to prevent or treat bone loss (osteoporosis). Calcium carbonate is also an ingredient found in antacids (such as Tums). A high level of vitamin D in the body, such as from taking supplements, can worsen milk-alkali syndrome.Calcium deposits in the kidneys and in other tissues can occur in milk-alkali syndrome.", "Prevention": "If you use calcium-containing antacids often, tell your doctor about digestive problems. If you are trying to prevent osteoporosis, do not take more than 1.5 grams of calcium per day unless instructed by your medical provider."}, "Multiple sclerosis": {"description": "Multiple sclerosis is an autoimmune disease that affects the brain and spinal cord (central nervous system).", "Possible Complications": "Depression, Difficulty swallowing, Difficulty thinking, Less and less ability to care for self, Need for indwelling catheter, Osteoporosis or thinning of the bones, Pressure sores, Side effects of medications used to treat the disorder, Urinary tract infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Loss of balance", "Muscle spasms", "Numbness or abnormal sensation in any area", "Problems moving arms or legs", "Problems walking", "Problems with coordination and making small movements", "Tremor in one or more arms or legs", "Weakness in one or more arms or legs ", "Constipation and stool leakage", "Difficulty beginning to urinate", "Frequent need to urinate", "Strong urge to urinate", "Urine leakage (incontinence) ", "Double vision", "Eye discomfort", "Uncontrollable rapid eye movements", "Vision loss (usually affects one eye at a time)", "Facial pain", "Painful muscle spasms", "Tingling, crawling, or burning feeling in the arms and legs", "Decreased attention span, poor judgment, and memory loss", "Difficulty reasoning and solving problems", "Depression or feelings of sadness", "Dizziness and balance problems", "Hearing loss", "Problems with erections", "Problems with vaginal lubrication", "Slurred or difficult-to-understand speech", "Trouble chewing and swallowing"], "Exams and Tests": "Symptoms of MS may\u00a0mimic\u00a0those of many other nervous system problems.\u00a0MS is diagnosed by ruling out other conditions.People who have a form of MS called relapsing-remitting may have a history of at least two attacks separated by a period of reduced or no symptoms.In other people, the disease may slowly get worse and they may have clear attacks. This form is called chronic progressive MS.The\u00a0doctor may suspect MS if there are decreases in the function of two different parts of the central nervous system (such as abnormal reflexes) at two different times.An exam of the nervous\u00a0system may show reduced nerve function in one area of the body.\u00a0Or the reduced nerve function may be\u00a0spread over many parts of the body. This may include:Abnormal nerve reflexes, Decreased ability to move a part of the body, Decreased or abnormal sensation, Other loss of nervous system functions, such as vision. An eye examination may show:Abnormal pupil responses, Changes in the visual fields or eye movements, Decreased visual acuity, Problems with the inside parts of the eye, Rapid eye movements triggered when the eye moves. Tests to diagnose multiple sclerosis include:Blood tests to rule out other conditions that are\u00a0similar to MS, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap) for cerebrospinal fluid tests, including CSF oligoclonal banding, MRI scan of the brain and MRI scan of the spine are important to help diagnose and follow MS, Nerve function study (evoked potential test, such as brainstem auditory evoked response) . ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for multiple sclerosis at this time. But, there are treatments that may slow the disease. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms and help you maintain a normal quality of life.Medicines are often taken long-term. These include:Medicines to slow the disease, Steroids to decrease the severity of attacks, Medicines to control symptoms such as muscle spasms, urinary problems, fatigue, or mood problems\u00a0\u00a0 . Medicines are more effective for the relapsing-remitting form than for other forms of MS.The following may also be helpful for people with MS:Physical therapy, speech therapy, occupational therapy, and support groups, Assistive devices, such as wheelchairs, bed lifts, shower chairs, walkers, and wall bars, A planned exercise program early in the course of the disorder, A healthy lifestyle, with good nutrition and enough rest and relaxation, Avoiding fatigue, stress, temperature extremes, and illness, Changes in what you eat or drink if there are swallowing problems, Making changes around the home to prevent falls, Social workers or other counseling services to help you cope with the disorder and get assistance, Vitamin D or other supplements (talk to your doctor first)\u00a0, Complementary and alternative approaches, such as acupressure or cannabis, to help with muscle problems. ", "Causes": "Multiple sclerosis (MS) affects women more than men. The disorder is most commonly diagnosed between ages 20 and 40, but it can be seen at any age.MS is caused by damage to the myelin sheath. This sheath is the protective covering that surrounds nerve cells. When this nerve covering is damaged, nerve signals slow down or stop.The nerve damage is caused by inflammation. Inflammation occurs when the body's own immune cells attack the nervous system. This can occur along any area of the brain, optic nerve, and spinal cord.It is unknown what exactly causes MS. The most common thought is that a virus or gene defect, or both, are to blame. Environmental factors may also play a role.You are slightly more likely to develop this condition if you have a family history of MS or you\u00a0live in a part of the world where MS is more common."}, "Multiple endocrine neoplasia (MEN) I": {"description": "Multiple endocrine neoplasia (MEN) type I is a disease passed down through families, in which one or more of the endocrine glands are overactive or form a tumor. Endocrine glands most commonly involved include:", "Possible Complications": "The tumors can keep coming back. Symptoms and complications depend on which glands are involved.\u00a0Regular check-ups\u00a0by your health care provider\u00a0are essential.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Anxiety", "Black, tarry stools", "Bloated feeling after meals", "Burning, aching, or hunger discomfort in the upper abdomen or lower chest that is relieved by antacids, milk, or food", "Decreased sexual interest", "Fatigue", "Headache", "Lack of menstrual periods (in women)", "Loss of appetite", "Loss of body or facial hair (in men)", "Mental changes or confusion", "Muscle pain", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to the cold", "Unintentional weight loss", "Vision problems", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about your medical history and symptoms. The following tests may be done:Blood cortisol level, CT scan of the abdomen, CT scan of the head, Fasting blood sugar, Genetic testing, Insulin test, MRI of the abdomen, MRI of the head, Parathyroid biopsy, Serum adrenocorticotropic hormone, Serum calcium, Serum follicle stimulating hormone, Serum gastrin, Serum glucagon, Serum luteinizing hormone, Serum parathyroid hormone, Serum prolactin, Serum thyroid stimulating hormone, Ultrasound of the neck . ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the diseased gland is the treatment of choice. A medication called bromocriptine may be used instead of surgery for pituitary tumors that release the hormone prolactin.The parathyroid glands, which control calcium production, can be removed. However, because it is difficult for the body to regulate calcium levels without these glands, a total parathyroid removal is usually not done initially.Medicine is available to decrease the excess stomach acid production caused by some tumors (gastrinomas), and to reduce the risk of ulcers.Hormone replacement therapy is given when entire glands are removed or do not produce enough hormones.", "Causes": "MEN I is caused by a defect in a gene that carries the code for a protein called menin. The condition causes tumors of various glands to appear in the same person, but not necessarily at the same time.The disorder may occur at any age, and it affects men and women equally. A family history of this disorder raises your risk.", "Prevention": "Screening close relatives of people affected with this disorder is recommended."}, "Meperidine hydrochloride overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Small pupils (may be normal) ", "Constipation", "Nausea", "Spasms of the stomach or intestines", "Vomiting ", "Low blood pressure", "Weak pulse ", "Breathing - slow and labored", "Breathing - shallow", "No breathing", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fatigue", "Lightheadedness", "Twitching muscles", "Blue fingernails and lips", "Cold, clammy skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Meningitis - H. influenzae": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Buildup of fluid between the skull and brain (subdural effusion), Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Mental status changes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Severe headache", "Stiff neck (meningismus)", "Agitation", "Bulging fontanelles in infants\r\n ", "Decreased consciousness", "Poor feeding and irritability in children", "Rapid breathing", "Unusual posture, with the head and neck arched backwards "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. This will\u00a0usually show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. If the doctor thinks menigitis is possible, a\u00a0lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") is done to take a sample of\u00a0spinal fluid (cerebrospinal fluid, or CSF) for testing.Other tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the head, Gram stain, other special stains, and culture of CSF. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics should be given\u00a0as soon as possible. Ceftriaxone is one of the most commonly used antibiotics. Ampicillin may\u00a0sometimes\u00a0be used.Corticosteroids may be used to fight inflammation, especially in children.Unvaccinated people who are in close contact with someone who has H. influenzae meningitis should be given antibiotics to prevent infection. Such people include:Household members, Roommates in dormitories, Those who come into close contact with an infected person. ", "Causes": "H. influenzae meningitis is caused by Haemophilus influenzae bacteria. This illness is not the same as the flu (influenza), which is caused by\u00a0a virus.Before the Hib vaccine, H. influenzae was the leading cause of bacterial meningitis in children under age 5. Since the vaccine became available in the United States, this type of meningitis occurs in less than 2 in 100,000 children. H. influenzae meningitis may occur after an upper respiratory infection. The infection usually spreads from your lungs and airways to your blood, then the brain area.Risk factors include:Attending day care, Cancer, Ear infection (otitis media), Family member with an H. influenzae infection, Native American race, Pregnancy, Older age, Sinus infection (sinusitis), Sore throat (pharyngitis), Upper respiratory infection, Weakened immune system. ", "Prevention": "To protect infants and young children:Hib immunizations for infants and children are recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics and the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices., Several types of Hib vaccine are available for children ages 2 months and older. . All unvaccinated family members and close contacts (especially in health care or school settings) of people with this type of meningitis should begin antibiotic treatment as soon as possible to prevent spread of the infection. Ask your health care provider about antibiotics during the first visit.Close contacts in the same household, school, or day care center should be watched for early signs of the disease as soon as the first case is diagnosed. If two cases occur in a day care center, preventive antibiotics may be considered. Always use good hygiene habits, such as washing hands before and after changing a diaper, and after using the bathroom."}, "Myocarditis": {"description": "The condition is called pediatric myocarditis when it occurs in children.", "Possible Complications": "Cardiomyopathy, Heart failure, Pericarditis. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal heartbeat", "Chest pain that may resemble a heart attack", "Fatigue", "Fever and other signs of infection including headache, muscle aches, sore throat, diarrhea, or rashes", "Joint pain or swelling", "Leg swelling", "Shortness of breath", "Fainting, often related to irregular heart rhythms", "Low urine output"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show no abnormalities, or may reveal the following:\r\n  Abnormal heartbeat or heart sounds (murmurs, extra heart sounds)\r\n  , \r\n  Fever\r\n  , \r\n  Fluid in the lungs\r\n  , Rapid heartbeat (tachycardia), \r\n  Swelling (edema) in the legs or abdomen\r\n  . Tests used to diagnosis myocarditis include:\r\n  Blood cultures for infection\r\n  , \r\n  Blood tests for antibodies against the heart muscle and the body itself\r\n  , Chest x-ray, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Heart muscle biopsy (endomyocardial biopsy), Red blood cell count, Ultrasound of the heart (echocardiogram), White blood cell count. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at the cause of the problem, and may involve:\r\n  Antibiotics\r\n  , \r\n  Anti-inflammatory medicines to reduce swelling\r\n  , \r\n  Diuretics to remove excess water from the body\r\n  , \r\n  Low-salt diet\r\n  , \r\n  Reduced activity\r\n  . If the heart muscle is weak, your health care provider will prescribe medicines to treat heart failure. Abnormal heart rhythms may require the use of other medicines. You may also need a device such as a pacemaker, or an implantable cardioverter-defibrillator to correct an irregular heartbeat. If a blood clot is in the heart chamber, you will also receive blood thinning medicine.Rarely, a heart transplant may be needed if the heart muscle has become very weak or you have other health problems.", "Causes": "Myocarditis is an uncommon disorder. Most of the time, it is caused by a viral, bacterial, or fungal infection that reaches the heart.Viral infections:Coxsackie, Cytomegalovirus, Hepatitis C, Herpes, HIV, Parvovirus . Bacterial infections:Chlamydia, Mycoplasma, Streptococcus, Treponema. Fungal infections:Aspergillus, Candida, Coccidioides, Cryptococcus, Histoplasma . When you have an infection, your immune system produces special cells to fight off disease. If the infection affects your heart, the disease-fighting cells enter the heart. However, the chemicals produced by an immune response can damage the heart muscle. As a result, the heart can become thick, swollen, and weak. This leads to symptoms of heart failure.Other causes of myocarditis may include:Allergic reactions to certain medicines or toxins (alcohol, cocaine, certain chemotherapy drugs, heavy metals, and catecholamines), Being around certain chemicals, Certain diseases that cause inflammation throughout the body (rheumatoid arthritis, sarcoidosis) . ", "Prevention": "Treat conditions that cause myocarditis promptly to reduce the risk."}, "Malathion poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Airways and lungs \r\n\r\nChest tightness, Difficulty breathing. ", "Chest tightness", "Difficulty breathing", "Bladder and kidneys \r\n\r\nIncreased urination. ", "Increased urination", "Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nIncreased salivation, Increased tearing, Small or dilated pupils (not reactive to light). ", "Increased salivation", "Increased tearing", "Small or dilated pupils (not reactive to light)", "Heart and blood \r\n\r\nLow or high blood pressure, Slow or rapid heart rate, Weakness. ", "Low or high blood pressure", "Slow or rapid heart rate", "Weakness", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAgitation, Anxiety, Coma, Confusion, Convulsions, Dizziness, Headache. ", "Agitation", "Anxiety", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Skin \r\n\r\nBlue skin (lips and fingernails), Sweating. ", "Blue skin (lips and fingernails)", "Sweating", "Stomach and gastrointestinal tract \r\n\r\nAbdominal cramps, Diarrhea, Loss of appetite, Nausea, Vomiting. ", "Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "For information on general insecticide poisonings, see Insecticides."}, "Medial collateral ligament (MCL) injury of the knee": {"Symptoms": ["Knee swelling", "Locking or catching of the knee with movement", "Pain and tenderness along the inside of the joint", "The knee gives way or feels like it is going to give way when it is active or stressed in a certain way"], "Causes": "The MCL is usually injured by pressure or stress on the outside part of the knee. A block to the outside part of the knee during football is a common way for this ligament to be injured.It is often injured at the same time as an anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) injury occurs.", "description": "It can be a stretch, partial tear, or complete tear of the ligament. ", "Prevention": "Use proper techniques when playing sports or exercising. Many cases are not preventable."}, "Miscarriage - threatened": {"description": "A threatened miscarriage is a condition that suggests a miscarriage might take place before the 20th week of pregnancy.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia, Infection, Miscarriage, Moderate-to-heavy blood loss. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps with or without vaginal bleeding", "Vaginal bleeding during the first 20 weeks of pregnancy (last menstrual period was less than 20 weeks ago)"], "Exams and Tests": "Abdominal or vaginal ultrasound may be done to check the baby's development, heart beat, and amount of bleeding. A pelvic exam will be done to check the cervix.The following blood tests may be performed:Beta HCG (quantitative) test over a period of days or weeks to confirm whether the pregnancy is continuing, Complete blood count (CBC) to determine amount of blood loss, Pregnancy test to confirm pregnancy, Progesterone level, White blood count (WBC) with differential to rule out infection. ", "Treatment": "You may be told to avoid or restrict some forms of activity. Not having sexual intercourse is usually recommended until the warning signs have disappeared.The use of progesterone is controversial. It might relax smooth muscles, including the muscles of the uterus. However, it also might increase the risk of an incomplete abortion or an abnormal pregnancy. Unless there is a luteal phase defect, progesterone should not be used. Your doctor can tell you more about this.", "Causes": "Some pregnant women have some vaginal bleeding, with or without abdominal cramps, during the first three months of pregnancy. When the symptoms indicate a miscarriage is possible, the condition is called a \"threatened abortion.\" (This refers to a naturally occurring event, not medical abortions or surgical abortions.)Miscarriage occurs in about half of pregnancies that have first trimester bleeding.\r\n ", "Prevention": "Women who get prenatal care have better pregnancy outcomes for themselves and their babies. Miscarriages are less likely\u00a0when you receive early prenatal care.\u00a0And a healthy pregnancy is more likely when you avoid things that are harmful to your pregnancy\u00a0such as x-rays, recreational drugs, alcohol, high caffeine intake, and infectious diseases.It is better to treat health problems before you get pregnant than to wait until you are\u00a0already pregnant. Miscarriages that are caused by body-wide (systemic) diseases can be prevented by detecting and treating the disease before becoming pregnant. Being obese or having uncontrolled diabetes can increase your risk\u00a0of miscarriage."}, "Morphine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Eyes, ears, nose, and throatPinpoint pupils. ", "Pinpoint pupils", "Gastrointestinal systemConstipation, Nausea, Spasms of the stomach or intestinal tract, Vomiting. ", "Constipation", "Nausea", "Spasms of the stomach or intestinal tract", "Vomiting", "Heart and blood vesselsLow blood pressure, Weak pulse. ", "Low blood pressure", "Weak pulse", "Nervous systemComa, Drowsiness, Possible seizures. ", "Coma", "Drowsiness", "Possible seizures", "Respiratory systemDifficulty breathing, Slow and labored breathing, Shallow breathing, No breathing. ", "Difficulty breathing", "Slow and labored breathing", "Shallow breathing", "No breathing", "SkinBluish-colored fingernails and lips. ", "Bluish-colored fingernails and lips"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or\u00a0a local poison control center\u00a0at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Miscarriage": {"description": "The doctor may also use the term\u00a0threatened miscarriage. The symptoms of this condition, abdominal cramps with or without vaginal bleeding, are a sign that a miscarriage may occur.\u00a0\r\n ", "Possible Complications": "Complications of a complete miscarriage are rare.An infected abortion may occur if any tissue from the placenta or fetus remains in the uterus after the miscarriage. Symptoms of an infection include fever, vaginal bleeding that does not stop, cramping, and a foul-smelling vaginal discharge. Infections can be serious and require immediate medical attention.Women who lose a baby after 20 weeks of pregnancy receive different medical care. This is called premature delivery or fetal demise and requires immediate medical attention.After a miscarriage, mothers and their partners may feel sad. This is normal. If your feelings of sadness do not go away or get worse, seek advice from family and friends as well as your health care provider.", "Symptoms": ["Low back pain or abdominal pain that is dull, sharp, or cramping", "Tissue or clot-like material that passes from the vagina", "Vaginal bleeding, with or without abdominal cramps"], "Exams and Tests": "During a pelvic exam, your health care provider may see the cervix has opened (dilated) or thinned out (effacement).Abdominal or vaginal ultrasound may be done to check the baby's development, heart beat, and amount of bleeding.The following blood tests may be performed:Blood type (if you have an Rh-negative blood type, you would require a treatment with Rh-immune globulin. See: Rh incompatibility), Complete blood count (CBC) to determine how much blood has been lost, HCG (qualitative) to confirm pregnancy, HCG (quantitative) done every several days or weeks, WBC and differential to rule out infection. ", "Treatment": "When a miscarriage occurs, the tissue passed from the vagina should be examined. This is done\u00a0to determine if it was a normal placenta or a hydatidiform mole. It is also important to determine whether any pregnancy tissue remains in the uterus.If the pregnancy tissue does not naturally\u00a0leave the body, the woman may be closely watched for up to 2 weeks. Surgery (D and C) or medication (such as misoprostol) may be needed to remove the remaining contents from the womb.After treatment, the woman usually resumes her normal menstrual cycle within 4 - 6 weeks. Any further vaginal bleeding should be carefully monitored. It is often possible to become pregnant immediately. It is recommended that women wait one normal menstrual cycle before trying to become pregnant again.", "Causes": "Most miscarriages are caused by chromosome problems that make it impossible for the baby to develop. Usually, these problems are not related to the mother or father's genes.Other possible causes\u00a0of miscarriage include:Drug and alcohol abuse, Exposure to environmental toxins, Hormone problems, Infection, Obesity, Physical problems with the mother's reproductive organs, Problem with the body's immune response, Serious body-wide (systemic) diseases in the mother (such as uncontrolled diabetes), Smoking. Around half of all fertilized eggs die and are lost (aborted) spontaneously, usually before the woman knows she is pregnant. Among women who know they are pregnant, the miscarriage rate is about 15-20%. Most miscarriages occur during the first 7 weeks of pregnancy. The rate of miscarriage drops after the baby's heart beat is detected.The risk\u00a0of miscarriage is higher in women:Who are older, with increases beginning by age\u00a030, becoming greater between 35 and 40, and highest after 40., Who have had previous miscarriages.. ", "Prevention": "Early, comprehensive prenatal care is the best prevention for complications of pregnancy, such as miscarriage.Miscarriages that are caused by body-wide (systemic) diseases can be prevented by detecting and treating the disease before pregnancy occurs.Miscarriages are also\u00a0less likely if you avoid things that are harmful to your pregnancy. These include x-rays, recreational drugs, alcohol, high caffeine intake, and infectious diseases.When a mother's body has difficulty\u00a0keeping a pregnancy, signs such as slight vaginal bleeding may occur. This means there is a possibility of miscarriage. But it does not mean one will definitely occur. A pregnant woman who develops any signs or symptoms of threatened miscarriage should contact her prenatal provider immediately."}, "Mastoiditis": {"description": "Mastoiditis is an infection of the mastoid bone of the skull. The mastoid is located just behind the ear.", "Possible Complications": "Destruction of the mastoid bone, Dizziness or vertigo, Epidural abscess, Facial paralysis, Meningitis, Partial or complete hearing loss, Spread of infection to the brain or throughout the body. ", "Symptoms": ["Drainage from the ear", "Ear pain or discomfort", "Fever, may be high or suddenly increase", "Headache", "Hearing loss", "Redness of the ear or behind the ear", "Swelling behind ear, may cause ear to stick out"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of the head may reveal signs of mastoiditis. The following tests may show an abnormality of the mastoid bone:CT scan of the ear, Head CT scan. A culture of drainage from the ear may show bacteria.", "Treatment": "Mastoiditis may be hard to treat because the medicine may not reach deeply into the bone. The condition sometimes requires repeated or long-term treatment. The infection is treated with antibiotic injections, followed by antibiotics taken by mouth. Surgery to remove part of the bone and drain the mastoid (mastoidectomy) may be needed if antibiotic treatment does not work. Surgery to drain the middle ear through the eardrum (myringotomy) may be needed to treat the middle ear infection.", "Causes": "Mastoiditis is most often caused by a middle ear infection (acute otitis media). The infection may spread from the ear to the mastoid bone. The bone has a honeycomb-like structure that fills with infected material and may break down. The condition is most common in children. Before antibiotics, mastoiditis was one of the leading causes of death in children. The condition does not occur very often today. It is also much less dangerous. ", "Prevention": "Prompt and thorough treatment of ear infections reduces the risk of mastoiditis."}, "Mycoplasma pneumonia": {"description": "This type of pneumonia is also called atypical pneumonia because the symptoms\u00a0are different\u00a0from those of pneumonia due to other common bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Ear infections, Hemolytic anemia, Severe pneumonia, Skin rashes. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Chills", "Cough, usually dry and not bloody", "Excessive sweating", "Fever (may be high)", "Headache", "Sore throat ", "Ear pain", "Eye pain or soreness", "Muscle aches and joint stiffness", "Neck lump", "Rapid breathing", "Skin lesions or rash "], "Exams and Tests": "Persons with suspected pneumonia should have a complete medical evaluation. It may be hard for your health care provider to tell whether you have pneumonia, bronchitis, or another respiratory infection, so you may need a chest x-ray. Depending on how severe your symptoms are, other tests may be done, including:Complete blood count (CBC), Blood cultures, Blood tests, Bronchoscopy, CT scan of the chest, Open lung biopsy (only done in very serious illnesses when the diagnosis cannot be made from other sources), Sputum culture to check for mycoplasma bacteria . ", "Treatment": "To feel better, you can take these self-care measures at home:Control your fever with aspirin, nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs, such as ibuprofen or naproxen), or acetaminophen. DO NOT give aspirin to children., Do not take cough medicines without first talking to your doctor. Cough medicines may make it harder for your body to cough up the extra sputum., Drink plenty of fluids to help loosen secretions and bring up phlegm., Get a lot of rest. Have someone else do household chores.. Antibiotics are used to treat atypical pneumonia:You may be able to take antibiotics by mouth at home., If your condition is severe, you will likely be admitted to a hospital. There, you will be given antibiotics through a vein (intravenously), as well as oxygen., Antibiotics are used for 2 weeks or more., Finish all the antibiotics you've been prescribed, even if you feel better. If you stop the medicine too soon, the pneumonia can return and may be harder to treat.. ", "Causes": "Mycoplasma pneumonia usually affects people younger than 40. People who live or work in crowded areas such as schools and homeless shelters have a high chance of getting this condition. But many people who get sick with it have no known risk factors. ", "Prevention": "Wash your hands often, and have other people around you do the same.If your immune system is weak, stay away from crowds. Ask visitors who have a cold to wear a mask.Do not smoke. If you do, get help to quit.Get a flu shot every year. Ask your doctor if you need a pneumonia vaccine."}, "Mediastinal tumor": {"description": "Mediastinal tumors are growths that form in the mediastinum. This is an area in the middle of the chest that separates the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of mediastinal tumors include:Spinal cord compression, Spread to nearby structures such as the heart, lining around the heart (pericardium), and great vessels (aorta and vena cava). Radiation, surgery, and chemotherapy can all have serious complications.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Chills", "Cough", "Coughing up blood (hemoptysis)", "Fever", "Hoarseness", "Night sweats", "Shortness of breath "], "Exams and Tests": "A medical history and physical examination may show:Fever, High-pitched breathing sound (stridor), Swollen or tender lymph nodes (lymphadenopathy), Unintentional weight loss, Wheezing. Further tests that may be done include:Chest x-ray, CT-guided needle biopsy, CT scan of the chest, Mediastinoscopy with biopsy, MRI of the chest. ", "Treatment": "Treatment for mediastinal tumors depends on the type of tumor and symptoms: Thymic cancers are treated with surgery. It may be followed by radiation or chemotherapy, depending on the stage of the tumor and the success of the surgery., Germ cell tumors are usually treated with chemotherapy. , For lymphomas, chemotherapy is the treatment of choice, and is possibly followed by radiation., For neurogenic tumors of the posterior mediastinum, surgery is the main treatment.. ", "Causes": "The mediastinum is the part of the chest that lies between the sternum and the spinal column, and between the lungs. This area contains the heart, large blood vessels, windpipe (trachea), thymus gland, esophagus, and connective tissues. The mediastinum is divided into three sections:\r\nAnterior (front)\r\n  , \r\nMiddle\r\n  , \r\nPosterior (back)\r\n  . Mediastinal tumors are rare.The most common location for tumors in the mediastinum depends on the age of the patient. In children, tumors are more common in the posterior mediastinum. These tumors often begin in the nerves and are non-cancerous (benign).Most mediastinal tumors in adults occur in the anterior mediastinum and are usually cancerous (malignant) lymphomas, germ cell tumors, or thymomas. These tumors are most common in people ages 30 to 50."}, "Medial epicondylitis - golfer's elbow": {"Symptoms": ["Elbow pain that runs along the inside of your forearm to your wrist, on the same side as your pinky finger", "Pain when flexing your wrist, palm down", "Pain when shaking hands", "Weak grasp", "Numbness and tingling from your elbow up and into your pinky and ring fingers"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you and have you move your fingers, hand, and wrist. The exam may show:Pain or tenderness when the tendon is gently pressed where it attaches to the upper arm bone, over the inside of the elbow., Pain near the elbow when the wrist is bent forward., You may have x-rays to rule out other possible causes.. ", "description": "Medial epicondylitis is soreness or pain on the inside of the lower arm near the elbow. It is commonly called golfer\u2019s elbow.", "Causes": "The part of the muscle that attaches to a bone is called a tendon. Some of the muscles in your forearm attach to the bone on the inside of your elbow.When you use these muscles over and over again, small tears develop in the tendons. Over time, this leads to irritation and pain where the tendon is attached to the bone.The injury can occur from using poor form or overdoing certain sports, such as:Golf, Baseball and other throwing sports, such as football and javelin, Racquet sports, such as tennis, Weight training. Repeated twisting of the wrist (such as when using a screwdriver) can lead to golfer's elbow. People in certain jobs may be more likely to develop it, such as:Painters, Plumbers, Construction workers, Cooks, Assembly-line workers, Computer users, Butchers. ", "Treatment": "\r\n \r\nThe first step is to rest your arm and avoid the activity that causes your symptoms for at least 2 to 3 weeks or longer, until the pain goes away. You may also want to:Put ice on the inside of your elbow 3 to 4 times a day for 15 to 20 minutes., Take nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medicines. These include ibuprofen (Motrin, Advil), naproxen (Aleve), or aspirin., Do stretching and strengthening exercises. Your provider may suggest certain exercises, or you may have physical or occupational therapy. , Gradually return to activity.. If your golfer's elbow is due to a sports activity, you may want to:Ask about any changes you can make in your technique. If you play golf, have an instructor check your form., Check any sports equipment you are using to see if any changes may help. For example, using lighter golf clubs may help., Think about how often you have been playing your sport and if you should cut back the amount of time you play., If you work on a computer, ask your manager about making changes to your work station. Have someone look at how your chair, desk, and computer are set up., You can buy a special brace for golfer's elbow at most drug stores. It wraps around the upper part of your forearm and takes some of the pressure off the muscles.. Your provider may inject cortisone and a numbing medicine around the area where the tendon attaches to the bone. This may help decrease the swelling and pain.If the pain continues after 6 to 12 months of rest and treatment, surgery may be recommended. Talk with your surgeon about the risks, and ask if surgery might help."}, "Mistletoe poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting", "Weakness", "Drowsiness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Malignant hypertension": {"description": "Malignant hypertension is very high blood pressure that comes on suddenly and quickly. The lower (diastolic) blood pressure reading, which is normally less than 80 mmHg, is often above 130 mmHg.", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage (stroke, seizures), Heart damage, including:\r\n Heart attack,\r\nangina (chest pain due to narrowed blood vessels or weakened heart muscle), heart rhythm disturbances\r\n \u00a0\r\n , Kidney failure, Permanent blindness, Pulmonary edema (fluid in the lungs). ", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "\r\n Change in mental status, such as: Anxiety,\r\n confusion,\r\n decreased alertness, decreased ability to concentrate, fatigue,\u00a0restlessness, sleepiness, stupor, lethargy", "Chest pain (feeling of crushing or pressure)", "Cough", "Headache", "Nausea or vomiting", "Numbness of the arms, legs, face, or other areas", "Reduced urine output\r\n ", "Seizure", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness of the arms, legs, face, or other areas"], "Exams and Tests": "Malignant hypertension is a medical emergency.A physical exam commonly shows:Extremely high blood pressure, Swelling in the lower legs and feet, Abnormal heart sounds and fluid in the lungs, Changes in thinking, sensation, muscle ability, and reflexes. An eye examination will reveal changes that indicate high blood pressure, including:Bleeding of the retina (back part of the eye), Narrowing of the blood vessels in the retina, Swelling of the optic nerve, Other problems with the retina. Kidney failure, as well as other complications, may develop.Tests to determine damage to the kidneys may include:Arterial blood gas analysis, BUN, Creatinine, Urinalysis. A chest x-ray may show congestion in the lung and an enlarged heart.This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Aldosterone level, Cardiac enzymes (markers of heart damage), CT scan of the brain, Electrocardiogram (EKG), Renin level, Urinary sediment. ", "Treatment": "You will need to stay in the hospital until the severe high blood pressure is under control. Medications will be given through a vein to reduce your blood pressure.If there is fluid in your lungs, you will be given medicines called diuretics, which help the body remove fluid. Your doctor will consider giving you medications to protect the heart if there is evidence of heart damage.After the severe high blood pressure is brought under control, blood pressure medicines taken by mouth can control blood pressure. Your medication may need to be changed sometimes. High blood pressure can be difficult to control.", "Causes": "The disorder affects about 1% of people with high blood pressure, including both children and adults. It is more common in younger adults, especially African-American men.It also occurs in people with:Collagen vascular disorders (such as systemic lupus erythematosus, systemic\u00a0 sclerosis,and periarteritis nodosa)\r\n , Kidney problems, Toxemia of pregnancy. You are at high risk for malignant hypertension if you have had:Kidney failure , Renal hypertension caused by renal artery stenosis. ", "Prevention": "If you have high blood pressure, carefully monitor your blood pressure and take your medicines properly to help reduce the risk. Eat a healthy diet that is low in salt and fat."}, "Meningococcemia": {"description": "Meningococcemia is an acute and potentially life-threatening infection of the bloodstream.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications of this infection are:Arthritis, Bleeding disorder (DIC), Gangrene due to lack of blood supply, Inflammation of blood vessels in the skin, Inflammation of the heart muscle, Inflammation of the heart lining, Shock, Severe damage to adrenal glands that can lead to low blood pressure (Waterhouse-Friderichsen syndrome) . ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Headache", "Irritability", "Muscle pain", "Nausea", "Rash with red or purple spots ", "A decline in your level of consciousness", "Large areas of bleeding under the skin", "Shock"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests will be done to rule out other infections and help confirm meningococcemia. Such tests may include:Blood culture, Complete blood count with differential, Blood clotting studies . Other tests that may be done include:Lumbar puncture to get a sample of spinal fluid for culture, Skin biopsy and Gram stain, Urine analysis. ", "Treatment": "Meningococcemia is a medical emergency. People with this infection are often admitted to the intensive care unit of the hospital, where they are closely monitored. They may be placed in respiratory isolation for the first 24 hours to help prevent the spread of the infection to others.Treatments may include:Antibiotics given through a vein immediately, Breathing support, Clotting factors or platelet replacement, if bleeding disorders develop, Fluids through a vein, Medicines to treat low blood pressure, Wound care for areas of skin with blood clots . ", "Causes": "Meningococcemia is caused by bacteria called Neisseria meningitidis. The bacteria\u00a0often live in a person's upper respiratory tract without causing visible signs of illness. They can be spread from person to person through respiratory droplets. For example, you may become infected if you are around someone with the condition\u00a0and they sneeze or cough.Family members and those closely exposed to someone with the condition are at increased risk. The infection occurs more\u00a0often\u00a0in winter and early spring.", "Prevention": "Preventive antibiotics for family members and contacts are often recommended. Speak with your health care provider about this option.A vaccine that covers some, but not all, strains of meningococcus is recommended for children age 11 or 12. A booster is given at age 16. Unvaccinated college students who live in dormitories should also consider receiving this vaccine. It should be given a few weeks before they first move into the dorm. Talk to your provider about the appropriate use of this vaccine."}, "Meningitis - cryptococcal": {"description": "Cryptococcal meningitis is a fungal infection of the tissues covering the brain and spinal cord (meninges).", "Possible Complications": "Brain damage, Hearing loss, Hydrocephalus, Seizures. Amphotericin B can have side effects, including chills and stiffness, and sometimes kidney damage.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Mental status change", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Stiff neck"], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor or nurse will examine you. This will usually show:Fast heart rate, Fever, Mental status changes, Stiff neck. A lumbar puncture (\"spinal tap\") is an important test for diagnosis meningitis. This test is done to remove a sample\u00a0of\u00a0cerebrospinal fluid (CSF).Tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Chest x-ray, Cryptococcal antigen in CSF or blood, CSF examination for cell count, glucose, and protein, CT scan of the head, Gram stain, other special stains, and culture of CSF. ", "Treatment": "Antifungal medications are used to treat this form of meningitis. Intravenous therapy with amphotericin B is the most common treatment. It is often combined with an oral medication, 5-flucytosine.An oral medication, fluconazole, in high doses may also be effective against this infection, and may be used later in the course of treatment.", "Causes": "Cryptococcal meningitis is caused by the fungus Cryptococcus neoformans. This fungus is found in soil around the world.Cryptococcal meningitis most often affects people with a weakened immune system. Risk factors include:AIDS, \r\n Cirrhosis (a type of liver disease), Diabetes, Leukemia\r\n , Lymphoma, Sarcoidosis, Receiving an organ transplant. It\u00a0is rare in people who have\u00a0a normal immune system and no long-term health problems."}, "Major depression": {"description": "Major depression is a mental health condition. It is a mood disorder in which feelings of sadness, loss, anger, or frustration interfere with daily life for weeks or longer.", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Agitation, restlessness, and irritability, anger\r\n  ", "\r\n  Becoming withdrawn or isolated\r\n  ", "\r\n  Fatigue and lack of energy\r\n  ", "\r\n  Feeling hopeless and helpless, worthless, guilty, self-hate\r\n  ", "\r\n  Loss of interest or pleasure in activities that were once enjoyed\r\n  ", "\r\n  Sudden change in appetite, often with weight gain or loss\r\n  ", "\r\n  Thoughts of death or suicide\r\n  ", "\r\n  Trouble concentrating\r\n  ", "\r\n  Trouble sleeping or sleeping too much \r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will ask about your medical history and symptoms. Your answers can help your doctor diagnose depression and determine how severe it may be.Blood and urine tests may be done to rule out other medical conditions that have symptoms similar to depression.", "Causes": "Doctors do not know the exact causes of depression. It is believed that chemical changes in the brain are responsible. This may be due to a problem with your genes. Or it may be triggered by certain stressful events. More likely, it is a combination of both.Some types of depression run in families. Other types occur, even if you have no family history of the illness. Anyone can develop depression, even children and teens.Depression may be brought on by:Alcohol or drug abuse, Certain medical conditions, including underactive thyroid, cancer, or long-term pain, Certain medicines, such as steroids, Sleeping problems, Stressful life events, such as death or illness of someone close to you, divorce, childhood abuse or neglect, loneliness (common in the elderly), relationship breakup . ", "Prevention": "Do not drink alcohol or use illegal drugs. These substances make depression worse and may lead to thoughts of suicide.Take your medicine exactly as your doctor instructed. Learn to recognize the early signs that your depression is getting worse.Keep going to your talk therapy sessions. Counseling is just as effective as taking medicine.The following tips may help you feel better:Get more exercise., Maintain good sleep habits., Do activities that bring you pleasure., Volunteer or get involved in group activities., Talk to someone you trust about how you are feeling., Try to be around people who are caring and positive. . Learn more about depression by contacting a local mental health clinic. Your workplace employee assistance program (EAP) is also a good resource. Online resources can also provide good information.", "Treatment": "Depression can be treated. Treatment includes medicines, talk therapy, or both.If you are thinking about suicide or are very depressed and cannot function, you may need to be treated in a hospital.After you have been on treatment, if you feel your symptoms are getting worse, talk with your doctor. Your treatment plan may need to be changed.MEDICINESAntidepressants are medicines used to treat depression. They work by bringing back the chemicals in your brain to the right levels. This helps relieve your symptoms.If you have delusions or hallucinations, your health care provider may prescribe additional medicines.Tell your provider about any other medicines you take. Some medicines can change the way antidepressants work in your body.Allow your medicine time to work. It may take a few weeks before you feel better. Keep taking your medicine as instructed. Do not stop taking it or change the amount (dosage) you are taking without talking to your provider. Ask your doctor about possible side effects, and what to do if you have any.If you feel your medicine is not working, tell your provider. The medicine or its dosage may need to be changed. Do not stop taking medicines on your own.WARNING: Children, teens, and young adults should be watched closely for suicidal behavior. This is especially true during the first few months after starting medicines for depression.Women being treated for depression who are pregnant or thinking about becoming pregnant should not stop taking antidepressants without first talking to their provider.Beware of natural remedies such as St. John's wort. This is an herb sold without a prescription. It may help some people with mild depression. But it can change the way other medicines work in your body, including antidepressants. Talk to your health care provider before trying this herb.TALK THERAPYTalk therapy is counseling to talk about your feelings and thoughts, and help you learn how to deal with them.Types of talk therapy include:Cognitive behavioral therapy teaches you how to fight off negative thoughts. You learn how to become more aware of your symptoms and how to spot things that make your depression worse. You are also taught problem-solving skills., Psychotherapy can help you understand the issues that may be behind your thoughts and feelings., At group therapy, you share with others who have problems like yours. Your therapist or doctor can tell you more about group therapy. . OTHER TREATMENTS FOR DEPRESSIONElectroconvulsive therapy (ECT) may improve mood in people with severe depression or suicidal thoughts who do not get better with other treatments. ECT is generally safe., Light therapy may relieve depression symptoms in the winter time. This type of depression is called seasonal affective disorder. . "}, "Menthol overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blood in the urine", "No urine output", "Rapid breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Rapid heartbeat", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Tremor", "Unconsciousness", "Unsteady walking"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Methylmercury poisoning": {"description": "Methylmercury poisoning is brain and nervous system damage from the chemical methylmercury.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the severity of the condition, and the specific symptoms (such as blindness or deafness).Methylmercury poisoning has been linked to an increased heart attack rate.", "Symptoms": ["Blindness", "Cerebral palsy", "Deafness", "Growth problems", "Intellectual disability", "Lung function impairment", "Small head (microcephaly) "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests will vary depending on the symptoms that occur.", "Treatment": "Methylmercury damage is irreversible. Treatment is determined by the severity of the condition and is similar to that given for cerebral palsy. The patient should be removed from the source of exposure. Treatment may involve:Activated charcoal (if mercury is swallowed), Administration of intravenous fluids and electrolytes, Breathing support, including a breathing machine (ventilator), Dialysis (kidney machine) . ", "Causes": "Methylmercury is a type of mercury (\"quicksilver\"), a metal that is liquid at room temperature. Most compounds containing mercury are poisonous. Methylmercury has been used to preserve seed grain, which is fed to animals. Methylmercury may also form in water when other forms of mercury in the water react with certain bacteria. Methylmercury poisoning has occurred after people have eaten meat from animals fed seed grain or fish from waters contaminated with methylmercury (such as Minamata Bay in Japan). Because of many industrial uses, including the manufacture of fluorescent lights, batteries, polyvinyl chloride, and latex paint, mercury is a common pollutant of air and water.Unborn babies and infants are very sensitive to methylmercury's effects. Methylmercury causes central nervous system (brain and spinal cord) damage. How bad the damage is depends on how much poison gets into the body. Many of the symptoms of mercury poisoning are similar to those seen in cerebral palsy. In fact, methylmercury is thought to cause a form of cerebral palsy.The FDA recommends that women who are pregnant or may become pregnant, and nursing mothers avoid fish that may contain unsafe levels of methylmercury. Such fish include swordfish, king mackerel, shark, or tilefish. (Infants should not be given these fish, either.) You should not eat any of these fish caught by friends and family. Check with your local or state health department for warnings against locally caught, noncommercial fish.Some health care providers have raised concerns about ethyl mercury (thiomersal), a chemical used in some vaccines. However, research shows that childhood vaccines do not lead to dangerous mercury levels in the body. Vaccines used in children today only contain trace amounts of thiomersal. Thiomersal-free vaccines are available.", "Prevention": "Avoiding any foods contaminated with methylmercury will prevent poisoning. Because of manufacturing, mercury has become so common in the environment that trace amounts of methylmercury are present in many foods from the ocean, including deep-sea tuna. Fortunately, the levels are low enough that most of these foods remain safe.Avoid contact with mercury-containing industrial products. Contact poison control if you believe you may have been exposed."}, "McArdle syndrome ": {"description": "McArdle syndrome is the inability to break down glycogen. Glycogen is an important source of energy that is stored in all tissues, but especially in the muscles and liver.", "Possible Complications": "Exercise may produce muscle pain, or even a breakdown of skeletal muscle (rhabdomyolysis). This condition is associated with burgundy-colored urine and a risk for kidney failure, if it is severe.", "Symptoms": ["Burgundy-colored urine (myoglobinuria)", "Fatigue", "Exercise intolerance, poor stamina", "Muscle cramps", "Muscle pain", "Muscle stiffness", "Muscle weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be performed:Electromyography (EMG), Genetic testing, Lactic acid in blood, MRI, Muscle biopsy, Myoglobin in urine, Plasma ammonia, Serum creatine kinase. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment, but you can manage the symptoms by improving exercise tolerance and controlling physical activity. Avoid excessive or intense exercise. Dietary management should include having a supply of glucose (candy, for example) on hand if you need to replace energy. A diet high in protein may increase muscle endurance.Avoid general anesthesia.", "Causes": "McArdle syndrome is caused by a flaw in\u00a0the gene that makes an enzyme called glycogen phosphorylase. As a result, the body cannot break down glycogen in the muscles.The disease is an autosomal recessive genetic disorder. This means that you must get a copy of the nonworking gene from both parents. A person who gets a nonworking gene from only one parent usually does not develop this syndrome. A family history of McArdle syndrome increases the risk."}, "Methadone overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Pinpoint pupils ", "Constipation", "Nausea", "Spasms of the stomach or intestines", "Vomiting ", "Low blood pressure", "Weak pulse ", "Breathing difficulty", "Breathing - slow and labored", "Breathing - shallow", "No breathing ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Disorientation", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fatigue", "Muscle twitches (spasticity)", "Weakness ", "Blue fingernails and lips", "Cold, clammy skin "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Meatal stenosis": {"description": "Meatal stenosis is a narrowing of the opening of the urethra, the tube through which urine leaves the body.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal urine stream, Blood in the urine, Frequent urination, Painful urination, Urinary incontinence, Urinary tract infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal strength and direction of urine stream", "Bed wetting", "Bleeding (hematuria) at end of urination", "Discomfort with urination or straining with urination", "Incontinence (day or night)", "Visible narrow opening in boys"], "Exams and Tests": "In boys, a history and physical exam are enough to make the diagnosis.In girls, a voiding cystourethrogram may be done. The narrowing may also be found during a physical exam, or when a health care provider tries to place a Foley catheter.Other tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), Kidney and bladder ultrasound, Urine analysis, Urine culture. ", "Treatment": "In females, meatal stenosis can usually be treated in the health care provider's office. This is done using local anesthesia to numb the area. Then the opening of the urethra is widened (dilated) with special instruments.In boys, a minor outpatient surgery called meatoplasty is the treatment of choice.", "Causes": "Meatal stenosis can affect both males and females, but it is more common in males.In males, it is often caused by swelling and irritation (inflammation) after a newborn is circumcised. This leads to abnormal tissue growth and scarring across the opening of the urethra. The problem is usually not found until the child is toilet trained.In females, this condition is present at birth (congenital). Although less common, meatal stenosis may also affect adult women.Risks include:Having multiple endoscopic procedures (cystoscopy), Severe, long-term atrophic vaginitis. ", "Prevention": "If your baby boy has recently been circumcised, try to keep the diaper clean and dry. Avoid exposing the newly circumcised penis to any\u00a0irritants. They may cause inflammation and narrowing of the opening."}, "Methemoglobinemia": {"description": "With methemoglobinemia, the hemoglobin can carry oxygen but is unable to release it effectively to body tissues.", "Possible Complications": "Shock, Seizures, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish coloring of the skin", "Developmental delay", "Failure to thrive", "Intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Bluish coloring of the skin", "Bluish coloring of the skin", "Headache", "Fatigue", "Shortness of breath", "Lack of energy"], "Exams and Tests": "Methemoglobinemia can be diagnosed with a blood test.A baby with this condition will have a bluish skin color (cyanosis) at birth or shortly afterward. Arterial blood gases and pulse oximetry tests may be done.", "Treatment": "A medicine called methylene blue is used to treat severe methemoglobinemia. Methylene blue may be dangerous in patients who have or may be at risk for a blood disease called G6PD deficiency, and should not be used. If you or your child has G6PD deficiency, always tell your health care provider before receiving treatment.Ascorbic acid may also be used to reduce the level of methemoglobin.Alternative treatments include hyperbaric oxygen therapy and exchange transfusions.In most cases of mild acquired methemoglobinemia, no treatment is needed. But you should avoid the medicine or chemical that caused the problem. Severe cases may need treatment, which may include a blood transfusion.", "Causes": "This condition can be passed down through families (inherited or congenital). Or, it is caused by exposure to certain drugs, chemicals, or foods (acquired).There are two forms of inherited methemoglobinemia. The first form is passed on by both parents. The parents usually do not have the condition themselves, but they carry the gene that causes the condition. It occurs when there is a problem with an enzyme called cytochrome b5 reductase.There are two types of this form of methemoglobinemia:\r\n  Type 1 (also called erythrocyte reductase deficiency) occurs when red blood cells lack the enzyme.\r\n  , \r\n  Type 2 (also called generalized reductase deficiency) occurs when the enzyme doesn't work anywhere in the body.\r\n  . The second form of inherited methemoglobinemia is called hemoglobin M disease. It is caused by defects in the hemoglobin\u00a0protein itself. Only one parent needs to pass on the abnormal gene for the child to inherit the disease.Acquired methemoglobinemia is more common than the inherited forms. It occurs in some people after they are exposed to certain chemicals and drugs, including:\r\n  Anesthetics such as benzocaine\r\n  , \r\n  Benzene\r\n  , \r\n  Certain antibiotics (including dapsone and chloroquine)\r\n  , \r\n  Nitrites (used as additives to prevent meat from spoiling)\r\n  . The condition may also occur in infants who are very ill or who are fed too many vegetables containing nitrates (such as beets).", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for couples with a family history of methemoglobinemia who are considering having children."}, "Multi-infarct dementia": {"description": "Multi-infarct dementia is caused by a series of small strokes. Multi-infarct dementia is also called vascular dementia.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include the following:Future strokes, Heart disease, Loss of ability to function or care for self, Loss of ability to interact, Pneumonia, urinary tract infections, skin infections, Pressure sores. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty performing tasks that used to come easily, such as balancing a checkbook, playing games (such as bridge), and learning new information or routines", "Getting lost on familiar routes", "Language problems, such as trouble finding the name of familiar objects", "Losing interest in things you previously enjoyed, flat mood", "Misplacing items", "Personality changes and loss of social skills", "Change in sleep patterns, often waking up at night", "Difficulty doing basic tasks, such as preparing meals, choosing proper clothing, or driving", "Forgetting details about current events", "Forgetting events in your own life history, losing awareness of who you are", "Having delusions, depression, or agitation", "Having hallucinations, arguments, striking out, or violent behavior", "Having more difficulty reading or writing", "Having poor judgment and loss of ability to recognize danger", "Using the wrong word, not pronouncing words correctly, or speaking in confusing sentences", "Withdrawing from social contact"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may be ordered to help determine whether other medical problems could be causing dementia or making it worse, such as:Anemia, Brain tumor, Chronic infection, Drug and medication intoxication, Severe depression, Thyroid disease, Vitamin deficiency . Other tests may be done to find out what parts of thinking have been affected and to guide other tests.Tests that can show evidence of previous strokes in the brain may include:Head CT scan, MRI of the brain. ", "Treatment": "There is no treatment to turn back damage to the brain caused by small strokes.An important goal is to control symptoms and correct risk factors such as high blood pressure, smoking, and high cholesterol to prevent future strokes:\r\n  Avoid fatty foods. Follow a healthy, low-fat diet.\r\n  , \r\n  Do not drink more than 1 to 2 alcoholic drinks a day.\r\n  , \r\n  Keep blood pressure lower than 130/80 mm/Hg. Ask your doctor what your blood pressure should be.\r\n  , \r\n  Keep LDL \"bad\" cholesterol lower than 70 mg/dL.\r\n  , \r\n  Quit smoking.\r\n  , \r\n  The doctor may suggest aspirin or other medicines (blood thinners) to help prevent blood clots from forming in the arteries. Do not take or give aspirin without talking to the doctor first.\r\n  . The goals of helping someone with dementia in the home are to:\r\n  Manage behavior problems, confusion, sleep problems, and agitation\r\n  , \r\n  Remove safety hazards in the home\r\n  , \r\n  Support family members and other caregivers\r\n  . Medicines may be needed to control aggressive, agitated, or dangerous behaviors.Medicines used to treat Alzheimer disease have not been shown to work for MID.Hearing aids, glasses, or cataract surgery may be needed if the person has problems involving these senses.", "Causes": "Multi-infarct dementia (MID) is the second most common cause of dementia after Alzheimer disease in people over age 65. MID usually affects people between ages 55 and 75. More men than women have MID.MID is caused by a series of small strokes.A stroke is an interruption in or blockage of the blood supply to any part of the brain. A stroke is also called an infarct. Multi-infarct means that more than one area in the brain has been injured due to a lack of blood., If blood flow is stopped for longer than a few seconds, the brain cannot get oxygen. Brain cells can die, causing permanent damage., When these strokes affect a small area, there may be no symptoms of a stroke. These are called silent strokes. Over time, as more areas of the brain are damaged, the symptoms of MID appear., Not all strokes are silent. Larger strokes that affect strength, sensation, or other brain and nervous system (neurologic) function can also lead to MID. . Risk factors for MID include:Diabetes, Hardening of the arteries (atherosclerosis), High blood pressure (hypertension), Smoking, Stroke. Symptoms of dementia may also be caused by other types of disorders of the brain One such disorder is Alzheimer disease. Symptoms of Alzheimer disease can be similar to those of MID. MID and Alzheimer disease are the most common causes of dementia, and may occur together", "Prevention": "Control conditions that increase the risk of hardening of the arteries (atherosclerosis) by:Controlling high blood pressure, Controlling weight, Reducing saturated fats and salt in the diet, Treating related disorders . "}, "Morquio syndrome": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Breathing problems, Heart failure, Spinal cord damage and possible paralysis , Vision problems, Walking problems related to abnormal curvature of the spine and other bone problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal development of bones, including the spine", "Bell-shaped chest with ribs flared out at the bottom", "Coarse facial features", "Hypermobile joints", "Knock-knees", "Large head (macrocephaly)", "Short stature with a particularly short trunk", "Widely spaced teeth"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical examination. Examination and testing may reveal:Abnormal curvature of the spine (kyphoscoliosis), Cloudy cornea, Heart murmur (aortic regurgitation), Inguinal hernia, Liver enlargement, Loss of nerve function below the neck, Short stature (especially short trunk). Urine tests are usually done first. These tests may show extra mucopolysaccharides, but they can't determine the specific form of MPS.Other tests may include:Blood culture, Echocardiogram, Genetic testing, Hearing test, Slit-lamp eye exam, Skin fibroblast culture, X-rays of the long bones, ribs, and spine. Persons with Morquio syndrome should have MRI of the lower skull and upper neck to determine if the upper vertebrae are underdeveloped.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Morquio syndrome. Researchers are currently testing a possible treatment involving enzyme replacement.Symptoms are treated as they occur. A spinal fusion may prevent permanent spinal cord injury in persons whose neck bones are underdeveloped.", "Causes": "Morquio syndrome is an autosomal recessive trait. If both parents carry the defective gene related to this condition, each of their children has a 25% chance of developing the disease.There are two forms of Morquio syndrome: Type A and Type B.Persons with Type A do not have a substance (enzyme) called galactosamine-6-sulfatase., Persons with Type B do not produce enough of an enzyme called beta-galactosidase.. The body needs these enzymes to break down a long strand of sugar molecules called the keratan sulfate sugar chain. In both types, abnormally large amounts of glycosaminoglycans build up in the body, which can damage organs.The syndrome is estimated to occur in 1 of every 200,000 births. Symptoms usually start between ages 1 and 3. A family history of the syndrome raises one's risk for the condition.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents with a family history of Morquio syndrome. Counseling is also recommended for families who have a child with Morquio syndrome to help them understand the condition and possible treatments. Prenatal testing is available."}, "Meclofenamate overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Ringing in the ears", "Congestive heart failure (chest pain, shortness of breath)", "High or low blood pressure", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Possible loss of blood in the stomach and intestines", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting (sometimes with blood) ", "Difficulty breathing", "Wheezing", "Headache", "Agitation", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Fatigue and weakness (lethargy)", "Numbness and tingling", "Seizures", "Unsteadiness ", "Blistering rash", "Bruising"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}}